AN  INSECURE  FORECAST  FOR  CONTINUITY
OF  CLIMATE  AND  WEATHER  DATA:  THE
NPOESS  WEATHER  SATELLITE  PROGRAM

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON ENERGY AND

ENVIRONMENT

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND

TECHNOLOGY

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS

SECOND  SESSION

JUNE  19,  2008

Serial No. 110–109

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology

(

Available  via  the  World  Wide  Web:  http://www.science.house.gov

43–349PS

WASHINGTON  : 

2008

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE  AND  TECHNOLOGY

HON.  BART  GORDON,  Tennessee,  Chairman

JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
MARK  UDALL,  Colorado
DAVID  WU,  Oregon
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
NICK  LAMPSON,  Texas
GABRIELLE  GIFFORDS,  Arizona
JERRY  MCNERNEY,  California
LAURA  RICHARDSON,  California
PAUL  KANJORSKI,  Pennsylvania
STEVEN  R.  ROTHMAN,  New  Jersey
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
MIKE  ROSS,  Arkansas
BEN  CHANDLER,  Kentucky
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana
BARON  P.  HILL,  Indiana
HARRY  E.  MITCHELL,  Arizona
CHARLES  A.  WILSON,  Ohio
ANDRE´ CARSON,  Indiana

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
F.  JAMES  SENSENBRENNER  JR.,

Wisconsin

LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
JO  BONNER,  Alabama
TOM  FEENEY,  Florida
RANDY  NEUGEBAUER,  Texas
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
DAVID  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
MARIO  DIAZ-BALART,  Florida
PHIL  GINGREY,  Georgia
BRIAN  P.  BILBRAY,  California
ADRIAN  SMITH,  Nebraska
PAUL  C.  BROUN,  Georgia

SUBCOMMITTEE ON ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENT

HON.  NICK  LAMPSON,  Texas,  Chairman

JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
GABRIELLE  GIFFORDS,  Arizona
JERRY  MCNERNEY,  California
MARK  UDALL,  Colorado
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
PAUL  KANJORSKI,  Pennsylvania
BART  GORDON,  Tennessee

BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
RANDY  NEUGEBAUER,  Texas
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
MARIO  DIAZ-BALART,  Florida

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas

JEAN  FRUCI  Democratic  Staff  Director

JAMES  PAUL  Democratic  Professional  Staff  Member

SHIMERE  WILLIAMS  Democratic  Professional  Staff  Member
TARA  ROTHSCHILD  Republican  Professional  Staff  Member

STACEY  STEEP  Research  Assistant

(II)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

C O N T E N T S

June  19,  2008

Witness List .............................................................................................................
Hearing Charter ......................................................................................................

Page
2
3

Opening  Statements

Statement  by  Representative  Nick  Lampson,  Chairman,  Subcommittee  on
Energy  and  Environment,  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology,  U.S.
House of Representatives ....................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Bob  Inglis,  Ranking  Minority  Member,  Sub-
committee  on  Energy  and  Environment,  Committee  on  Science  and  Tech-
nology, U.S. House of Representatives ...............................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Jerry  F.  Costello,  Member,  Sub-
committee  on  Energy  and  Environment,  Committee  on  Science  and  Tech-
nology, U.S. House of Representatives ...............................................................

Witnesses:

Mr.  David  A.  Powner,  Director,  Information  Technology  Management  Issues,

Government Accountability Office

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Vice Admiral Conrad C. Lautenbacher, Jr. (U.S. Navy, Ret.), Under Secretary
of  Commerce  for  Oceans  and  Atmosphere;  Administrator,  National  Oceanic
and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA)

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................

Discussion

Executive Committee Performance .....................................................................
Continuity Concerns ............................................................................................
The VIIRS Sensor ................................................................................................
The Gap Between Satellite Launches ................................................................
More on the Executive Committee’s Performance .............................................
Acquisition Document Approval ..........................................................................
Bureaucratic Delays .............................................................................................
More on Acquisition Document Approval ...........................................................
Life Cycle Costs ....................................................................................................

Appendix  1:  Answers  to  Post-Hearing  Questions

Mr.  David  A.  Powner,  Director,  Information  Technology  Management  Issues,
Government Accountability Office ......................................................................
Vice Admiral Conrad C. Lautenbacher, Jr. (U.S. Navy, Ret.), Under Secretary
of  Commerce  for  Oceans  and  Atmosphere;  Administrator,  National  Oceanic
and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA) .........................................................

(III)

8
9

9
10

11

11
13
27

28
31
39

40
41
44
44
46
47
50
52
53

58

61

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

IV

Appendix  2:  Additional  Material  for  the  Record

Memorandum  for  the  Secretary  of  the  Air  Force  from  John  J.  Young,  Jr.,
Under Secretary of Defense, dated April 30, 2008 ............................................
Letter  to  John  J.  Young,  Jr.,  Under  Secretary  of  Defense,  from  Conrad  C.
Lautenbacher,  Under  Secretary  of  Commerce  for  Oceans  and  Atmosphere,
NOAA, dated May 16, 2008 .................................................................................

Page

70

72

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

AN  INSECURE  FORECAST  FOR  CONTINUITY
OF  CLIMATE  AND  WEATHER  DATA:  THE
NPOESS  WEATHER  SATELLITE  PROGRAM

THURSDAY,  JUNE  19,  2008

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES,

SUBCOMMITTEE ON ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENT,

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY,

Washington, DC.

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  call,  at  10:11  a.m.,  in  Room
2318  of  the  Rayburn  House  Office  Building,  Hon.  Nick  Lampson
[Chairman of the Subcommittee] presiding.

(1)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

2

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3

HEARING CHARTER

SUBCOMMITTEE ON ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENT

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

An Insecure Forecast for Continuity
of Climate and Weather Data: The
NPOESS Weather Satellite Program

THURSDAY, JUNE 19, 2008

10:00 A.M.–12:00 P.M.

2318 RAYBURN HOUSE OFFICE BUILDING

Purpose

The  Subcommittee  on  Energy  and  Environment  meets  on  June  19,  2008,  for  fur-
ther  oversight  on  the  National  Polar-Orbiting  Operational  Environmental  Satellite
System  (NPOESS).  The  Government  Accountability  Office  (GAO)  will  testify  on  the
latest  report  concerning  the  troubled  weather  satellite  program  and  the  Adminis-
trator  of  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA)  will  re-
spond. Recent events have once more raised questions about the stability of the pro-
gram, including a new threat to the most critical instrument and decisions that may
create new management risks.

Witnesses
Mr. David Powner, Director, Information Technology Management Issues, Govern-
ment Accountability Office

Mr.  Powner  is  the  head  of  the  GAO  team  continuously  monitoring  the  NPOESS
program  since  2001.  He  will  present  the  latest  in  the  continuing  series  of  reports
commissioned  by  the  Committee  on  this  satellite  program.  He  will  also  respond  to
changes  that  have  occurred  in  the  program’s  status  since  GAO  completed  work  on
its review.
Vice  Admiral  (Ret.)  Conrad  Lautenbacher,  Administrator,  National  Oceanic
and Atmospheric Administration

The NPOESS program is fundamental to NOAA’s weather missions, and Admiral
Lautenbacher,  as  head  of  NOAA,  shares  responsibility  for  managing  the  develop-
ment  program.  Lautenbacher  serves  as  a  member  of  the  program  Executive  Com-
mittee  (EXCOM)  with  representatives  of  NASA  and  the  Air  Force,  NOAA’s  partner
agencies. Because the GAO report raises issues requiring action by the EXCOM, Ad-
miral Lautenbacher has been asked to provide NOAA’s testimony.

Issues for Discussion
A. Life Cycle Cost Increases

Just over a year ago, the Subcommittee held its previous hearing on the NPOESS
program. At the time, efforts were underway to implement decisions imposed on the
program after a so-called Nunn-McCurdy review by the Department of Defense. The
NPOESS program is being conducted using the Air Force procurement system, and
at  the  point  that  the  program  cost  estimate  rose  more  than  25  percent  beyond  the
approved  baseline,  DOD  was  required  by  law  to  execute  a  program  recertification.
In June 2006, the results of this recertification were announced. In brief, the esti-
mate  for  acquisition  cost  rose  to  $11.5  billion  (with  an  additional  $1  billion  to
cover  operating  costs,  making  the  total  life  cycle  cost  $12.5  billion).  Only  two
satellites were guaranteed to be built, with the first launch scheduled for 2013.
A  decision  to  buy  two  more  satellites,  and  to  reconsider  the  program’s  man-
agement  structure,  was  to  be  made  in  2010.  This  contrasted  with  the  previously
baselined  program,  which  anticipated  purchasing  six  satellites  at  an  acquisition
cost of $7.4 billion with  a first launch in 2008. The  capabilities  of  the  satellites
were reduced, in that one of the major instruments (the Conical Microwave Imaging
Sounder) was removed, to be replaced with a less-capable instrument on the second
NPOESS  satellite  that  would  be  launched  in  2016.  Also  removed  were  instruments

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

4

intended to extend the data records for monitoring the Earth’s climate, and to track
events  on  the  Sun  that  had  the  potential  to  disturb  the  planet’s  geomagnetic  envi-
ronment.

Mr.  Powner  reported  to  staff  in  a  briefing  June  11  that  the  life  cycle  cost  for  the
program has apparently increased $1.1 billion, to $13.6 billion. Based on the data
reviewed, he estimates that the NPOESS program expended $300 million in the last
year  to  deal  with  the  broken  frame  suffered  by  the  Cross-Track  Infrared  Sounder
(CrIS)  during  vibration  testing,  and  to  address  the  changes  in  the  cryoradiator  for
the  primary  NPOESS  instrument,  the  Visible  Infrared  Imaging  Radiometer  Suite
(VIIRS).  The  problems  with  VIIRS  ultimately  resulted  in  another  delay  in  delivery
of the flight unit for the NPOESS Preparatory Project (NPP) mission,1 which slipped
the launch date to June 2010.

Beyond this, GAO believes that the program life cycle cost will grow another $800
million  to  reflect  an  updated  understanding  of  the  likely  operations  and  support
costs. The NPOESS program recently undertook a review of the operations cost esti-
mate,  the  first  since  2002.  The  DOD’s  independent  cost  estimators  were  also  asked
to prepare an estimate, which appears to be the first time an independent estimate
on  operations  costs  has  been  conducted.  On  June  12,  NOAA  briefed  staff  that  the
two  estimates  are  being  reconciled  to  determine  what  will  be  incorporated  into  the
program  baseline.  They  were  reluctant  to  provide  their  own  estimate  of  what  that
number would be.

GAO’s estimate came before NOAA informed staff of yet another threat to VIIRS
that is under investigation. While preparing the unit for testing, some of the screws
used to assemble the instrument were found to have their heads sheared off. Initial
indications are that the posts into which the screws are inserted were manufactured
improperly  and  so  the  screws  did  not  seat  properly.  There  is  a  possibility  that  the
entire  VIIRS  instrument  may  have  to  be  disassembled  to  install  all  new  posts.  If
this  is  indeed  the  case,  NPP  will  once  again  be  delayed  and  there  will  be  a  further
cost  impact.  The  NOAA  briefers  hoped  this  will  be  avoided.  In  either  case,  this  is
not  a  technical  issue  that  results  from  efforts  to  push  technology.  Despite  the  mul-
tiple  layers  of  oversight  that  have  been  applied  to  the  VIIRS  instrument  for  some
years,  these  surprises  continue  to  occur  and  the  program  continues  to  be  held  hos-
tage.  It  is  interesting  to  note  that  this  backsliding  has  occurred  in  the  period  fol-
lowing  the  transfer  of  the  former  NPOESS  Program  Executive  Officer,  Air  Force
Brigadier  General  Susan  Mashiko,  against  the  warning  in  GAO’s  previous  report.
Despite the fact that she was replaced by the System Program Director, Dan Stock-
ton,  it  cannot  be  ruled  out  that  these  changes  allowed  slack  to  creep  back  into  the
program.

B. The EXCOM relationships

GAO once again notes that major management documents have yet to be finalized
and  recommends  that  this  be  done  as  quickly  as  possible.  The  agencies  received  a
new  incentive  to  accomplish  this  goal.  On  April  30,  2008,  the  Program  Acquisition
Executive,  Under  Secretary  for  Defense  for  Acquisitions,  Logistics  and  Technology
John Young, informed the program that failure to finalize all documents by August
31,  2008  would  result  in  a  cutoff  of  DOD  funds.2 (see  attached)  Loss  of  DOD  fund-
ing, by direction of the Committee on Appropriations, would require the Department
of  Commerce  to  cut  an  equal  amount  of  funding.  That  would,  of  course,  be  a  crip-
pling blow to the program.

The  NPOESS  program  is  a  unique  entity,  in  that  it  receives  its  budget  from  two
co-equal  sources  and  is  governed  by  an  Integrated  Program  Office  (IPO)  where
NOAA  has  program  management  responsibilities,  the  Air  Force  directs  acquisition
activities  and  NASA  contributes  technical  support  and  manages  the  NPP  mission.
The  Nunn-McCurdy  recertification  of  NPOESS  in  2006  was  driven  by  the  goal  of
maintaining  existing  levels  of  operational  weather  capability.  The  staff  was  briefed
on June 18 by Josh Hartman, the staff specialist for space and intelligence matters
for  Mr.  Young,  to  describe  the  genesis  of  the  memorandum.  In  brief,  he  described
the  memorandum  as  an  effort  to  instill  greater  discipline  into  the  NPOESS  pro-

1 This  precursor  satellite,  funded  by  NASA,  was  originally  intended  to  allow  NPOESS  opera-
tors  to  practice  with  the  major  instruments  before  introducing  them  into  the  operational  con-
stellation. It has now taken on the additional function of carrying on climate monitoring respon-
sibilities after the expected loss of NASA’s Aqua satellite.

2 Young,  John.  Memorandum  for  the  Secretary  of  the  Air  Force,  Joint  Chiefs  of  Staff/J-*  and
Program Executive Office, Environmental Sensing. Subject: National Polar-orbiting Operational
Environmental  Satellite  System  (NPOESS)  Acquisition  Decision  Memorandum.  Office  of  the
Under  Secretary  of  Defense  for  Acquisition,  Technology  and  Logistics,  Department  of  Defense,
Washington, D.C. April 30, 2008.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

5

gram.  The  continuing  failure  to  complete  agreements  on  the  program  management
documents  resulted  in  the  establishment  of  the  funding  cut-off  deadline  of  August
31,  2008.  Mr.  Hartman  agreed  with  GAO  that  the  process  had  consumed  an  exces-
sive amount of time, and Mr. Young’s direction is intended to focus minds.

Of  particular  interest  was  the  discussion  about  the  current  status  of  these  docu-
ments. In our briefing with NOAA, the message seemed to be that many documents
were awaiting clearance by the Air Force. GAO seemed to have a similar view. Mr.
Hartman,  however,  provided  a  chart  he  had  received  from  Program  Executive  Offi-
cer  Dan  Stockton  showing  that  decisions  need  to  be  made  by  NASA  and  NOAA  as
well.  GAO’s  testimony  highlighted  issues  relating  to  the  new  Memorandum  of
Agreement  that  is  to  define  agency  roles  in  the  reconstituted  program.  There  was
indication  that  DOD  was  asking  for  changes  after  the  other  agencies  had  finished.
Mr. Hartman agreed that DOD had not communicated effectively with its partners,
but  that  there  were  statutory  responsibilities  for  DOD  that  required  certain  lan-
guage  to  be  included  and  that  he  felt  this  had  not  been  clear  to  NOAA  and  NASA.
Mr.  Hartman  also  discussed  the  requirements  changes  for  NPOESS  instruments
described in Young’s letter. These result from a June 2006 agreement with the pro-
gram  user  groups  to  prioritize  schedule  and  cost  over  performance  when  conflicts
arose among those three elements. One of the Nunn-McCurdy decisions was to allow
instrument  performance  to  fall  back  to  a  level  equal  to  the  performance  of  instru-
ments on the existing satellites (DOD’s Defense Meteorological Satellite Program or
NOAA’s  Polar-Orbiting  Environmental  Satellites).  Again,  Mr.  Hartman  stated  that
the discussions underway to convert that decision into the actual numbers for inclu-
sion  in  the  program  baseline  had  dragged  on  and  needed  resolution.  The  effect  of
Mr. Young’s memorandum is to direct the program to continue pursuing the instru-
ment  performance  levels  laid  out  in  the  program  specifications.  Should  it  happen
that  trying  to  achieve  those  program  improvements  would  result  in  schedule  slips
or cost increases, the EXCOM would decide when to authorize reducing the perform-
ance to so-called ‘‘legacy’’ level. Admiral Lautenbacher’s response3 expresses concern
that the guidance is not completely clear where the performance boundaries lie and
requests that this be clarified. (see attached)

GAO  provided  the  new  Decision  Memorandum  and  NOAA’s  response  to  Com-
mittee  staff  on  June  11.  They  came  as  something  of  a  surprise,  and  an  effort  was
made to include Mr. Young as a witness at the hearing. He declined, due to the late
date.  The  staff’s  meeting  with  Mr.  Hartman  allowed  some  insight  into  Mr.  Young’s
intentions.  Mr.  Hartman  disagreed  that  DOD  has  been  seeking  to  escape  from  its
commitment and stated Mr. Young hopes that greater discipline will allow the pro-
gram  as  we  know  it  to  be  completed.  Had  his  memorandum  been  provided  to  the
Committee  earlier,  he  might  have  been  able  to  make  those  points  directly.  Admiral
Lautenbacher should be asked why the Committee did not receive the memorandum
from  NOAA  in  May,  leaving  it  to  GAO  to  bring  it  to  our  attention  only  a  week  be-
fore the hearing.

The  staff’s  meeting  with  Mr.  Hartman  also  revived  the  issue  of  the  effectiveness
of  the  Executive  Committee  in  managing  the  NPOESS  program.  Mr.  Hartman  has
been participating in EXCOM meetings since he started working in Mr. Young’s of-
fice last August. The EXCOM, he said, seemed to spend a great deal of time on sta-
tus  reports,  and  he  often  found  that  he  left  meetings  wondering  what  had  been  ac-
complished.  The  languid  pace  of  completing  the  management  documents  and  exe-
cuting  the  needed  requirements  changes  in  the  program  baseline  reflected  the  dif-
ficulty  the  EXCOM  had  in  reaching  decisions.  In  the  NOAA  briefing,  Mr.  Stockton
was  asked  directly  if  the  funding  cutoff  reflected  a  feeling  that  the  program  need
a ‘‘kick in the pants’’ to overcome procrastination. He said no. Yet this was precisely
Mr. Hartman’s explanation for the language in the memorandum.

The Executive Committee is always presented to the Committee as the final deci-
sion point for NPOESS decisions that cannot be made elsewhere. Yet Mr. Hartman’s
description  seems  to  show  that  it  has  reverted  to  the  ineffective  body  that  earned
Committee  criticism  during  the  Nunn-McCurdy  process.  At  that  time,  it  appeared
that  EXCOM  members  were  not  even  aware  of  how  far  the  situation  had  deterio-
rated. Mr. Hartman believes that the EXCOM can accomplish its intended function
with  appropriate  leadership—which  Mr.  Young  appears  to  be  willing  to  supply  if
necessary. There may also be other alternatives the Committee should consider.

3 Lautenbacher, Conrad C., Jr. Letter to the Honroable John J. Young, Jr. Office of the Under
Secretary  of  Commerce  for  Oceans  and  Atmosphere,  Department  of  Commerce,  Washington,
D.C. May 16, 2008.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

6

C. Alternative management

The NPOES program was tasked, as part of the Nunn-McCurdy decision, to evalu-
ate  possible  alternative  management  structures  in  time  to  determine  if  Northrop
Grumman  should  be  replaced  as  system  contractor  in  2010.  According  to  GAO’s  re-
port, the resulting study was completed last September. Mr. Young asked for a sta-
tus  report  on  this  effort  in  May  and  directed  that  it  be  completed  by  August  31.
Admiral Lautenbacher should be asked to discuss the possible alternatives that the
program has identified, and describe the risks and benefits the program can expect.
A decision to change would be made at the time that the decision to transition from
engineering to production is expected. This will also entail choosing to purchase the
third  and  fourth  NPOESS  satellites.  That  decision  is  somewhat  foreordained,  given
that  nothing  has  been  put  in  place  to  develop  a  follow-on  system.  Whether  to  then
continue  buying  NPOESS  satellites  or  inaugurate  a  new  development  program
should be explored.

D. Ground system security standards

GAO  also  highlights  in  its  report  that  NOAA  and  the  Air  Force  disagree  on  the
level  of  security  standards  to  be  applied  to  the  ground  segment  of  NPOESS.  The
Department  of  Defense  established  the  original  security  requirements  for  the
ground-side  elements.  NOAA  now  believes  that  newer  Federal  Information  Proc-
essing  Standards  should  be  applied.  According  to  GAO,  adopting  NOAA’s  position
would have a cost impact in the ‘‘hundreds of millions’’ of dollars. GAO’s report indi-
cates  that  the  rework  and  retesting  to  implement  new  standards  could  affect  the
cost and schedule of what has to date been the lowest-risk part of the NPOESS pro-
gram.  Admiral  Lautenbacher  should  explain  why  the  benefits  of  making  this  late
change—with  its  attendant  risk—are  worth  the  costs.  He  should  also  explain  how
such costs will be met if the decision is to go forward.

E. Climate sensor recovery

Dr.  John  Marburger,  Director  of  the  Office  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy
(OSTP),  testified  at  last  year’s  hearing  about  the  process  underway  to  recover  from
the loss of the climate sensors. Both NOAA and NASA had collaborated on an anal-
ysis  of  the  threats  to  climate  monitoring  posed  by  the  loss  of  these  sensors  aboard
NPOESS. The Subcommittee was concerned that OSTP might be moving too slowly;
teams developing some of the climate sensors were preparing to disband.

Since  last  year’s  hearing,  decisions  have  been  made  to  bring  forward  and  refur-
bish  the  last  CERES  (Clouds  and  Earth’s  Radiant  Energy  System)  sensor  from  the
first  NPOESS  satellite  to  fly  on  NPP.  A  new  CERES  sensor  will  then  be  built  for
the  first  NPOESS  flight.  Another  sensor,  the  Total  Solar  Irradiance  Sensor  (TSIS),
was restored to the first NPOESS satellite. NOAA had requested funds to begin the
CERES  changes  in  the  FY08  budget,  but  this  was  lost  in  the  final  omnibus  appro-
priation.  The  agency  cobbled  together  funds  to  permit  steps  to  be  taken  to  support
an October 1, 2008 start. The agency also intends to begin the new TSIS sensor pro-
gram on the same day, with delivery contemplated for December 2011.

Success  at  restoring  the  CERES  and  TSIS  sensors  now  depends  on  NOAA’s  re-
quest for $74 million in its FY09 budget. This is the first installment of what is in-
tended to be a five-year, $74 million level-of-effort program. GAO notes in its report
that  a  plan  for  the  long-term  restoration  of  the  Nation’s  climate-monitoring  capa-
bility  is  still  lacking,  and  that  the  sensors  announced  to  date  only  deal  with  the
most immediate near-term threats of gaps in climate data. NOAA indicated that the
level-of-effort  proposal  is  intended  to  provide  that  missing  plan,  to  develop  addi-
tional  sensors  and  to  place  them  into  operation.  The  agency  has  expressed  concern
that  the  contemplated  continuing  resolution  may  upset  the  progress  made  so  far.
Much  still  remains  to  be  dealt  with  in  terms  of  the  capabilities  lost  from  the
NPOESS sensors. For example, the Aerosol Polarimetric Sensor (APS) program has
now  arrived  at  much  the  same  spot  that  TSIS  found  itself  in  last  year.  APS  will
fly  the  prototype  sensor  on  the  upcoming  Glory  mission  for  NASA.  A  new  design,
it has been difficult to achieve the targets for precision and accuracy needed to meet
the promised specifications and NASA has been frustrated with Raytheon’s perform-
ance.4 Recently,  however,  the  instrument  has  been  meeting  its  test  goals  and  is  on
track for delivery. The contract is therefore running down and the instrument team
is  likely  to  break  up.  NOAA  told  staff  that  the  agency  intends  to  evaluate  the  per-
formance of the sensor before deciding whether to purchase more. This is consistent
with  the  recommendations  from  OSTP’s  analysis,  but  means  that  there  will  likely
be  no  option  to  fly  a  new  sensor  for  some  years  after  the  end  of  the  Glory  mission.

4 APS is being built by the same Raytheon division responsible for the VIIRS instrument.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

7

This  will  likely  affect  efforts  to  provide  a  more  accurate  understanding  of  the  im-
pacts atmospheric aerosols have on climate.

F. Space weather sensor recovery

The  second  set  of  sensors  demanifested  from  NPOESS  in  2006  monitor  the  so-
called  ‘‘space  weather’’  phenomena  generated  in  solar  flares  and  coronal  mass  ejec-
tions.  These  events  can,  under  the  right  circumstances,  affect  satellite  communica-
tions,  overwhelm  signals  from  the  Global  Positioning  System,  increase  long-term
cancer  risks  for  airline  crews  and  pilots  flying  in  the  polar  regions  or  bring  down
power grids. The Air Force is particularly concerned because of the difficulty in dis-
cerning between natural interference with satellite command and control and delib-
erate efforts to impede communications as prelude to an attack.

In  January,  the  Office  of  the  Federal  Coordinator  of  Meteorology  (OFCM)  sub-
mitted  its  analysis  of  the  impacts  to  the  space  weather  program  occasioned  by  the
loss  of  the  NPOESS  space  weather  sensors  to  OSTP.  The  report  concludes  that
‘‘[t]here  are  no  planned  missions  to  replace  the  space  environmental  sensing  capa-
bilities  removed  from  NPOESS.  A  loss  of  continuity  of  critical  measurements  will
occur when existing on-orbit operational systems complete their missions during the
next decade.’’ They judge that anticipated losses range from ‘‘moderate’’ (for plasma,
which can determine how badly communications are affected by solar events) to ‘‘ex-
treme’’  (in  the  case  of  the  Electron  Density  Profile  measurement,  without  which  it
is harder to determine what is happening to satellites). While the sensors would not
be  available  in  time  to  monitor  the  approaching  peak  in  the  Sun’s  11-year  cycle,
they  would  arrive  on  station  to  carry  through  the  next.  NOAA  states  that  they  are
now discussing a follow-on mission with NASA and the Air Force.

While  unrelated  to  the  NPOESS  sensors,  the  OFCM  also  noted  that  the  primary
early-warning space weather sensor, NASA’s Advanced Composition Explorer (ACE),
has passed its tenth anniversary. Originally designed for a two-and-a-half year mis-
sion, it continues in service to allow NOAA to provide advance warnings of one-half
to  one  hour  for  solar  events  that  will  affect  the  Earth’s  atmosphere  and  magnetic
field.  Such  warnings  to  airlines,  power  companies  and  communications  firms  give
enough  time  to  take  steps  to  reduce  disruptions  in  vital  services.  ACE  is  the  latest
instance of the lack of long-term planning for developing improved operational capa-
bilities  from  research  programs.  Further,  in  May  NOAA  reported  that  the  X-Ray
Sensor on all of the newer Geostationary Operational Environmental Satellites had
failed.  The  agency  is  currently  depending  on  the  last  working  sensor  on  the  oldest
(GOES–10) satellite to track solar flares and working to obtain equivalent data from
other missions.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

8

Chairman LAMPSON. This hearing will come to order. Good morn-
ing, everyone. We once again meet to keep abreast of the National
Polar-Orbiting  Operational  Environmental  Satellite  System.  When
launched,  NPOESS  will  be  the  primary  source  of  information  the
National  Weather  Service  uses  to  make  its  long-range  forecasts.
Our  military  services  will  need  NPOESS  data  to  plan  operations
around the globe. This Committee has given sustained attention to
this program because it is so very vital to our daily lives.

NPOESS  is  having  a  difficult  birth.  The  Government  Account-
ability  Office  once  more  has  to  report  that  instability  continues  to
beset the program. Last year GAO recommended that the program
managers  needed  to  complete  the  basic  planning  and  management
documents  to  assure  that  everyone  understands  the  schedule,  the
objectives,  and  the  resources.  It  is  a  year  later,  and  GAO  still  has
to  recommend  getting  this  basic  task  done.  The  Under  Secretary
for  Defense  for  Acquisitions,  Logistics  and  Technology,  Mr.  John
Young,  has  ordered  these  to  be  finished  by  the  end  of  August  or
funding  will  be  cut  off.  Admiral  Lautenbacher  will  assure  us  most
strenuously  that  this  time  the  paperwork  will  get  finished,  and  I
want to discuss that with him later.

I would like to have had Mr. Young here to talk about his memo-
randum  and  his  views  on  the  management  of  the  NPOESS  pro-
gram. Unfortunately, it wasn’t until last week that we knew it had
been  issued.  I  hope  Admiral  Lautenbacher  will  explain  why  a
memo  he  received  in  May  did  not  reach  us  until  June,  and  then
from GAO. This committee, under both Democratic and Republican
leadership, has done its utmost to assist NOAA in keeping this pro-
gram on track. The Committee has always expected to be kept fully
and completely informed and I expect Admiral Lautenbacher to as-
sure us that will always be the case.

Costs for this program are still not under control. Despite assur-
ances  that  the  program  was  adhering  to  its  $12.5  billion  life  cycle
cost estimate, GAO believes that we can expect another increase of
$1.1 billion. Some $300 million represents the cost of recovery from
the problems with the VIIRS1 and CrIS2 sensors last year.

Technical  problems  are  still  not  resolved.  A  week  ago  today
NOAA  informed  us  that  some  of  the  screw  heads  on  the  VIIRS  in-
strument were found to be sheared off as it was being prepared for
testing.  Early  indications  are  that  the  posts  into  which  the  screws
are  driven  were  improperly  made.  In  the  worst  case,  the  VIIRS
unit will have to be completely disassembled to replace all of these
so-called  ‘‘jack  posts.’’  Doing  so  will  mean  yet  another  delay  in
launching the NPP precursor mission. While NOAA hopes that this
won’t  be  required,  the  history  of  VIIRS  argues  that  the  worst  case
is only half as bad as what will finally come to pass.

This is not the situation we hoped to be in at this point in time.
The  Executive  Committee  must  expeditiously  make  decisions  and
act  to  resolve  these  problems.  The  risk  of  a  data  gap  is  growing
along with the cost of this program. This Committee wants to know
how  these  problems  are  going  to  be  resolved  and  when  we  can  ex-
pect some good news.

1 Visible Infrared Imaging Radiometer Suite
2 Cross-Track Infrared Sounder

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

9

I  welcome  back  our  witnesses,  Mr.  Powner  and  Admiral
Lautenbacher, for whom this is familiar ground, and recognize Mr.
Inglis for his opening statement.

[The prepared statement of Chairman Lampson follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHAIRMAN NICK LAMPSON

Good morning. We once again meet to keep abreast of the National Polar-Orbiting
Operational  Environmental  Satellite  System.  When  launched,  NPOESS  will  be  the
primary  source  of  information  the  National  Weather  Service  uses  to  make  its  long-
range  forecasts.  Our  military  services  will  need  NPOESS  data  to  plan  operations
around the globe. This committee has given sustained attention to this program be-
cause it is so vital to our daily lives.

NPOESS  is  having  a  difficult  birth.  The  Government  Accountability  Office  once
more  has  to  report  that  instability  continues  to  beset  the  program.  Last  year  GAO
recommended  that  the  program  managers  needed  to  complete  the  basic  planning
and  management  documents  to  assure  that  everyone  understands  the  schedule,  ob-
jectives and resources. It’s a year later and GAO still has to recommend getting this
basic  task  done.  The  Under  Secretary  for  Defense  for  Acquisitions,  Logistics  and
Technology, Mr. John Young, has ordered these to be finished by the end of August
or  funding  will  be  cut  off.  Admiral  Lautenbacher  will  assure  us  most  strenuously
that this time the paperwork will get finished. I want to discuss that with him later.
I  would  like  to  have  had  Mr.  Young  here  to  talk  about  his  memorandum  and  his
views  on  the  management  of  the  NPOESS  program.  Unfortunately,  it  wasn’t  until
last  week  that  we  knew  it  had  been  issued.  I  hope  Admiral  Lautenbacher  will  ex-
plain  why  a  memo  he  received  in  May  did  not  reach  us  until  June,  and  then  from
GAO.  This  committee,  under  both  Democratic  and  Republican  leadership,  has  done
its  utmost  to  assist  NOAA  in  keeping  this  program  on  track.  The  Committee  has
always  expected  to  be  kept  fully  and  completely  informed  and  I  expect  Admiral
Lautenbacher to assure us that will always be the case.

Costs  for  this  program  are  still  not  under  control.  Despite  assurances  that  the
program was adhering to its $12.5 billion life cycle cost estimate, GAO believes that
we can expect another increase of $1.1 billion. Some $300 million represents the cost
of recovery from the problems with the VIIRS and CrIS sensors last year.

Technical  problems  are  still  not  resolved.  A  week  ago  today  NOAA  informed  us
that  some  of  the  screw  heads  on  the  VIIRS  instrument  were  found  to  be  sheared
off  as  it  was  being  prepared  for  testing.  Early  indications  are  that  the  posts  into
which  the  screws  are  driven  were  improperly  made.  In  the  worst  case,  the  VIIRS
unit  will  have  to  be  completely  disassembled  to  replace  all  of  these  so-called  ‘‘jack
posts.’’  Doing  so  will  mean  yet  another  delay  in  launching  the  NPP  precursor  mis-
sion.  While  NOAA  hopes  that  this  won’t  be  required,  the  history  of  VIIRS  argues
that the worst case is only half as bad as what will finally come to pass.

This  is  not  the  situation  we  hoped  to  be  in  at  this  point  in  time.  I  have  grave
concerns  about  this  program.  The  Executive  Committee  must  expeditiously  make
decisions and act to resolve these problems. The risk of a data gap is growing along
with  the  cost  of  this  program.  This  committee  wants  to  know  how  these  problems
are going to be resolved and when we can expect some good news.

I  welcome  back  our  witnesses,  Mr.  Powner  and  Admiral  Lautenbacher,  for  whom

this is familiar ground, and recognize Mr. Inglis for his opening statement.

Mr.  INGLIS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Thank  you  for  holding
this  hearing  about  the  National  Polar-Orbiting  Operational  Envi-
ronmental Satellite System, NPOESS. This hearing continues close
oversight  of  this  vital  weather  satellite  program,  oversight  that
started  under  Republican  leadership  of  this  committee.  Last  June
we  met  to  discuss  a  GAO  report’s  finding  on  the  progress  of  the
NPOESS  program.  Mr.  Powner,  you  were  here  to  present  that  re-
port  one  year  ago,  and  now  you  are  back  again  with  additional
findings.  This  feels  almost  like  satellite  club  reunion,  I  suppose.
But  in  June  of  2007,  it  seemed  that  the  program  was  on  track
under  the  new  plan.  However,  given  the  significant  changes  that
were being made to the capability of the system, I and many of my
colleagues  stressed  that  close  oversight  had  to  continue  or  the  re-
percussions  would  be  costly.  And  we  are  here  again,  and  again  we

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

10

are  stressing  the  importance  of  oversight  and  rightly  so  I  think.
Things  are  less  at  ease  than  they  were  last  year.  Costly  is  a  good
word  to  describe  the  progress  of  the  program  over  the  past  12
months. $12.5 billion was NPOESS’s price tag in June 2007. Today
it is $13.6 billion, and there is another increase looming on the ho-
rizon.

The Department of Defense has already announced that if major
management  documents  are  not  finalized  by  September,  DOD  will
remove  funding.  If  that  happens,  the  Department  of  Commerce
would be forced to follow suit and remove funding as well. This loss
of funding would mean a significant setback in the investment and
progress of the NPOESS program.

It  is  said  that  NPOESS  is  the  most  complex  environmental  sat-
ellite system ever deployed, and given what we have gone through
in  this  committee  alone  in  the  past  few  years,  I  believe  it.  I  also
believe  that  all  of  us  involved—Congress,  NOAA,  the  Air  Force,
and NASA—have a vested interest in making sure that the system
succeeds  despite  the  complexities.  NPOESS  holds  the  complexities
for  advanced  climate  and  weather  sensing  which,  even  in  light  of
the cost, can mean great benefits for our country and for the world.
NPOESS today is a $13.6 billion program. That is a lot of taxpayer
money.  We  need  weather  satellites  that  are  launched  on  time  and
to  provide  data  that  informs  everything  from  decisions  about  our
military troop operations to forecasting the path of hurricanes.

Thank  you  again,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  look  forward  to  hearing  from

our witnesses.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Inglis follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE BOB INGLIS

Good morning. Thank you, Chairman Lampson, for holding this hearing about the
National Polar-orbiting Operational Environmental Satellite System, NPOESS. This
hearing  continues  close  oversight  of  this  vital  weather  satellite  program,  oversight
that started under Republican leadership of this committee.

Last  June,  we  met  to  discuss  a  GAO  report’s  findings  on  the  progress  of  the
NPOESS  program.  Mr.  Powner,  you  were  here  to  present  that  report  one  year  ago,
and  now  you’re  back  again  with  additional  findings—this  feels  almost  like  a  Sat-
ellite club reunion!

In June 2007, it seemed that the program was on track under the new plan. How-
ever, given that significant changes were being made to the capability of the system,
I,  and  many  of  my  colleagues,  stressed  that  close  oversight  had  to  continue,  or  the
repercussions would be costly.

And we’re here again, and again we’re stressing the importance of oversight. And
rightly  so,  I  think.  Things  are  less  ‘‘at  ease’’  then  they  were  last  year.  ‘‘Costly’’  is
a good word to use to describe the progress of the program over the past 12 months.
$12.5 billion was the NPOESS price tag in June 2007. Today, it’s $13.6 billion. And
there’s another increase looming on the horizon. The Department of Defense has re-
cently  announced  that  if  major  management  documents  are  not  finalized  by  Sep-
tember,  DOD  will  remove  funding.  If  that  happens,  the  Department  of  Commerce
would  be  forced  to  follow  suit  and  remove  funding  as  well.  This  loss  of  funding
would  mean  a  significant  setback  in  the  investment  and  progress  of  the  NPOESS
program.

It  is  said  NPOESS  is  ‘‘the  most  complex  environmental  satellite  system  ever  de-
veloped,’’  and  given  what  we’ve  gone  through  in  this  committee  alone  in  the  past
few  years,  I  believe  it.  I  also  believe  that  all  of  us  involved,  Congress,  NOAA,  the
Air  Force,  and  NASA  have  a  vested  interest  in  making  sure  that  the  system  suc-
ceeds,  despite  the  complexities.  NPOESS  holds  the  capability  for  advanced  climate
and  weather  sensing,  which,  even  in  light  of  the  cost,  can  mean  great  benefits  for
our country and the world.

NPOESS  today  is  a  $13.6  billion  program.  That  is  a  lot  of  taxpayer  money.  We
need  weather  satellites  that  are  launched  on  time  and  that  provide  data  that  in-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

11

forms  everything  from  decisions  about  our  military  troop  operations  to  forecasting
the path of hurricanes.

Thank  you  again,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  our  wit-

nesses.

Chairman  LAMPSON.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Inglis.  I  ask  unanimous
consent  that  all  additional  opening  statements  submitted  by  Com-
mittee Members be included in the record. Without objection, so or-
dered.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Costello follows:

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE JERRY F. COSTELLO

Thank you, Mr. Chairman, for holding this hearing today, as this is an important
opportunity to follow-up on our hearing from last year and to learn more about the
National Polar-Orbiting Operational Environmental Satellite System (NPOESS).

I  look  forward  to  hearing  a  status  update  from  Admiral  Lautenbacher  and  Mr.
Powner,  as  the  program  is  fundamental  to  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric
Administration’s (NOAA) weather missions.

As  Chairman  of  the  Transportation  Subcommittee  on  Aviation,  I  am  particularly
aware  of  the  contribution  that  NOAA  makes  to  the  safety  of  our  environment,  par-
ticularly to aviation travel. Although questions have been raised about the stability
of the NPOESS, it is my hope that this hearing will help guide the program in the
right direction and answer any lingering administrative questions.

Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and I yield back the remainder of my time.
Chairman LAMPSON. It is my pleasure to introduce our witnesses
this  morning.  Mr.  David  Powner  is  the  Director  for  Information
Technology  Management  Issues  at  the  Government  Accountability
Office.  Vice  Admiral  Conrad  Lautenbacher  is  the  Under  Secretary
for Oceans and Atmosphere and Administrator of the National Oce-
anic  and  Atmospheric  Administration.  And  I  might  add  at  this
point,  yesterday  I  was  at  the  Partnership  for  Public  Service  and
witnessed  a  couple  of  your  folks  receiving  some  very  nice  public
service awards. One of them happened to have been a classmate of
mine from college, Dr. Eddie Beaumont, and it was a real pleasure
seeing  him  but  more  importantly,  knowing  what  he  has  accom-
plished for our country. Very impressed.

You will each have five minutes for your spoken testimony. Your
written  testimony  will  be  included  in  the  record  for  the  hearing.
When  you  all  complete  your  testimony,  we  will  begin  with  ques-
tions.  Each  Member  will  have  five  minutes  to  question  the  panel,
and Mr. Powner, you may begin.

STATEMENT OF MR. DAVID A. POWNER, DIRECTOR, INFORMA-
TION  TECHNOLOGY  MANAGEMENT  ISSUES,  GOVERNMENT
ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE
Mr.  POWNER.  Chairman  Lampson,  Ranking  Member  Inglis,  and
Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  we  appreciate  the  opportunity  to
testify on our latest NPOESS report being released today.

This  morning  I  will  briefly  address  three  areas:  first,  the  status
of  NPOESS’s  restructuring  which  is  taking  too  long  to  complete
and  now  raises  serious  questions  about  DOD’s  commitment  to  and
funding  of  the  program;  second,  key  risk  areas  and  their  potential
cost implications which will at least add $1 billion to NPOESS’s life
cycle costs; and third, the need for long-term strategy to restore cli-
mate and space sensors that were removed from the NPOESS pro-
gram as part of the June 2006 restructuring.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

12

Before  discussing  these  three  points,  I  would  like  to  highlight
NPOESS’s  progress  in  several  areas.  The  program  has  redefined
deliverables,  cost,  and  schedules  and  renegotiated  the  contract,
made  significant  progress  in  completing  development  and  testing
activities  associated  with  spacecraft  sensors  and  ground  systems,
and  it  continues  to  improve  its  management  of  the  contractor  and
program risks.

Last May when we testified before you, Mr. Chairman, we raised
serious concerns about interagency coordination because key acqui-
sition  documents  were  not  signed  by  their  September  2006  due
date following the Nunn-McCurdy restructuring. We highlighted at
that  time  the  urgency  in  signing  these  documents  to  ensure  inter-
agency agreements. Although some documents have been finalized,
agency executives have yet to finalize several key documents need-
ed  to  effectively  manage  this  tri-agency  program,  including  the  ac-
quisition  program  baseline  and  a  critical  plan  for  how  the  Euro-
pean satellite data will be used with NPOESS. Now DOD has stat-
ed it will not release fiscal year 2009 funds to the program if these
documents  are  not  finalized  by  the  end  of  August.  On  the  surface,
DOD’s  threat  appears  to  be  a  good  thing,  given  that  the  new  Au-
gust deadline is now nearly two years later than the original dead-
line. However, DOD is equally at fault here since most of the docu-
ments in question are currently at DOD awaiting approval.

Mr.  Chairman,  such  delays,  threats,  and  lack  of  leadership  and
cooperation  are  unacceptable.  It  is  time  for  the  NPOESS  EXCOM3
members  to  step  up,  get  these  documents  finalized  to  ensure  key
interagency  agreements  and  to  not  risk  any  funding  implications.
Regarding key risks and potential cost implications, key risk areas
that concern us the most are the technical sensor risks, changes to
the  security  approach,  and  the  uncertainty  of  operations  and  sup-
port  costs.  Poor  workmanship  and  delays  caused  an  eight-month
slip  in  the  delivery  of  VIIRS  which  caused  a  corresponding  eight-
month  slip  in  the  launch  of  NPOESS’s  demonstration  satellite,
NPP.

The  CrIS  sensor  has  also  experienced  cost  overruns  and  sched-
uling delays, but VIIRS continues to be the program’s largest ques-
tion  mark.  It  is  complex,  continues  to  experience  problems  in  test-
ing,  and  is  clearly  the  most  concerning  aspect  of  this  acquisition.
The program estimates that it will cost at least an additional $300
million to fix these known technical sensor issues.

Turning  to  security,  the  program  is  considering  raising  the  level
of  security  measures  associated  with  NPOESS’s  ground  stations.
The program has been looking at these options but has yet to final-
ize,  release  its  findings,  or  agree  to  a  final  approach.  Building  in
security  late  in  the  development  cycle  will  be  costly  regarding  the
operations  and  support  costs.  Following  the  Nunn-McCurdy  deci-
sion,  the  operations  and  support  costs  were  estimated  to  be  about
a billion dollars. Now, both the program office and DOD’s cost anal-
ysis group are refining the estimate which we expect to be at least
$800 million higher. Therefore, between the technical sensor issues,
increasing security controls, and having a more realistic operations
and support estimate, we expect the $12.5 billion life cycle cost es-

3 Executive Committee

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

13

timate  to  increase  at  least  $1  billion  but  would  not  be  surprised  if
the revised life cycle cost estimate approaches $14 billion.

Finally,  Mr.  Chairman,  some  progress  has  been  made  in  restor-
ing selected climate and space sensors that were removed to reduce
risk  and  cost  during  the  Nunn-McCurdy  decision.  Specifically,  two
sensors  are  being  placed  on  NPP  and  one  will  now  go  on  the  first
NPOESS  satellite  known  as  C–1.  These  will  both  help  with  short-
term  needs.  In  addition,  options  for  restoring  these  sensors  have
been studied. Now decisions need to be made and plans need to be
developed  for  longer-term  continuity  of  climate  and  space  sensors.
The Office of Science and Technology Policy has been working with
the  three  agencies,  but  there  is  no  firm  commitment  when  such  a
plan would be developed. Accordingly, we recommended that a plan
be developed to ensure that there are no gaps in critical space, en-
vironmental, and climate observations.

In  summary,  Mr.  Chairman,  the  NPOESS  program  needs  to  fi-
nalize  the  acquisition  documents,  revise  its  life  cycle  cost  estimate
given the expected increases associated with sensors, security, and
operations  and  support;  and  on  a  broader  scale,  our  nation  is  in
need of a plan to address long-term continuity of climate and space
observations.

This concludes my statement. Thank you for your leadership and

oversight of this critical program.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Powner follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DAVID A. POWNER

Environmental Satellites

Polar-orbiting  Satellite  Acquisition  Faces  Delays;  Decisions
Needed on Whether and How to Ensure Climate Data Con-
tinuity

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Subcommittee:

We  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  participate  in  today’s  hearing  to  discuss  our
work  on  the  $12.5  billion  National  Polar-orbiting  Operational  Environmental  Sat-
ellite System (NPOESS) program. NPOESS is expected to be a state-of-the-art, envi-
ronment-monitoring satellite system that will replace two existing polar-orbiting en-
vironmental  satellite  systems.  Polar-orbiting  satellites  provide  data  and  imagery
that  are  used  by  weather  forecasters,  climatologists,  and  the  military  to  map  and
monitor  changes  in  weather,  climate,  the  oceans,  and  the  environment.  The
NPOESS program is considered critical to the United States’ ability to maintain the
continuity of data required for weather forecasting (including severe weather events
such as hurricanes) and global climate monitoring through the year 2026.

Three  agencies  share  responsibility  for  the  NPOESS  program:  the  Department  of
Commerce’s National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA), the Depart-
ment  of  Defense  (DOD)/United  States  Air  Force,  and  the  National  Aeronautics  and
Space Administration (NASA). To manage the NPOESS program, these agencies es-
tablished  a  tri-agency  integrated  program  office.  In  recent  years,  the  program  has
experienced escalating costs, schedule delays, and technical difficulties, which led to
a June 2006 decision to restructure it. This decision decreased the complexity of the
program  by  reducing  the  number  of  satellites  and  sensors,  increased  the  estimated
cost  of  the  program  to  $12.5  billion,  and  delayed  the  launches  of  the  first  two  sat-
ellites by three and five years, respectively.

As requested, this statement summarizes our report being released today that (1)
evaluates the NPOESS program office’s progress in restructuring the acquisition, (2)
assesses the status of key program components and risks, (3) and assesses NASA’s,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

14

NOAA’s,  and  DOD’s  plans  for  obtaining  the  environmental  data  originally  planned
to be collected by NPOESS sensors, but then eliminated by the restructuring.1

In  preparing  this  testimony,  we  relied  on  our  work  supporting  the  accompanying
report.  That  report  contains  a  detailed  overview  of  our  scope  and  methodology.  In
addition,  we  updated  factual  information  on  sensors  and  due  dates  as  warranted.
All  the  work  on  which  this  testimony  is  based  was  performed  in  accordance  with
generally accepted government auditing standards.

Results in Brief

The NPOESS program office has completed most of the major activities associated
with restructuring the acquisition, but key activities remain to be completed. In the
past  year,  the  program  redefined  the  program’s  deliverables,  costs,  and  schedules,
and  renegotiated  the  NPOESS  contract.  However,  agency  executives  have  not  yet
finalized  selected  acquisition  documents,  including  the  tri-agency  memorandum  of
agreement  and  the  acquisition  program  baseline.  In  April  2007,  we  reported  that
key acquisition documents were already over six months late and recommended that
agency officials complete them immediately.2 Agency officials subsequently extended
the due dates of the documents. Moreover, although DOD has had a role in delaying
their  completion,  the  Department  has  stated  it  would  not  release  fiscal  year  2009
funds  to  the  NPOESS  program  if  key  acquisition  documents  are  not  completed  by
August  2008.  Without  executive  approval  of  the  memorandum  of  agreement  and
other key documents, the program lacks the underlying commitment needed to effec-
tively  manage  a  tri-agency  program.  In  addition,  given  DOD’s  recent  instructions,
any further delays in completing these documents could affect the program’s funding
and schedule.

In the past year, the NPOESS program has made progress in completing develop-
ment and testing activities associated with the spacecraft, sensors, and ground sys-
tems.  However,  key  milestones  have  been  delayed  and  multiple  risks  remain.  Spe-
cifically, poor workmanship and testing delays caused an eight-month slip in the de-
livery  of  a  complex  imaging  sensor  called  the  Visible/infrared  imager  radiometer
suite.  This  late  delivery  caused  a  corresponding  eight-month  delay  in  the  expected
launch  date  of  the  NPOESS  Preparatory  Project  demonstration  satellite,  moving  it
from  late  September  2009  to  early  June  2010.  Any  delay  in  this  launch  date  short-
ens  the  time  available  for  identifying  lessons  learned  from  the  demonstration  sat-
ellite  while  it  is  in  orbit  and  incorporating  these  lessons  in  the  development  of  the
first  NPOESS  satellite.  Such  delays  could  also  lead  to  gaps  in  weather  and  climate
data  continuity  if  existing  satellites  begin  to  degrade  or  fail.  Moving  forward,  risks
remain in completing the testing of key sensors and integrating them on the space-
craft, resolving interagency disagreements about the appropriate level of system se-
curity, and revising outdated operations and support cost estimates—which program
officials say could increase the life cycle cost by about $1 billion. The program office
is aware of these risks and is working to mitigate them, but these issues could affect
the program’s overall schedule and cost.

When the NPOESS restructuring agreement removed four climate and space envi-
ronment  sensors  from  the  program  and  degraded  four  others,  it  led  NASA,  NOAA,
and DOD to reassess their priorities and options for obtaining climate and space en-
vironment data. Since the June 2006 restructuring decision, the three agencies have
taken  preliminary  steps  to  restore  the  capabilities  of  selected  climate  and  space
weather  sensors  that  were  removed  from  the  NPOESS  program  by  prioritizing  the
sensors,  assessing  options  for  restoring  them,  and  making  decisions  to  mitigate
near-term data continuity needs by restoring two sensors to the demonstration sat-
ellite and one sensor to the first NPOESS satellite. However, the agencies have not
yet developed plans on whether and how to ensure climate and space weather data
on  a  long-term  basis  as  no  plans  have  been  made  for  sensors  or  satellites  after  the
first satellite of the program. Until such a plan is developed, the agencies may lose
their  windows  of  opportunity  for  selecting  cost-effective  options  or  they  may  resort
to  an  ad  hoc  approach  to  restoring  these  sensors.  Almost  two  years  have  passed
since key sensors were removed from the NPOESS program; further delays in estab-
lishing a plan could result in gaps in the continuity of climate and space data.

In  our  report,  we  made  recommendations  to  all  three  agencies  to  establish  plans
on  whether  and  how  to  restore  the  climate  and  space  sensors  removed  from  the
NPOESS program by June 2009, in cases where the sensors are warranted and jus-

1 GAO,  Environmental  Satellites:  Polar-orbiting  Satellite  Acquisition  Faces  Delay;  Decisions
Needed  on  Whether  and  How  to  Ensure  Climate  Data  Continuity,  GAO–08–518  (Washington,
D.C.: May 16, 2008).

2 GAO,  Polar-orbiting  Operational  Environmental  Satellites:  Restructuring  is  Under  Way,  but

Technical Challenges and Risks Remain, GAO–07–498 (Washington, D.C.: April 27, 2007).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

15

tified.  In  addition,  we  also  reemphasized  a  recommendation  made  in  our  prior  re-
port3 that the appropriate NASA, NOAA, and DOD executives immediately finalize
key  acquisition  documents.  All  three  agencies  concurred  with  these  recommenda-
tions.

Background

Since  the  1960s,  the  United  States  has  operated  two  separate  operational  polar-
orbiting  meteorological  satellite  systems:  the  Polar-orbiting  Operational  Environ-
mental  Satellite  (POES)  series—managed  by  NOAA—and  the  Defense  Meteorolog-
ical  Satellite  Program  (DMSP)—managed  by  the  Air  Force.  These  satellites  obtain
environmental data that are processed to provide graphical weather images and spe-
cialized weather products—including both terrestrial and space weather. These sat-
ellite  data  are  also  the  predominant  input  to  numerical  weather  prediction  models,
which  are  a  primary  tool  for  forecasting  weather  three  or  more  days  in  advance—
including  forecasting  the  path  and  intensity  of  hurricanes.  The  weather  products
and models are used to predict the potential impact of severe weather so that com-
munities and emergency managers can help prevent and mitigate their effects. Polar
satellites  also  provide  data  used  to  monitor  environmental  phenomena,  such  as
ozone  depletion  and  drought  conditions,  as  well  as  data  sets  that  are  used  by  re-
searchers for a variety of studies such as climate monitoring.

NPOESS Overview

With  the  expectation  that  combining  the  POES  and  DMSP  programs  would  re-
duce  duplication  and  result  in  sizable  cost  savings,  a  May  1994  Presidential  Deci-
sion Directive required NOAA and DOD to converge the two satellite programs into
a  single  satellite  program  capable  of  satisfying  both  civilian  and  military  require-
ments.4 The  converged  program,  NPOESS,  is  considered  critical  to  the  United
States’  ability  to  maintain  the  continuity  of  data  required  for  weather  forecasting
and  global  climate  monitoring  through  the  year  2026.  To  manage  this  program,
DOD,  NOAA,  and  NASA  formed  the  tri-agency  Integrated  Program  Office,  located
within NOAA.

Within  the  program  office,  each  agency  has  the  lead  on  certain  activities:  NOAA
has  overall  program  management  responsibility  for  the  converged  system  and  for
satellite  operations;  DOD  has  the  lead  on  the  acquisition;  and  NASA  has  primary
responsibility for facilitating the development and incorporation of new technologies
into  the  converged  system.  NOAA  and  DOD  share  the  costs  of  funding  NPOESS,
while  NASA  funds  specific  technology  projects  and  studies.  The  NPOESS  program
office is overseen by an Executive Committee, which is made up of the Administra-
tors of NOAA and NASA and the Under Secretary of the Air Force.

NPOESS is a major system acquisition that was originally estimated to cost about
$6.5  billion  over  the  24-year  life  of  the  program  from  its  inception  in  1995  through
2018.  The  program  is  to  provide  satellite  development,  satellite  launch  and  oper-
ation,  and  ground-based  satellite  data  processing.  These  deliverables  are  grouped
into  four  main  categories:  (1)  the  space  segment,  which  includes  the  satellites  and
sensors;  (2)  the  integrated  data  processing  segment,  which  is  the  system  for  trans-
forming raw data into environmental data records (EDR) and is to be located at four
data  processing  centers;  (3)  the  command,  control,  and  communications  segment,
which  includes  the  equipment  and  services  needed  to  support  satellite  operations;
and (4) the launch segment, which includes launch vehicle services.

When  the  NPOESS  engineering,  manufacturing,  and  development  contract  was
awarded  in  August  2002,  the  cost  estimate  was  adjusted  to  $7  billion.  Acquisition
plans called for the procurement and launch of six satellites over the life of the pro-
gram,  as  well  as  the  integration  of  13  instruments—consisting  of  10  environmental
sensors  and  three  subsystems.  Together,  the  sensors  were  to  receive  and  transmit
data on atmospheric, cloud cover, environmental, climatic, oceanographic, and solar-
geophysical observations. The subsystems were to support non-environmental search
and rescue efforts, sensor survivability, and environmental data collection activities.
The program office considered four of the sensors to be critical because they provide
data for key weather products; these sensors are in bold in Table 1, which describes
each of the expected NPOESS instruments.

3 GAO–07–498
4 Presidential Decision Directive NSTC–2, May 5, 1994.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

16

In  addition,  a  demonstration  satellite,  called  the  NPOESS  Preparatory  Project
(NPP),  was  planned  to  be  launched  several  years  before  the  first  NPOESS  satellite
in  order  to  reduce  the  risk  associated  with  launching  new  sensor  technologies  and
to ensure continuity of climate data with NASA’s Earth Observing System satellites.
NPP  was  to  host  three  of  the  four  critical  NPOESS  sensors,  as  well  as  one  other
noncritical  sensor  and  to  provide  the  program  office  and  the  processing  centers  an
early opportunity to work with the sensors, ground control, and data processing sys-
tems.5

When  the  NPOESS  development  contract  was  awarded,  the  schedule  for  launch-
ing  the  satellites  was  driven  by  a  requirement  that  the  satellites  be  available  to
back  up  the  final  POES  and  DMSP  satellites  should  anything  go  wrong  during  the
planned  launches  of  these  satellites.  Early  program  milestones  included  (1)  launch-
ing  NPP  by  May  2006,  (2)  having  the  first  NPOESS  satellite  available  to  back  up
the final POES satellite launch in March 2008, and (3) having the second NPOESS
satellite  available  to  back  up  the  final  DMSP  satellite  launch  in  October  2009.  If
the  NPOESS  satellites  were  not  needed  to  back  up  the  final  predecessor  satellites,
their  anticipated  launch  dates  would  have  been  April  2009  and  June  2011,  respec-
tively.

NPOESS Experienced Cost Increases, Schedule Delays, and Technical Prob-

lems That Led to Decision to Restructure the NPOESS Program

Over several years, we reported that NPOESS had experienced continued cost in-
creases,  schedule  delays,  and  serious  technical  problems.6 By  November  2005,  we
estimated that the cost of the program had grown from $7 billion to over $10 billion.
In addition, the program was experiencing major technical problems with the VIIRS
sensor  and  expected  to  delay  the  launch  date  of  the  first  satellite  by  almost  two
years. These issues ultimately required difficult decisions to be made about the pro-
gram’s  direction  and  capabilities.  The  Nunn-McCurdy  law  requires  DOD  to  take

5 The  four  sensors  are  the  Visible/infrared  imager  radiometer  suite,  the  Cross-track  infrared

sounder, the Advanced technology microwave sounder, and the Ozone mapper/profiler suite.

6 GAO, Polar-orbiting Operational Environmental Satellites: Cost Increases Trigger Review and
Place  Program’s  Direction  on  Hold,  GAO–06–573T  (Washington,  D.C.:  Mar.  30,  2006);  GAO,
Polar-orbiting  Operational  Environmental  Satellites:  Technical  Problems,  Cost  Increases,  and
Schedule  Delays  Trigger  Need  for  Difficult  Trade-off  Decisions,  GAO–06–249T  (Washington,
D.C.:  Nov.  16,  2005);  GAO,  Polar-orbiting  Environmental  Satellites:  Information  on  Program
Cost  and  Schedule  Changes,  GAO–04–1054  (Washington,  D.C.:  Sept.  30,  2004);  GAO,  Polar-or-
biting Environmental Satellites: Project Risks Could Affect Weather Data Needed by Civilian and
Military Users, GAO–03–987T (Washington, D.C.: July 15, 2003); and GAO, Polar-orbiting Envi-
ronmental  Satellites:  Status,  Plans,  and  Future  Data  Management  Challenges,  GAO–02–684T
(Washington, D.C.: July 24, 2002).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

17

specific  actions  when  a  major  defense  acquisition  program  cost  growth  exceeds  cer-
tain thresholds.7 The law requires the Secretary of Defense to notify Congress when
a major defense acquisition is expected to overrun its current baseline by 15 percent
or more and to certify the current program to Congress when it is expected to over-
run  its  baseline  by  25  percent  or  more.8 In  November  2005,  NPOESS  exceeded  the
25  percent  threshold,  and  DOD  was  required  to  certify  the  program.  Certifying  a
program  entails  providing  a  determination  that  (1)  the  program  is  essential  to  na-
tional  security,  (2)  there  are  no  alternatives  to  the  program  that  will  provide  equal
or  greater  military  capability  at  less  cost,  (3)  the  new  estimates  of  the  program’s
cost are reasonable, and (4) the management structure for the program is adequate
to  manage  and  control  costs.  DOD  established  tri-agency  teams—made  up  of  DOD,
NOAA, and NASA experts—to work on each of the four elements of the certification
process.

In  June  2006,  DOD  (with  the  agreement  of  both  of  its  partner  agencies)  certified
a  restructured  NPOESS  program,  estimated  to  cost  $12.5  billion  through  2026.9
This decision approved a cost increase of $4 billion over the prior approved baseline
cost  and  delayed  the  launch  of  NPP  and  the  first  two  satellites  by  roughly  three
to  five  years.  The  new  program  also  entailed  reducing  the  number  of  satellites  to
be produced and launched from six to four, and reducing the number of instruments
on the satellites from 13 to nine—consisting of seven environmental sensors and two
subsystems.  It  also  entailed  using  NPOESS  satellites  in  the  early  morning  and
afternoon  orbits  and  relying  on  European  satellites  for  mid-morning  orbit  data.10
Table  2  summarizes  the  major  program  changes  made  under  the  Nunn-McCurdy
certification decision.

The Nunn-McCurdy certification decision established new milestones for the deliv-
ery of key program elements, including launching NPP by January 2010, launching
the  first  NPOESS  satellite  by  January  2013,  and  launching  the  second  NPOESS
satellite  by  January  2016.  These  revised  milestones  deviated  from  prior  plans  to
have the first NPOESS satellite available to back up the final POES satellite should
anything go wrong during that launch.

7 10 U.S.C. § 2433 is commonly referred to as Nunn-McCurdy.
8 10  U.S.C.  § 2433  has  recently  been  amended  by  Pub.  L.  No.  109–163,  § 802  (Jan.  6,  2006)
and Pub. L. No. 109–364, § 213(a) (Oct. 17, 2006). The law now also includes cost growth thresh-
olds from the program’s original baseline.

9 DOD estimated that the acquisition portion of the certified program would cost $11.5 billion.
The  acquisition  portion  includes  satellite  development,  production,  and  launch,  but  not  oper-
ations  and  support  costs  after  launch.  When  combined  with  an  estimated  $1  billion  for  oper-
ations and support after launch, this brings the program life cycle cost to $12.5 billion.

10 The  European  Organization  for  the  Exploitation  of  Meteorological  Satellites’  MetOp  pro-
gram  is  a  series  of  three  polar-orbiting  satellites  dedicated  to  operational  meteorology.  MetOp
satellites are planned to be launched sequentially over 14 years. The first of these satellites was
launched in 2006 and is currently operational.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

18

Delaying  the  launch  of  the  first  NPOESS  satellite  meant  that  if  the  final  POES
satellite fails on launch, satellite data users would need to rely on the existing con-
stellation of environmental satellites until NPP data becomes available—almost two
years  later.  Although  NPP  was  not  intended  to  be  an  operational  asset,  NASA
agreed  to  move  NPP  to  a  different  orbit  so  that  its  data  would  be  available  in  the
event of a premature failure of the final POES satellite. If the health of the existing
constellation  of  satellites  diminishes—or  if  NPP  data  is  not  available,  timely,  and
reliable—there could be a gap in environmental satellite data.

In  order  to  reduce  program  complexity,  the  Nunn-McCurdy  certification  decision
decreased  the  number  of  NPOESS  sensors  from  13  to  nine  and  reduced  the
functionality of four sensors. Specifically, of the 13 original sensors, five sensors re-
main  unchanged  (but  two  are  on  a  reduced  number  of  satellites),  three  were  re-
placed  with  older  or  less  capable  sensors,  one  was  modified  to  provide  less
functionality,  and  four  were  canceled.  The  certification  decision  also  made  allow-
ances for the reintegration of the canceled sensors. Specifically, the program was di-
rected  to  build  each  NPOESS  spacecraft  with  enough  room  and  power  to  accommo-
date  the  sensors  that  were  removed  from  the  program  and  to  fund  the  integration
and  testing  of  any  sensors  that  are  later  restored.  Agency  sponsors  external  to  the
program  would  be  responsible  for  justifying  and  funding  the  sensor’s  development,
while  the  NPOESS  Executive  Committee  would  have  the  final  decision  on  whether
to  include  the  sensor  on  a  specific  satellite.  Table  3  identifies  the  changes  to  the
NPOESS instruments.

The changes in NPOESS sensors affected the number and quality of the resulting
weather  and  environmental  products,  called  environmental  data  records  (EDR).  In
selecting  sensors  for  the  restructured  program  during  the  Nunn-McCurdy  process,
decision-makers  placed  the  highest  priority  on  continuing  current  operational
weather  capabilities  and  a  lower  priority  on  obtaining  selected  environmental  and
climate measuring capabilities. As a result, the revised NPOESS system has signifi-
cantly  less  capability  for  providing  global  climate  measures  than  was  originally
planned.  Specifically,  the  number  of  EDRs  was  decreased  from  55  to  39,  of  which
six  are  of  a  reduced  quality.  The  39  EDRs  that  remain  include  cloud  base  height,
land  surface  temperature,  precipitation  type  and  rate,  and  sea  surface  winds.  The
16 EDRs that were removed include cloud particle size and distribution, sea surface
height,  net  solar  radiation  at  the  top  of  the  atmosphere,  and  products  to  depict  the
electric fields in the space environment. The six EDRs that are of a reduced quality
include  ozone  profile,  soil  moisture,  and  multiple  products  depicting  energy  in  the
space environment.

Major  Restructuring  Activities  Have  Been  Completed,  but  Key  Remaining

Activities Could Affect Funding and Schedule

The  program  office  has  completed  major  activities  associated  with  restructuring
NPOESS, but key supporting activities remain—including obtaining approval of key
acquisition  documents—and  delays  in  completing  these  activities  could  affect  the
program’s  funding  and  schedule.  Restructuring  a  major  acquisition  program  like
NPOESS  is  a  process  that  involves  reassessing  and  redefining  the  program’s

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

19

deliverables, costs, and schedules, and renegotiating the contract. The restructuring
process also involves revising important acquisition documents such as the tri-agen-
cy  memorandum  of  agreement,  the  acquisition  strategy,  the  system  engineering
plan,  the  integrated  master  schedule  defining  what  needs  to  happen  by  when,  and
the  acquisition  program  baseline.  In  April  2007,  we  reported  that  the  key  acquisi-
tion  documents  were  over  six  months  late  from  their  original  September  2006  due
date,  and  we  recommended  that  the  appropriate  executives  immediately  finalize
them.11 This recommendation has not yet been addressed and agency officials subse-
quently extended the due dates of the documents to September 2007.

During the past year, the program redefined the program’s deliverables, costs, and
schedules, and renegotiated the NPOESS contract. To do so, the program developed
a new program plan and conducted an integrated baseline review of the entire pro-
gram, which validated that the new deliverables, costs, and schedules were feasible.
It  also  completed  key  acquisition  documents  including  the  system  engineering  plan
and  the  integrated  master  schedule.  The  program  and  the  prime  contractor  signed
a modified contract in July 2007.

However, key activities remain to be completed, including obtaining executive ap-
proval  of  key  acquisition  documents.  Specifically,  even  though  agency  officials  were
expected to approve key acquisition documents by September 2007, the appropriate
executives  have  not  yet  signed  off  on  documents  including  the  tri-agency  memo-
randum  of  agreement  or  the  acquisition  strategy  report.  They  have  also  not  signed
off on the acquisition program baseline, the fee management plan, the test and eval-
uation master plan, and the two-orbit program plan (a plan for how to use European
satellite data with NPOESS).

Program  officials  stated  that  the  program  has  been  able  to  renegotiate  the  con-
tract  and  to  proceed  in  developing  sensors  and  systems  without  these  documents
being  signed  because  the  documents  have  widespread  acceptance  within  the  three
agencies. They reported that the delays are largely due to the complexity of obtain-
ing  approval  from  three  agencies.  For  example,  program  officials  reported  that  an
organization  within  DOD  suggested  minor  changes  to  the  tri-agency  memorandum
of  agreement  after  months  of  coordination  and  after  it  had  already  been  signed  by
both the Secretary of Commerce and the Administrator of NASA. Further, after this
issue  was  resolved,  a  senior  official  at  DOD  requested  another  change  to  the  docu-
ment.  The  program  office  has  now  made  the  recommended  changes  and  is  re-initi-
ating the coordination process.

More  recently,  in  April  2008,  DOD  moved  the  due  dates  for  all  of  the  acquisition
documents  other  than  the  memorandum  of  agreement  and  fee  management  plan
from September 2007 to August 31, 2008. (See Appendix I for the history of the due
dates  and  status  of  each  document).  In  addition,  even  though  DOD  has  had  a  role
in  delaying  these  documents,  the  Department  has  stated  it  would  not  release  fiscal
year  2009  funds  to  the  program  if  these  acquisition  documents  are  not  completed
by  the  new  due  date.  Without  executive  approval  of  key  acquisition  documents,  the
program  lacks  the  underlying  commitment  necessary  to  effectively  manage  a  tri-
agency  program.  In  addition,  given  DOD’s  newest  instructions,  any  further  delays
in  completing  these  acquisition  documents  could  affect  the  program’s  funding  and
schedule.

Program  Has  Made  Progress,  but  Key  Milestones  Have  Been  Delayed  and

Risks Remain

Over  the  last  year,  the  NPOESS  program  has  made  progress  by  completing
planned  development  and  testing  activities  on  its  ground  and  space  segments,  but
key  milestones  for  delivering  the  VIIRS  sensor  and  launching  NPP  have  been  de-
layed  by  about  eight  months.  Moving  forward,  risks  remain  in  completing  the  test-
ing  of  key  sensors  and  integrating  them  on  the  NPP  spacecraft,  in  resolving  inter-
agency  disagreements  on  the  appropriate  level  of  system  security,  and  in  revising
estimated  costs  for  satellite  operations  and  support.  The  program  office  is  aware  of
these  risks  and  is  working  to  mitigate  them,  but  continued  problems  could  affect
the program’s overall schedule and cost. Given the tight time frames for completing
key sensors, integrating them on the NPP spacecraft, and getting the ground-based
data  processing  system  developed,  tested,  and  deployed,  it  is  important  for  the
NPOESS  Integrated  Program  Office,  the  Program  Executive  Office,  and  the  Execu-
tive Committee to continue to provide close oversight of milestones and risks.

11 GAO–07–498.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

20

Ground Segment—Progress Made but Important Work Remains to Be Done
Development of the ground segment—which includes the interface data processing
system, the ground stations that are to receive satellite data, and the ground-based
command, control, and communications system—is under way and on track. For ex-
ample,  the  Interface  Data  Processing  System  has  been  installed  at  one  of  the  two
locations that are to receive NPP data, and the command, control, and communica-
tions system passed acceptance testing for use with NPP. However, important work
in  developing  the  algorithms  that  translate  satellite  data  into  weather  products
within the integrated data processing segment remains to be completed. Table 4 de-
scribes  each  of  the  components  of  the  ground  segment  and  identifies  the  program-
provided risk level and status of each.

Space  Segment—Progress  Made,  but  One  Sensor  Was  Delayed  and  Sensors

Continue to Face Risks

Over  the  past  year,  the  program  made  progress  on  the  development  of  the  space
segment,  which  includes  the  sensors  and  the  spacecraft.  Five  sensors  are  of  critical
importance  because  they  are  to  be  launched  on  the  NPP  satellite.12 Initiating  work
on  another  sensor,  the  Microwave  Imager  Sounder,  is  also  important  because  this
new  sensor—which  is  to  replace  the  canceled  Conical-scanned  microwave  imager/
sounder sensor—will need to be developed in time for the second NPOESS satellite
launch.  Among  other  activities,  the  program  has  successfully  completed  vibration
testing  of  the  flight  unit  of  the  Cross-track  infrared  sounder  (CrIS),  a  major  pre-
environmental testing review for the VIIRS instrument, integration and risk reduc-
tion testing of the flight unit of the Ozone mapper/profiler suite, and thermal testing
of the NPP spacecraft with three sensors on board.13 In addition, the program made
decisions  on  how  to  proceed  with  the  Microwave  imager  sounder  and  recently
awarded a contract to a government laboratory for its development.

However,  the  program  experienced  problems  on  VIIRS,  including  poor  workman-
ship on selected subcomponents and delays in completing key tests. These issues de-
layed VIIRS delivery to the NPP contractor by eight months. This late delivery will
in  turn  delay  the  satellite’s  launch  from  late  September  2009  to  early  June  2010.

12 NPP is to include the Visible/infrared imager radiometer suite, Cross-track infrared sound-
er,  Advanced  technology  microwave  sounder,  Ozone  mapper/profiler  suite  (nadir  and  limb),  and
the Clouds and the Earth’s radiant energy system.

13 The  three  sensors  included  the  flight  unit  for  the  Advanced  technology  microwave  sounder
and  engineering  design  units  for  the  Visible/infrared  imager  radiometer  suite  and  the  Cross-
track infrared sounder.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

21

This  delay  shortens  the  time  available  for  incorporating  lessons  learned  from  NPP
while it is in orbit into future NPOESS missions and could lead to gaps in the con-
tinuity  of  climate  and  weather  data  if  predecessor  satellites  fail  prematurely.  Also,
the  CrIS  sensor  experienced  a  cost  overrun  and  schedule  delays  as  the  contractor
worked  to  recover  from  a  structural  failure  and  is  currently  several  weeks  behind
its schedule due to thermal vacuum testing taking longer than planned. The status
and risk level of each of the components of the space segment is described in Table
5.

Program Risks Remain; Continued Oversight Is Needed to Prevent Further

Cost Increases and Schedule Delays

Moving  forward,  the  program  continues  to  face  risks.  Over  the  next  two  years,  it
will  need  to  complete  the  development  of  the  key  sensors,  test  them,  integrate  and
test them on the NPP spacecraft, and test these systems with the ground-based data
processing systems. In addition, the program faces two other issues that could affect
its  overall  schedule  and  cost.  One  is  that  there  continues  to  be  disagreement  be-
tween  NOAA  and  DOD  on  the  appropriate  level  of  system  security.  To  date,
NPOESS  has  been  designed  and  developed  to  meet  DOD’s  standards  for  a  mission
essential system, but NOAA officials believe that the system should be built to meet
more stringent standards.14 Implementing more stringent standards could cause re-
work  and  retesting,  and  potentially  affect  the  cost  and  schedule  of  the  system.  An-
other  issue  is  that  program  life  cycle  costs  could  increase  once  a  better  estimate  of

14 NOAA  officials  have  stated  that  they  believe  the  program  should  be  built  to  a  ‘‘high’’  secu-

rity level per Federal Information Processing Standards Publication 199.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

22

the  cost  of  operations  and  support  is  known.  The  $12.5  billion  estimated  life  cycle
cost for NPOESS includes a rough estimate of $1 billion for operations and support.
The  NPOESS  program  office  is  working  closely  with  the  contractor  and  sub-
contractors to resolve these program risks. To address sensor risks, the program of-
fice  and  officials  from  NASA’s  Goddard  Space  Flight  Center  commissioned  an  inde-
pendent  review  team  to  assess  the  thoroughness  and  adequacy  of  practices  being
used  in  the  assembly,  integration,  and  testing  of  the  VIIRS  and  CrIS  instruments
in preparation for the NPP spacecraft. The team found that the contractors for both
sensors  had  sound  test  programs  in  place,  but  noted  risks  with  VIIRS’s  schedule
and with CrIS’s reliability and performance. The program office adjusted the VIIRS
testing schedule and is monitoring the CrIS testing results. In addition, the program
office  recently  instituted  biweekly  senior-level  management  meetings  to  review
progress  on  VIIRS’s  development,  and  program  officials  noted  that  both  the  prime
contractor  and  the  program  executive  office  will  have  senior  officials  on-site  at  the
contractor’s facility to provide extensive, day-to-day oversight of management activi-
ties to assist in resolving issues.

To address the risk posed by changing security requirements late in the system’s
development, program officials commissioned a study to determine the effect of more
stringent  standards  on  the  system.  This  study  was  completed  in  March  2008,  but
has not yet been released. To address the risk of cost growth due to poor estimates
of operations and support costs, DOD’s cost analysis group is currently refining this
estimate.  Program  officials  estimated  that  the  program  costs  could  grow  by  about
$1  billion,  and  expect  to  finalize  revised  operations  and  support  costs  in  July  2008.
The  program  office  is  aware  of  program  risks  and  is  working  to  mitigate  them,
but these issues could affect the program’s overall schedule and cost. Given the tight
time  frames  for  completing  key  sensors,  integrating  them  on  the  NPP  spacecraft,
and  getting  the  ground-based  data  processing  system  developed,  tested,  and  de-
ployed,  it  is  important  for  the  NPOESS  program  office,  the  Program  Executive  Of-
fice,  and  the  Executive  Committee  to  continue  to  provide  close  oversight  of  mile-
stones and risks.

Agencies  Have  Undertaken  Preliminary  Steps  to  Restore  Key  Sensors,  but

Lack Timely Plans to Ensure Long-Term Data Continuity

When the NPOESS restructuring agreement removed four climate and space envi-
ronment  sensors  from  the  program  and  degraded  four  others,  it  led  NASA,  NOAA,
and DOD to reassess their priorities and options for obtaining climate and space en-
vironment data. Since the June 2006 restructuring decision, the three agencies have
taken  preliminary  steps  to  restore  the  capabilities  of  selected  climate  and  space
weather  sensors  that  were  degraded  or  removed  from  the  NPOESS  program  by
prioritizing  the  sensors,  assessing  options  for  restoring  them,  and  making  decisions
to  restore  selected  sensors  in  order  to  mitigate  near-term  data  gaps.  However,  the
agencies  have  not  yet  developed  plans  to  mitigate  the  loss  of  these  sensors  on  a
long-term  basis.  Best  practices  in  strategic  planning  suggest  that  agencies  develop
and implement long-term plans to guide their short-term activities. Until such plans
are developed, the agencies may lose their windows of opportunity for selecting cost-
effective  options  or  they  may  resort  to  an  ad  hoc  approach  to  restoring  these  sen-
sors.  Lacking  plans  almost  two  years  after  key  sensors  were  removed  from  the
NPOESS  program,  the  agencies  face  increased  risk  of  gaps  in  the  continuity  of  cli-
mate and space environment data.

While  NPOESS  was  originally  envisioned  to  provide  only  weather  observations,
this  mission  was  later  expanded  to  include  long-term  continuity  for  key  climate
data.  Maintaining  the  continuity  of  climate  and  space  data  over  decades  is  impor-
tant to identify long-term environmental cycles (such as the 11-year solar cycle and
multi-year  ocean  cycles  including  the  El  Nin˜ o  effect)  and  their  impacts,  and  to  de-
tect trends in climate change and global warming. The Nunn-McCurdy restructuring
decision  removed  four  sensors  and  degraded  the  functionality  of  four  other  sensors
that  were  to  provide  these  data.  DOD,  NASA,  and  NOAA  are  now  responsible  for
determining what to restore, how to restore it, and the means for doing so. This re-
sponsibility  includes  justifying  the  additional  funding  needed  to  develop  these  sen-
sors  within  their  respective  agencies’  investment  decision  processes.  Best  practices
of leading organizations call for defining a strategic plan to formalize priorities and
plans  for  meeting  mission  goals.  Such  a  plan  would  include  the  agency’s  long-term
goals for climate and space weather measurements, the short-term activities needed
to  attain  these  goals,  and  the  milestones  and  resources  needed  to  support  the
planned activities.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

23

NASA,  NOAA,  and  DOD  Have  Identified  Priorities,  Assessed  Options,  and

Made Decisions to Restore Selected Sensors

Since  the  June  2006  restructuring,  NASA,  NOAA,  and  DOD  have  taken  prelimi-
nary steps to restore sensor capabilities by determining priorities for restoring sen-
sor  capabilities,  assessing  options  for  obtaining  sensor  data  over  time,  and  making
decisions to restore selected sensors. Specifically, in August 2006, the NPOESS Sen-
ior  User  Advisory  Group—a  group  representing  NASA,  NOAA,  and  DOD  system
users—assessed the impact of the canceled or degraded sensors and identified prior-
ities for restoring them. In January 2007, a NOAA and NASA working group on cli-
mate sensors prioritized which of the sensors were most important to restore for cli-
mate  purposes  and  proposed  possible  solutions  and  mitigation  efforts.  Two  other
groups—the  National  Research  Council  and  a  NOAA–DOD  working  group—have
also  issued  reports  describing  the  impact  of  the  loss  of  climate  and  space  environ-
mental sensors, respectively.15 Table 6 summarizes the results of these studies.

15 National  Research  Council,  Options  to  Ensure  the  Climate  Record  from  the  NPOESS  and
GOES–R Spacecraft: A Workshop Report (Washington, D.C.: 2007), and the Office of the Federal
Coordinator  for  Meteorological  Services  and  Supporting  Research,  Impacts  of  NPOESS  Nunn-
McCurdy Certification and Potential Loss of ACE Spacecraft Solar Wind Data on National Space
Environmental  Monitoring  Capabilities.  (Washington,  D.C.:  January  2008).  The  report  com-
mittee  was  co-chaired  by  the  Director  of  the  Space  Weather  Prediction  Center  (NOAA)  and  the
Chief of the Integration, Plans, and Requirements division within the U.S. Air Force Directorate
for  Weather.  Agency  partners  in  the  Department  of  Commerce,  DOD,  NASA,  the  National
Science  Foundation,  and  the  Office  of  the  Federal  Coordinator  for  Meteorology  concurred  with
the report.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

24

In  addition  to  prioritizing  the  sensors,  NASA,  NOAA,  and  DOD  identified  a  vari-
ety of options for obtaining key sensor data over the next two decades and continue
to seek other options. The agencies identified options including adding sensors back
to a later NPOESS satellite, adding sensors to another planned satellite, and devel-
oping a new satellite to include several of the sensors. Examples of options for sev-
eral  sensors  are  provided  in  Figure  1.  In  addition,  in  December  2007,  NOAA  re-
leased  a  request  for  information  to  determine  whether  commercial  providers  could
include selected environmental sensors on their satellites.

In  addition  to  prioritizing  sensors  and  identifying  options,  over  the  last  year,
NASA,  NOAA,  and  DOD  have  taken  steps  to  restore  three  sensors  on  a  near-term
basis.  Specifically,  in  April  2007,  the  NPOESS  Executive  Committee  decided  to  re-
store  the  limb  component  of  the  Ozone  mapper/profiler  suite  to  the  NPP  satellite;
in  January  2008,  to  add  the  Clouds  and  the  Earth’s  radiant  energy  sensor  to  NPP;
and in May 2008 to add the Total solar irradiance sensor to the first NPOESS sat-
ellite.  These  decisions  are  expected  to  provide  continuity  for  these  sensors  through
approximately 2015. Table 7 shows the latest planned configuration of NPOESS sat-
ellites.  NASA  officials  noted  that  they  also  took  steps  to  mitigate  a  potential  gap
in  total  solar  irradiance  data  by  proposing  to  fund  an  additional  four  years  of  the
SORCE mission (from 2008 to 2012).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

25

Agencies Lack Plans to Ensure Long-Term Data Continuity

While  NASA,  NOAA,  and  DOD  have  taken  preliminary  steps  to  address  the  cli-
mate  and  space  sensors  that  were  removed  from  the  NPOESS  program  almost  two
years  ago,  they  do  not  yet  have  plans  for  restoring  climate  and  space  environment
data  on  a  long-term  basis.  Specifically,  there  are  as  yet  no  firm  plans  for  obtaining
most of this data after 2015. The Office of Science and Technology Policy, an organi-
zation  within  the  Executive  Office  of  the  President,  is  currently  working  with
NASA,  NOAA,  and  DOD  to  sort  through  the  costs  and  benefits  of  the  various  op-
tions and to develop plans. However, this effort has been under way for almost two
years and officials could not estimate when such plans would be completed.

Delays  in  developing  a  comprehensive  strategy  for  ensuring  climate  and  space
data  continuity  may  result  in  the  loss  of  selected  options.  For  example,  NASA  and
NOAA  estimated  that  they  would  need  to  make  a  decision  on  whether  to  build  an-
other  satellite  to  obtain  ocean  altimeter  data  in  2008.  Also,  the  NPOESS  program
office  estimated  that  if  any  sensors  are  to  be  restored  to  an  NPOESS  satellite,  it
would  need  a  decision  about  six  years  in  advance  of  the  planned  satellite  launch.
Specifically,  for  a  sensor  to  be  included  on  the  second  NPOESS  satellite,  the  spon-
soring agency would need to commit to do so by January 2010.

Without  a  timely  decision  on  a  plan  for  restoring  satellite  data  on  a  long-term
basis, NASA, NOAA, and DOD risk losing their windows of opportunity on selected
options  and  restoring  sensors  in  an  ad  hoc  manner.  Ultimately,  the  agencies  risk
a  break  in  the  continuity  of  climate  and  space  environment  data.  As  national  and
international  concerns  about  climate  change  and  global  warming  grow,  these  data
are more important than ever to try to understand long-term climate trends and im-
pacts.

GAO  Made  Recommendations  to  Ensure  That  Future  Climate  Needs  Are

Addressed and to Complete Restructuring Activities

Because  of  the  importance  of  effectively  managing  the  NPOESS  program  to  en-
sure that there are no gaps in the continuity of critical weather, environmental, and
climate  observations,  in  our  accompanying  report16 we  made  recommendations  to
the  Secretaries  of  Commerce  and  Defense  and  to  the  Administrator  of  NASA  to  es-
tablish plans on whether and how to restore the climate and space sensors removed
from the NPOESS program by June 2009, in cases where the sensors are warranted
and justified. In their comments on the report, all three agencies concurred with our
recommendations. In addition, both the Department of Commerce and NASA reiter-
ated that they are working with their partner agencies to finalize plans for restoring
sensors.

16 GAO–08–518.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

26

In  addition,  we  also  reemphasized  a  recommendation  made  in  our  prior  report
that  the  appropriate  NASA,  NOAA,  and  DOD  executives  immediately  finalize  key
acquisition documents. All three agencies also concurred with this recommendation.
Further,  Commerce  noted  that  DOD  and  NASA  executives  need  to  weigh  in  to  re-
solve issues at, or immediately below, their levels in order to ensure prompt comple-
tion  of  the  key  acquisition  documents.  NASA  noted  that  difficulties  in  gaining  con-
sensus across all three NPOESS agencies have delayed the signature of key acquisi-
tion  documents,  and  reported  that  they  are  committed  to  moving  these  documents
through the signature cycle once all of the issues and concerns are resolved.

In summary, over the past year, program officials have completed major activities
associated with restructuring the NPOESS program and have made progress in de-
veloping  and  testing  sensors,  ground  systems,  and  the  NPP  spacecraft.  However,
multiple risks remain. Agency executives have still not signed off on key acquisition
documents  that  were  originally  to  be  completed  in  September  2006,  and  now  DOD
is  threatening  to  withhold  funding  if  the  documents  are  not  completed  by  August
2008—even  though  DOD  has  contributed  to  the  delays  in  completing  these  docu-
ments.  Also,  one  critical  sensor  has  experienced  technical  problems  and  schedule
delays that have led program officials to delay the NPP launch date by about eight
months.  Any  delay  in  the  NPP  launch  date  shortens  the  time  available  for  incor-
porating  lessons  learned  from  NPP  onto  future  NPOESS  missions  and  could  also
lead  to  gaps  in  critical  climate  and  weather  data.  In  addition,  risks  to  the  program
remain  in  resolving  interagency  disagreements  on  the  appropriate  level  of  system
security  and  in  revising  estimated  costs  for  satellite  operations  and  support.  The
program  office  is  aware  of  these  risks  and  is  working  to  mitigate  them,  but  contin-
ued problems could affect the program’s overall schedule and cost.

When  selected  climate  and  space  weather  sensors  were  removed  from  the
NPOESS program during its restructuring, NASA, NOAA, and DOD became respon-
sible  for  determining  what  environmental  data  to  restore  and  how  to  restore  them.
This  responsibility  includes  justifying  the  additional  funding  needed  to  develop
these sensors within their respective agency’s investment decision processes. In the
two  years  since  the  restructuring,  the  agencies  have  identified  their  priorities  and
assessed  their  options  for  restoring  sensor  capabilities.  In  addition,  the  agencies
made  decisions  to  restore  two  sensors  to  the  NPP  satellite  and  one  to  the  first
NPOESS  satellite  in  order  to  mitigate  near-term  data  gaps.  However,  the  agencies
lack  plans  for  restoring  sensor  capabilities  on  a  long-term  basis.  Without  a  timely
decision  on  a  long-term  plan  for  restoring  satellite  data,  the  agencies  risk  a  break
in the continuity of climate and space environment data. With the increased concern
about climate change and global warming, these data are more important than ever
to try to understand long-term climate trends and impacts.

Mr.  Chairman,  this  concludes  my  statement.  I  would  be  happy  to  answer  any

questions that you or Members of the Committee may have at this time.

If  you  have  any  questions  on  matters  discussed  in  this  testimony,  please  contact
me. Other key contributors to this testimony include Colleen Phillips (Assistant Di-
rector), Kate Agatone, and Kathleen S. Lovett.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

27

BIOGRAPHY FOR DAVID A. POWNER

Experience

Twenty years’ experience in information technology issues in both public and pri-

vate sectors.

Education
Business Administration, University of Denver
Senior  Executive  Fellows  Program,  Harvard  University,  John  F.  Kennedy  School  of
Government

Director, IT Management Issues, U.S. Government Accountability Office

Dave is currently responsible for a large segment of GAO’s information technology
(IT)  work,  including  systems  development,  IT  investment  management,  health  IT,
and cyber critical infrastructure protection reviews.

In  the  private  sector,  Dave  has  held  several  executive-level  positions  in  the  tele-
communications industry, including overseeing IT and financial internal audits, and
software development associated with digital subscriber lines (DSL).

At  GAO,  Dave  has  led  teams  reviewing  major  IT  modernization  efforts  at  Chey-
enne  Mountain  Air  Force  Station,  the  National  Weather  Service,  the  Federal  Avia-
tion Administration, and the Internal Revenue Service. These reviews covered many
information technology areas including software development maturity, information
security, and enterprise architecture.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

28

Chairman  LAMPSON.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Powner.  Admiral

Lautenbacher, you are recognized for five minutes.
STATEMENT  OF  VICE  ADMIRAL  CONRAD  C.  LAUTENBACHER,
JR.  (U.S.  NAVY,  RET.),  UNDER  SECRETARY  OF  COMMERCE
FOR  OCEANS  AND  ATMOSPHERE;  ADMINISTRATOR,  NA-
TIONAL  OCEANIC  AND  ATMOSPHERIC  ADMINISTRATION
(NOAA)
Vice  Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Chair-
man  Lampson,  Ranking  Member  Inglis,  and  distinguished  Mem-
bers  of  the  Committee,  and  staff,  I  appreciate  this  opportunity  to
provide  an  update  on  the  development  of  the  NPOESS,  the  Na-
tional  Polar-Orbiting  Operational  Environmental  Satellite  System
program  and  discuss  the  latest  Government  Accountability  Office
report.  I  continue  to  value  and  use  the  input  and  insight  provided
by Mr. Powner and his team at GAO.

NOAA’s  two  environmental  satellite  programs  are  the  backbone
of the Nation’s hurricane and severe weather forecasting and warn-
ing  capabilities.  Today  we  are  here  to  talk  about  our  next  genera-
tion  polar  satellite  program,  NPOESS.  As  you  know,  the  original
goal  of  the  NPOESS  program  was  to  combine  the  polar  satellite
needs  and  requirements  of  the  Air  Force  and  NOAA  into  one  pro-
gram while also providing a continuation of certain NASA satellite
measurements, mostly in the climate area.

While  it  has  been  said  before,  I  must  reiterate:  satellite  acquisi-
tions  are  complex  and  difficult  endeavors.  This  program  also  has
the  additional  complexity  of  being  a  tri-agency  effort  made  up  of
the  Department  of  Commerce,  Department  of  Defense,  and  NASA.
Now, because of the Executive Committee’s key decisions that were
begun  prior  to  the  Nunn-McCurdy  review  in  2006,  management
and  oversight  of  this  program  has  been  vastly  improved,  but  we
still face significant challenges as outlined by GAO.

It  is  important  for  the  Committee  to  understand  that,  as  men-
tioned  in  the  GAO  testimony,  the  other  four  main  instruments,  as
well  as  the  satellite  bus  and  ground  system  are  on  budget,  on
schedule,  and  performing  well  in  testing  with  no  significant  con-
cerns.  I  continue  to  remain  concerned,  however,  about  contractor
performance and management as it pertains to the Visible/Infrared
Imager/Radiometer  Suite  known  as  VIIRS.  VIIRS  continues  to  be
our  most  challenging  instrument  to  develop.  With  the  government
management  system  now  in  place,  I  believe  we  are  better  posi-
tioned  to  identify,  contain,  and  manage  proactively  the  challenges
as  they  arise.  After  testing  late  last  year,  for  example,  showed
some  technical  problems  with  cooling  systems  and  circuit  boards,
a complete review was held and the delivery of the instrument had
to  be  delayed  about  eight  months  which  in  turn  delayed  the  NPP
NASA  launch  by  eight  months  from  September  of  2009  to  June
2010.  There  was  no  effect  on  the  C–1  through  C–4  satellite  sched-
ule.

In  the  last  two  weeks—to  indicate  our  ability  to  keep  this  com-
mittee updated—within the last two weeks during integration test-
ing,  as  mentioned,  the  program  uncovered  some  quality  and  work-
manship  issues  with  certain  fasteners  which  hold  the  different
pieces  of  VIIRS  together.  I  am  happy  to  report  this  morning  that

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

29

we  have  received  an  update  last  night  from  our  technical  assess-
ment team that the effect of this manufacturing flaw will likely be
very  minimal  to  the  program.  At  this  time  we  do  not  anticipate  it
will  delay  the  delivery  of  the  VIIRS  sensor  to  NPP.  I  believe  this
issue is under control at this point.

The  Cross-track  Infrared  Sounder,  CrIS,  is  undergoing  final
preparation  for  delivery  at  the  end  of  July  2008  to  begin  integra-
tion  on  the  NPP  satellite.  The  Ozone  Mapping  and  Profiler  Suite,
called OMPS, the Limb and Nadir instruments that will fly on NPP
have  been  tested  and  integrated  as  a  unit.  Specifically,  regarding
GAO’s  most  recent  report  on  NPOESS,  the  first  recommendation
calls  for  plans  to  restore  the  climate  and  space  sensors  removed
from  the  NPOESS  program  by  June  2009.  As  the  Committee
knows, this has been a high priority for NOAA and the Administra-
tion.  The  EXCOM  has  approved  restoring  the  OMPS  Limb  and
CERES4 instruments  onto  NPP  and  remanifesting  TSIS5 onto  the
first NPOESS satellite. Meeting the deadlines to integrate these in-
struments  onto  NPP  and  the  first  NPOESS  satellite  will  require
fully  funding  the  Administration’s  $74  million  climate  sensor  re-
quest  in  the  fiscal  year  2009  budget.  I  am  pleased  to  indicate  that
we  have  gained  support  from  the  Appropriations  Committees  for
these  initiatives  and  look  forward  to  successful  work  on  restoring
these sensors.

We are actively working on plans for the rest of the climate sen-
sors  de-manifested  from  NPOESS.  In  the  near-term  for  Altimetry,
the Jason–2 mission is expected to launch this month, and we have
begun  preliminary  work  on  the  Jason–3  mission  which  will  allow
continuity  through  the  next  couple  of  decades.  With  regard  to  aer-
osol measurements, they will be continued through the NASA’s up-
coming Glory mission, and we will look at the results from that and
work on the follow-on.

Regarding  a  restoration  of  the  space  weather  sensors,  we  con-
tinue  to  work  closely  with  NASA,  the  Air  Force,  and  the  space/
weather user community to ensure that plans address user require-
ments. We have provided the Office of Science and Technology Pol-
icy  at  the  White  House  with  a  report  earlier  this  year  to  explain
what  the  issues  are,  and  we  are  awaiting  further  direction  for  the
next steps and expect that to happen shortly.

The second recommendation by GAO re-emphasizes the prior rec-
ommendation that appropriate NASA, NOAA, and DOD executives
immediately  finalize  key  acquisition  documents.  I  wholeheartedly
agree  with  this  recommendation.  We  have  made  significant
progress.  Sixteen  of  the  22  documents  have  been  finalized.  My
team  and  I  have  been  working  very  hard  with  the  EXCOM  and
DOD  to  reach  the  agreements  required  to  complete  the  six  out-
standing  ADM6 documents.  I  am  prepared  to  go  through  each  one
and  explain  the  issues  that  are  involved  with  them  if  you  desire,
or I can provide that for the record.

Let  me  conclude  by  addressing  some  concerns  that  have  arisen
from  a  recent  internal  memo  by  Mr.  John  Young,  the  Under  Sec-
retary  of  Defense  for  Acquisition,  Technology,  and  Logistics.  This

4 Clouds and Earth’s Radiant Energy System
5 Total Solar Irradiance Sensor
6 Acquisition Decision Memorandum

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

30

memo  discussed  performance  measures  for  NPOESS  components,
new cost estimates for the operations of NPOESS, alternative man-
agement  studies,  and  completion  of  the  ADM  documents.  Regard-
ing  performance  measures  for  NPOESS,  let  me  assure  the  Com-
mittee  that  I  and  my  EXCOM  partners  are  committed  to  ensuring
NPOESS fulfills its six key performance parameters. NPOESS will
provide  roughly  10  times  more  data  at  four  times  the  speed  of  our
current satellites. It is a significant increase, and it continues to be
on  track  to  do  that.  Mr.  Young’s  memo  was  trying  to  clarify  that
the whole NPOESS program shouldn’t be put at risk to meet a spe-
cific performance capability. I agree, as the EXCOM does with Mr.
Young. I further clarified in a response letter that the user commu-
nity  and  the  EXCOM  should  be  involved  in  any  decisions  about
changes  to  performance  given  the  Nunn-McCurdy  review  and  our
charge to manage the program.

During  the  Nunn-McCurdy  review,  the  focus—I  am  on  cost  esti-
mates  now—the  focus  of  cost  estimators  was  on  the  development
and  the  launch  of  the  satellite  program,  not  on  the  out-year  oper-
ational costs which occur far down the line. After the NPOESS con-
tract  had  been  restructured  last  fall,  the  EXCOM  asked  the  pro-
gram  budget  staff  to  re-examine  the  original  2002  estimates  for
NPOESS operational costs used during the Nunn-McCurdy review.
We then asked the DOD independent cost estimators for its review
of  the  operations  cost  and  ensure  we  had  the  best  information
available  to  deal  with  this  program.  Given  that  the  program  will
now last longer, three to four years longer, it appears that an addi-
tional  $1  billion  is  potentially  required.  We  are  reconciling  at  this
point  the  different  estimates,  and  the  Executive  Committee  will
make  any  final  budget  decisions  on  the  expected  increases.  These
additional operations cost would not be effective until beginning in
the  2017  timeframe.  They  would  be  normal  costs  that  are  applied
to  our  budget  as  we  apply  operation  costs  today  to  run  the  sat-
ellites  we  have  in  position  and  are  again  not  part  of  the  procure-
ment and development costs.

This timeframe also gives us time to examine alternatives to en-
sure the most cost-effective solution for these requirements. We be-
lieve  we  have  alternatives  to  deal  with  those  estimates  as  they
exist  today.  In  addition,  the  program  budget  staff  and  the  inde-
pendent  cost  estimators  have  identified  some  likely  growth  in  the
NPOESS development and production costs due mostly to the ongo-
ing  problems  with  VIIRS  as  mentioned,  and  that  regards  the  need
to retain personnel as the next VIIRS units are built. Estimates for
these additional costs are still being finalized, and we will reconcile
them. It is part of our deliberate process to ensure that next year’s
budget  is  properly  developed  to  ensure  completion  of  this  system.
The  Nunn-McCurdy  certification  called  for  the  government  to
make  a  decision  in  2010  whether  to  proceed  with  the  third  and
fourth NPOESS satellites under the existing contract or develop an
alternative  management  structure,  such  as  a  different  prime  con-
tractor  or  having  the  government  manage  the  instrument  produc-
tion,  for  instance.  PEO7 has  completed  and  reported  to  Mr.  Young
on  the  first  phase  of  this  study  and  indicated  that  today  no  imme-

7 Program Executive Officer

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

31

diate  management  changes  were  warranted  given  what  has  been
put  in  place.  However,  the  EXCOM  has  asked  for  six-month  up-
dates  as  the  PEO  and  the  Independent  Review  Team  examine  all
aspects  of  the  program  for  any  possible  changes  in  preparation  for
the 2010 decision.

Finally, with regard to Mr. Young’s memo, some may suggest its
call  for  the  administrative  documents  to  be  completed  by  Sep-
tember  2008  or  DOD  funding  would  be  re-evaluated  shows  a  lack
of commitment to the program. From my experience, the DOD, the
Air  Force,  the  Department  of  Commerce,  and  the  Nation  need
NPOESS to succeed. It is crucial to our ability to forecast weather,
for  the  war  fighter,  for  our  nation’s  citizens,  and  for  its  impact  on
the  Nation’s  economy.  And  since  Mr.  Young  and  his  office  are  a
part of the ADM document process, and I have talked to their office
this  morning,  I  have  confidence  that  we  can  all  work  together  to
finish this job very quickly. I appreciate the Committee’s continued
interest in the success of the NOAA satellite programs. I believe we
are doing everything we can possibly think of and bring into effect
to keep this program on track. We have instituted large-scale man-
agement  and  oversight  reforms.  We  have  government  officials  at
contractor  facilities  participating  in  daily  activities  and  daily  over-
sight meetings. We measure the daily cost/schedule performance of
the  program  at  innumerable  levels  at  this  point.  We  are  making
progress  as  indicated.  But  technical  and  manufacturing  problems
can and will continue to arise, I believe. We will continue to do our
best to fix them. I am happy to expand on any of these points and
to answer questions from the Committee.

Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
[The  prepared  statement  of  Vice  Admiral  Lautenbacher  follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF VICE ADMIRAL CONRAD C. LAUTENBACHER, JR.

(U.S. NAVY, RET.)

Introduction

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Subcommittee, I am Conrad C. Lautenbacher,
Jr., Under Secretary for Oceans and Atmosphere and Administrator of the National
Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA)  in  the  Department  of  Commerce
(DOC).  I  appreciate  having  the  opportunity  to  provide  an  update  of  our  progress  in
the development of the National Polar-orbiting Operational Environmental Satellite
System (NPOESS) Program and discuss the latest Government Accountability Office
(GAO)  report  on  the  program.  I  will  provide  an  update  on  the  Program  since  the
June  7,  2007,  hearing  that  reviewed  the  status  of  the  restructured  NPOESS  Pro-
gram.

NOAA’s environmental satellite programs are the backbone of the Nation’s hurri-
cane  and  severe  weather  forecasting  and  warning  capabilities.  The  30-year  record
of  NOAA’s  environmental  satellites  to  the  global  climate  record  is  also  well  known.
NOAA’s  two  major  satellite  programs  each  play  critical  roles  in  providing  environ-
mental  information  to  the  Nation.  NOAA’s  Geostationary  Operational  Environ-
mental  Satellite  (GOES)  series  is  used  for  short-term  weather  forecasting  and  se-
vere  storm  tracking,  while  NOAA’s  Polar-orbiting  Operational  Environmental  Sat-
ellite  (POES)  series  provides  information  that  is  crucial  to  long-term  weather  pre-
dictions  and  climate  modeling.  In  early  2009,  NOAA  N–Prime,  the  last  of  the  cur-
rent NOAA POES series, will be launched.

Status of the NPOESS Program

NOAA’s satellite acquisitions are complex and difficult development efforts. I will
be the first to acknowledge that the government does not have a strong track record
with  regard  to  recent  satellite  acquisition  development  efforts.  Through  partner-
ships with the National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA) and the De-
partment of Defense (DOD), and our contracts with industry, we have built and are

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

32

reinforcing  our  team  to  successfully  complete  NPOESS  satellite  development.  We
appreciate  GAO’s  long-standing  review  of  the  NPOESS  Program  and  the  guidance
and  oversight  we  have  derived  from  it.  NOAA  is  working  hard  to  develop  our  sat-
ellite  programs  within  established  cost  and  schedule  boundaries,  and  with  the  per-
formance that the Nation requires and expects.

The  NPOESS  program  is  funded  equally  (50:50)  by  DOC/NOAA  and  DOD/Air
Force  annual  appropriations.  NASA  conducts  NPOESS  Preparatory  Project  (NPP)
risk  reduction  and  data  continuity  activities,  DOD/Air  Force  manages  the  acquisi-
tion contract, and DOC/NOAA provides overall program management and operation
of the system. Through FY 2008, the NPOESS program will have incurred combined
program  costs  of  $4.4  billion.  The  President’s  FY  2009  Budget  request  for  the
NPOESS  Program  is  $577  million;  of  that  amount,  $288  million  is  requested  for
DOC/NOAA, and $289 million for DOD/Air Force.

Since the NPOESS Program’s restructure and the contract renegotiation, we have

completed a number of management changes that have improved oversight:

• Mr.  Dan  Stockton  was  selected  as  the  new  Program  Executive  Officer  by
NOAA with the concurrence of the NPOESS Executive Committee (EXCOM).
• Colonel  Ed  Phillips  was  recently  selected  as  System  Program  Director.  He
currently serves as the acting System Program Director. Prior to that, he was
the NPOESS Deputy Program Executive Officer.

• A restructured NPOESS contract is in place that ties contractor compensation

to more objective measures of cost, schedule, and performance.

• The government has replaced the old award fee structure with a clearer per-

formance-based structure.

• The Chief Executive Officers of Northrop Grumman and Raytheon now attend
the regularly scheduled NPOESS EXCOM meetings to ensure that the appro-
priate resources of these corporations are focused on the development and test
issues of the program.

• Several  key  climate  sensors  have  been  remanifested  (or  reinstated)  on  the

NPP and NPOESS satellites.

• A  lower  risk  alternative  to  the  Conical-scanned  Microwave  Imager/Sounder
(CMIS),  the  Microwave  Imager/Sounder  (MIS),  is  being  developed  by  the
Naval  Research  Laboratory.  The  MIS  will  be  flown  on  the  second  (C–2)  and
third (C–3) NPOESS satellites.

• The current suite of instruments listed in Appendix 1 reflects the progress the
government  has  made  since  2006  to  continue  weather  and  climate  measure-
ments.

As  a  part  of  the  future  planning  for  the  program,  the  NPOESS  Integrated  Pro-
gram Office (IPO) has begun the Alternative Management Study which will develop
the  options  and  assessments  for  viable  competing  management  structures  for  the
NPOESS  program.  The  Alternative  Management  Study  will  support  future  acquisi-
tion strategies for the EXCOM consideration.

A  few  of  the  NPOESS  instruments  continue  to  face  challenges,  but  with  the  Pro-
gram  Managers  and  Systems  Engineers  who  are  now  in  place,  I  and  the  NPOESS
EXCOM  believe  that  the  Program  is  better  positioned  to  proactively  identify,  con-
tain, and manage these challenges as they arise.

The table below lists the instruments on NPP and the C–1 satellite.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

33

The  Visible/Infrared  Imager/Radiometer  Suite  (VIIRS)  continues  to  be  our  most
challenging instrument to develop, and as such receives a great deal of management
and  oversight  by  the  government  and  NPOESS  contractor  team.  We  have  imple-
mented  a  number  of  changes  based  on  the  lessons  learned  during  the  events  that
lead  to  the  2006  restructuring  of  the  Program  and  on  the  issues  we  have  encoun-
tered since then. The tri-agency partners have instituted rigorous management and
engineering reviews to address and resolve problems in an orderly fashion, while at
the  same  time  not  posing  undue  risk  to  the  overall  Program.  With  respect  to  the
current  challenges  with  the  VIIRS  instrument,  the  Program  Executive  Officer  and
System  Program  Director,  with  assistance  from  NASA,  are  working  with  the
NPOESS contractors to focus the appropriate attention and resources to address the
VIIRS development challenges.

As the Committee recently learned, the NPOESS program uncovered some poten-
tially significant fastener design flaws with VIIRS in the past few weeks. Although
we  are  cautiously  optimistic  that  technical  assessments  will  result  in  minimal  im-
pact,  the  worst  case  scenario  could  cause  a  several  month  delay  to  the  delivery  of
VIIRS to NPP, which could lead to a further launch delay for NPP.

The  Cross-track  Infrared  Sounder  (CrIS)  is  undergoing  extensive  planning  and
preparation  for  final  sensor  checklist  items  to  be  complete  in  time  for  delivery  for
NPP  integration  at  the  end  of  July  2008.  The  Ozone  Mapping  and  Profiler  Suite
(OMPS)-Limb  and  -Nadir  instruments  that  will  fly  on  NPP  have  been  integrated
and a test of the sensors has been completed.

With  respect  to  the  ground  system,  the  IPO  continues  to  make  progress  on
‘‘SafetyNet,’’ a system of globally distributed ground data reception stations that will
receive  data  from  NPOESS  satellites  and  immediately  relay  these  data  to  the  four
Weather  Centrals—NOAA/National  Environmental  Satellite,  Data  and  Information
Service; Air Force Weather Agency; Fleet Numerical Meteorology and Oceanography
Center; and Naval Oceanographic Office. The SafetyNet agreements are on schedule
and  there  are  no  outstanding  obstacles  that  would  prevent  completing  the  global
ground system network.

Development  of  the  Integrated  Data  Processing  Segment  (IDPS)  continues  on-
track.  The  IDPS  will  process  environmental  data  products  beginning  with  the
NPOESS  Preparatory  Project  (NPP)  and  continuing  through  the  lifetime  of  the
NPOESS  system.  The  IDPS  must  process  a  data  volume  significantly  greater  than
the  current  POES  and  DMSP  systems  and  within  significantly  reduced  processing
times. The IDPS recently completed factory acceptance test readiness review.

Coordination of Tri-agency Acquisition Decision Memoranda

The  IPO  continues  to  coordinate  among  the  tri-agency  partners,  DOD/Air  Force,
NASA,  and  DOC/NOAA,  to  conclude  and  finalize  the  documents  required  by  the
June  2006  Acquisition  Decision  Memorandum.  Six  documents  remain  to  be  com-
pleted.  While  getting  these  remaining  documents  finalized  has  not  hindered  our
ability  to  manage  and  implement  the  NPOESS  Program  thus  far,  they  have  been
challenging  to  coordinate  through  a  tri-agency  process.  However,  the  EXCOM  re-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

mains  committed  to  completing  them.  At  this  time,  the  six  outstanding  documents
are the:

34

• Fee Management Plan
• Acquisition Program Baseline
• Acquisition Strategy Report
• Test and Evaluation Master Plan
• Two-Orbit Program
• NPOESS Tri-Agency Memorandum of Agreement

The  program  is  working  to  secure  final  clearance  on  the  documents  by  later  this

year.

Status of Restoring Key Climate Sensors

As  discussed  earlier,  the  2006  decision  to  restructure  the  NPOESS  Program  re-
moved  (or  ‘‘demanifested’’)  several  planned  sensors  that  would  have  sustained  key,
long-standing climate measurements. The table in Appendix 2 lists the current sta-
tus  of  those  demanifested  sensors.  Since  this  decision,  Office  of  Science  Technology
Policy  (OSTP)  and  the  Office  of  Management  and  Budget  have  worked  closely  with
NASA  and  NOAA  and  the  climate  science  community  to  understand  the  implica-
tions  of  the  loss  of  these  climate  sensors  for  climate  and  ocean  research  activities,
and  to  identify  options  for  retaining  key  measurement  capabilities  from  this  group
of planned sensors.

As  a  result  of  these  assessments  and  information  provided  in  the  2007  National
Research  Council  Decadal  Survey  on  Earth  Sciences,  the  Administration  concluded
that the highest near-term priorities (listed in relative priority order) are to sustain
the data sets of the following five key climate measurement capabilities:

• Total solar irradiance
• Earth radiation budget
• RADAR altimetry
• Ozone vertical profile
• Aerosols

In  addition  to  continuing  these  critical  measurements,  the  Administration  also
recognized  the  importance  of  stewardship  of  the  climate  data  records  that  will  be
derived from these instruments.

The Administration developed a plan to implement this assessment and requested
a  $74  million  budget  initiative  in  the  President’s  FY  2009  Budget  Request.  These
funds will be used to support the development of CERES and TSIS in time for their
respective  launches  on  NPP  and  C–1.  Specifically,  the  FY  2009  funds  would  be  ap-
plied to the development of the sensors in the following manner:

• $38  million  for  development  of  CERES  for  NPP  and  C–1,  which  will  provide

continuity for Earth radiation budget measurements,

• $28 million for development of TSIS for C–1, which will provide continuity for

total solar irradiance measurements, and

• $8.0  million  for  development  of  data  record  stewardship  to  provide  long-term

science support for the data derived from climate instruments.

This  plan  complies  with  the  2006  restructure  of  the  NPOESS  Program  that  re-
quires  sensors  be  restored  only  if  they  are  funded  separately  from  the  joint  DOC/
NOAA–DOD/Air  Force  annual  appropriations  for  NPOESS.  In  this  plan,  NOAA  is
responsible for full funding to develop these instruments with NASA providing tech-
nical and acquisition assistance on a cost reimbursable basis from NOAA.

The  plan  includes  two  of  the  five  key  measurements  detailed  in  the  priority  list
above.  NOAA  and  NASA  have  determined  that  near-term  continuity  of  the  other
three measurements can be fulfilled through existing plans detailed below:

• Continuity  of  RADAR  altimetry  measurements  can  be  fulfilled  through  the
Jason  2  mission  scheduled  for  launch  this  month.  Plans  for  a  follow-on  sat-
ellite (Jason 3) are currently being evaluated.
• Aerosol measurements can be fulfilled with the 2009 launch of the Aerosol Po-
• Ozone  vertical  profile  data  requirements  can  be  addressed  by  the  NPOESS
EXCOM’s  2007  decision  to  remanifest  Ozone  Mapping  and  Profiler  Suite
Limb sensor (OMPS–Limb) with the OMPS–Nadir sensor onto NPP.

larimeter Sensor on the NASA GLORY mission.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

35

While  these  efforts  address  the  most  immediate  needs  for  climate  sensor  con-
tinuity,  it  is  recognized  that  a  longer-term  strategy  for  climate  sensor  continuity
must also be addressed. NOAA and NASA are continuing to work together to iden-
tify  the  longer-term  strategy,  taking  into  account  current  and  future  national  and
international assets. The results of these efforts will continue to be vetted with the
science community and reflected in outyear budget recommendations.

Status of Demanifested Space Weather Sensors

In addition to the climate sensors discussed above, the Space Environmental Sen-
sor  Suite,  which  includes  five  space  weather  sensors,  was  demanifested  from  the
NPOESS  program  in  2006.  In  June  2007,  OSTP  requested  that  the  Office  of  the
Federal Coordinator for Meteorology convene an interagency group to provide an as-
sessment  of  the  impact  of  demanifesting  these  space  weather  sensors.  NOAA,
NASA,  and  the  Air  Force  participated  in  this  assessment.  The  assessment  and  re-
port  focused  on  evaluating  whether  and  how  to  restore  these  space  weather  meas-
urements in a two phase approach:

Phase I: Assess the impacts of the 2006 NPOESS restructure decisions and the
potential loss of NASA’s Advanced Composition Explorer (ACE) mission on U.S.
space weather-related activities.
Phase  II:  Examine  possible  options  to  address  these  impacts  and  to  restore  the
capability lost.

The  Phase  I  report  was  provided  to  OSTP  earlier  this  year.  The  main  findings

were that the 2006 restructuring of the NPOESS program:

• reduced support of Environmental Data Records from 12 to 5,
• may  cause  monitoring  and  warning  capabilities  to  revert  to  pre-1980  levels,
• put precision Global Positioning System (GPS) users at risk.

and

Additionally, the loss of NASA’s ACE data was deemed critical as it would elimi-
nate the ability to predict the onset of geomagnetic storms. At this time, NASA has
instituted  a  fuel  management  strategy  that  may  allow  ACE  to  continue  to  perform
until 2020. However, since there is no ACE replacement in development, this single
source of data remains an area of concern for NOAA and the space weather commu-
nity.  While  OSTP  has  not  formally  initiated  Phase  II  of  the  assessment,  it  is  ex-
pected to do so later this year.

In  addition,  the  Committee  was  informed  last  month  that  NOAA  is  currently
working to mitigate the loss of some space weather observation capabilities on three
of four of its on-orbit geostationary satellites. NOAA is currently relying on GOES–
10, the oldest geostationary satellite on orbit, to monitor solar flares, an observation
important  to  users  of  satellite  and  high  frequency  communications  and  GPS.  Plans
for  future  mitigation  following  the  end  of  the  satellite’s  service  are  being  planned
in partnership with NASA.

Government  Accountability  Office  (GAO)  Recommendations  for  Executive

Action

GAO  has  provided  regular  reviews  of  the  NPOESS  Program  and  we  appreciate
the  perspective  GAO  professionals  provide.  We  have  met  with  GAO  and  provided
information and feedback on its most recent report and believe that existing efforts
underway will support the closure of these recommendations.
Recommendation number one: In order to bring closure to efforts that have been
underway for years, we are making recommendations to the Secretaries of Commerce
and  Defense  and  to  the  Administrator  of  NASA  to  establish  plans  on  whether  and
how  to  restore  the  climate  and  space  sensors  removed  from  the  NPOESS  Program
by June 2009, in cases where the sensors are warranted and justified.

NOAA concurs with the recommendation and continues to work with OSTP, OMB,
NASA,  and  the  climate  science  community  to  restore  the  climate  sensors  that  were
demanifested from the NPOESS Program in 2006. While the NPOESS Program con-
tinues  to  face  challenges,  the  tri-agency  NPOESS  EXCOM,  on  the  advice  of  the
NPOESS  Program  Executive  Officer,  approved  remanifesting  OMPS–Limb  and
CERES  onto  NPP,  and  remanifesting  TSIS  onto  the  first  NPOESS  C–1  satellite.
Meeting  the  required  deadlines  to  integrate  these  instruments  onto  NPP  and
NPOESS C–1 requires full funding of the DOC/NOAA and DOD/Air Force NPOESS
Program,  and  the  NOAA  climate  sensor  and  climate  data  record  budget  requests.
An FY 2009 continuing resolution that did not provide full funding for the $74 mil-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

36

lion  for  climate  sensors  would  threaten  the  development  of  the  TSIS  and  CERES
sensors  and  potentially  put  into  question  whether  they  would  be  ready  for  integra-
tion  onto  the  NPOESS  C–1  mission.  Restoration  of  the  other  measurements  will
occur in the later years, as previously discussed.

Restoration  of  the  space  weather  sensors  is  being  modeled  after  the  collaborative
interagency process with OSTP and OMB that was used to assess the demanifested
climate sensors. NOAA continues to work closely with user communities affected by
space  weather  to  ensure  that  its  plans  address  user  requirements.  NOAA  is  also
working  closely  with  NASA  to  maximize  the  utility  of  the  ACE  satellite.  In  the  in-
terim,  NOAA  has  requested  input  from  the  aerospace  industry  and  several  sug-
gested concepts and proposals are being evaluated as potential commercial opportu-
nities  for  data  purchases,  secondary  payload  opportunities,  and  commercially  pro-
vided satellites to meet projected NOAA observational requirements.
Recommendation  number  two:  In  addition,  we  are  reemphasizing  our  prior  rec-
ommendation that the appropriate NASA, NOAA, DOD executives immediately final-
ize key acquisition documents.

NOAA concurs with this recommendation and has been working with the tri-agen-
cy  NPOESS  EXCOM  to  reach  the  agreements  required  to  complete  the  six  out-
standing  Acquisition  Decision  Memorandum  documents.  Recently,  the  Under  Sec-
retary  of  Defense  for  Acquisition,  Technology,  and  Logistics  issued  an  extension
until August 2008 to complete the documents. The NPOESS Program Executive Of-
ficer  has  made  completing  this  task  one  of  his  top  priorities  and  the  EXCOM  Prin-
cipals and their staffs are supporting his efforts.

Conclusion

In  conclusion,  I  appreciate  the  Committee’s  continued  interest  in  the  success  of
NOAA’s  satellite  programs.  It  is  widely  acknowledged  that  satellites  are  very  com-
plicated and difficult systems to design, build, and operate. However, their capabili-
ties  play  a  key  role  in  NOAA’s  mission  to  observe  and  predict  the  Earth’s  environ-
ment and to provide critical information used in protecting life and property.

We are making significant strides in developing better processes for designing and
acquiring  our  satellites.  We  currently  have  well  functioning  operational  satellites
with backup systems in place, and we are working on the next generation that will
provide significant improvements in our ability to forecast the weather and monitor
the climate. I would be happy to answer any questions you may have.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

37

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

38

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

BIOGRAPHY FOR VICE ADMIRAL CONRAD C. LAUTENBACHER, JR., NAVY (RET.)

39

A native of Philadelphia, Pa., retired Navy Vice Admiral Conrad C. Lautenbacher,
Ph.D.,  is  serving  as  the  Under  Secretary  of  Commerce  for  Oceans  and  Atmosphere.
He  was  appointed  Dec.  19,  2001.  Along  with  this  title  comes  the  added  distinction
of serving as the eighth Administrator of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Ad-
ministration. He holds an M.S. and Ph.D. from Harvard University in applied math-
ematics.

Lautenbacher  oversees  the  day-to-day  functions  of  NOAA,  as  well  as  laying  out
its  strategic  and  operational  future.  The  agency  manages  an  annual  budget  of  $4
billion.  The  agency  includes,  and  is  comprised  of,  the  National  Environmental  Sat-
ellite,  Data  and  Information  Services;  National  Marine  Fisheries  Service;  National
Ocean  Service;  National  Weather  Service;  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Research;  Ma-
rine and Aviation Operations; and the NOAA Corps, the Nation’s seventh uniformed
service. He directed an extensive review and reorganization of the NOAA corporate
structure to meet the environmental challenges of the 21st century.

As  the  NOAA  administrator,  Lautenbacher  spearheaded  the  first-ever  Earth  Ob-
servation Summit, which hosted ministerial-level representation from several dozen
of  the  world’s  nations  in  Washington  July  2003.  Through  subsequent  international
summits  and  working  groups,  he  worked  to  encourage  world  scientific  and  policy
leaders to work toward a common goal of building a sustained Global Earth Obser-
vation  System  of  Systems  (GEOSS)  that  would  collect  and  disseminate  data,  infor-
mation and models to stakeholders and decision-makers for the benefit of all nations
individually  and  the  world  community  collectively.  The  effort  culminated  in  an
agreement for a 10-year implementation plan for GEOSS reached by the 55 member
countries  of  the  Group  on  Earth  Observations  at  the  Third  Observation  Summit
held in Brussels February 2005.

He also has headed numerous delegations at international governmental summits
and conferences around the world, including the U.S. delegation to 2002 Asia-Pacific
Economic  Cooperation  Ocean  Ministerial  Meeting  in  Korea,  and  2002  and  2003
meetings  of  the  World  Meteorological  Organization  and  Intergovernmental  Oceano-
graphic  Commission  in  Switzerland  and  France,  as  well  as  leading  the  Commerce
delegation to the 2002 World Summit on Sustainable Development in South Africa.
Before joining NOAA, Lautenbacher formed his own management consultant busi-
ness,  and  worked  principally  for  Technology,  Strategies  &  Alliances  Inc.  He  was
president  and  CEO  of  the  Consortium  for  Oceanographic  Research  and  Education
(CORE).  This  not-for-profit  organization  has  a  membership  of  76  institutions  of
higher learning and a mission to increase basic knowledge and public support across
the spectrum of ocean sciences.

Lautenbacher  is  a  graduate  of  the  U.S.  Naval  Academy  (Class  of  1964),  and  has
won  accolades  for  his  performance  in  a  broad  range  of  operational,  command  and
staff  positions  both  ashore  and  afloat.  He  retired  after  40  years  of  service  in  the
Navy. His military career was marked by skilled fiscal management and significant
improvements in operations through performance-based evaluations of processes.

During  his  time  in  the  Navy,  he  was  selected  as  a  Federal  Executive  Fellow  and
served  at  the  Brookings  Institution.  He  served  as  a  guest  lecturer  on  numerous  oc-
casions at the Naval War College, the Army War College, the Air War College, The
Fletcher  School  of  Diplomacy,  and  the  components  of  the  National  Defense  Univer-
sity.

His  Navy  experience  includes  tours  as  Commanding  Officer  of  USS  HEWITT
(DD–966),  Commander  Naval  Station  Norfolk;  Commander  of  Cruiser-Destroyer
Group  Five  with  additional  duties  as  Commander  U.S.  Naval  Forces  Central  Com-
mand  Riyadh  during  Operations  Desert  Shield  and  Desert  Storm,  where  he  was  in
charge of Navy planning and participation in the air campaign. As Commander U.S.
Third Fleet, he introduced joint training to the Pacific with the initiation of the first
West Coast Joint Task Force Training Exercises (JTFEXs).

A  leader  in  the  introduction  of  cutting-edge  information  technology,  he  pioneered
the  use  of  information  technology  to  mount  large-scale  operations  using  sea-based
command and control. As Assistant for Strategy with the Chief of Naval Operations
Executive  Panel,  and  Program  Planning  Branch  Head  in  the  Navy  Program  Plan-
ning  Directorate,  he  continued  to  hone  his  analytic  skills  resulting  in  designation
as  a  specialist  both  in  Operations  Analysis  and  Financial  Management.  During  his
final tour of duty, he served as Deputy Chief of Naval Operations (Resources, War-
fare Requirements and Assessments) in charge of Navy programs and budget.

Lautenbacher  lives  in  Northern  Virginia  with  his  wife  Susan  who  is  a  life-long

high school and middle school science teacher.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

40

DISCUSSION

EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE PERFORMANCE

Chairman  LAMPSON.  Thank  you,  Admiral  Lautenbacher.  Let  us
start with Mr. Powner and then go to the discussion about the Ex-
ecutive  Committee.  This  committee  has  been  told  that  the  Execu-
tive  Committee  represents  the  group  responsible  for  the  top  deci-
sions in the NPOESS program. We have had many concerns about
the EXCOM performance. You have seen the EXCOM in operation.
What,  to  you,  explains  the  repeated  difficulty  in  getting  decisions
made on the NPOESS issues?

Mr.  POWNER.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  think  when  we  look  at  these  key
acquisition  documents,  the  one  area  where  we  want  to  fault  the
program  is  the  Executive  Committee.  The  Executive  Committee
was put in place to ensure that we work appropriately across orga-
nizational  boundaries.  We  have  different  cultures,  we  have  dif-
ferent  bureaucratic  processes.  We  are  running  into  that,  but  that
is  still  no  excuse.  The  Executive  Committee  needs  to  step  up  and
to  ensure  that  these  key  acquisition  documents  get  signed.  I  think
the  threat  from  DOD  is  not  a  bad  thing  given  that  we  now  have
this  August  deadline  to  get  these  signed,  but  DOD  is  equally  at
fault  here.  I  mean,  almost  every  one  of  the  documents  they  men-
tion in their memo are waiting approval at DOD.

Chairman  LAMPSON.  At  just  the  one  agency,  Department  of  De-

fense?

Mr.  POWNER.  No,  there  is  also—we  had  information  as  of  two
days  ago,  and  there  were  still  some  documents  in  the  Department
of Commerce that needed approval also. So we have multiple orga-
nizations that need to agree to these documents and to ensure that
they get signed off so that we can move forward. And it is key that
we  have  interagency  agreement  here.  And  one  of  these  documents
is  the  approved  baseline.  You  know,  there  is  a  fundamental  ques-
tion about what baseline are we working off and when are we going
to  start  the  clock  ticking  for  perhaps,  you  know,  measurement  for
the next Nunn-McCurdy decision. Right now, we don’t have a base-
line that we are marching off of right now.

Chairman  LAMPSON.  Is  it  the  individuals  who  sit  on  the  Com-
mittee or is it the culture of the agencies that is preventing the in-
dividuals  who  are  sitting  on  the  Committee  from  being  able  to
make these decisions?

Mr.  POWNER.  Both.  I  think  the  individuals  on  the  Executive
Committee  were  put  in  place  to  work  within  their  organizations,
but  clearly,  I  am  sure  the  Admiral  would  agree,  there  are  individ-
uals above him at both organizations where there has been a hang-
up.  But  still,  that  is  no  excuse  for  the  Executive  Committee  not  to
step  up  and  work  upwards  to  get  these  key  documents  approved.
Chairman  LAMPSON.  Admiral,  in  the  period  leading  up  to  the
Nunn-McCurdy  restructuring  of  NPOESS,  this  committee  exam-
ined  a  good  bit  of  the  communications  that  went  from  the  Inte-
grated  Program  Office  to  the  EXCOM.  We  became  concerned  be-
cause  it  appeared  that  at  a  time  when  the  program  needed  firm
leadership,  the  EXCOM  regularly  postponed  decisions,  if  it  met  at
all.  The  Department’s  Inspector  General  determined  that  the
EXCOM  did  not  challenge  optimistic  statements  by  the  program

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

41

manager  even  as  the  VIIRS  instrument  fell  further  behind  sched-
ule  and  grew  in  cost.  You  testified  to  the  Committee  at  a  hearing
two years ago that there would be quarterly EXCOM meetings, and
you  ‘‘insisted  that  management  processes  must  be  made  more
transparent and auditable and strengthened at all levels.’’ Has the
Executive Committee reverted to their old habits?

Vice  Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  No,  we  have  not.  There  has  been
significant  changes  made  in  the  process  as  a  result  of  the  Nunn-
McCurdy  review  and  the  steps  that  we  actually  took  before  the
Nunn-McCurdy  review  began.  I  am  happy  to  go  through—we  have
agreed  and  we  have  bent  schedules  and  made  sure  that  we  have
had  quarterly  meetings,  whether  we  needed  one  or  not.  They  are
auditable, they are trackable, and I am happy to provide the record
of all the decisions that were made. There have been nine EXCOMs
since  that  particular  meeting.  There  have  been  over  40  decisions
made to ensure this program stays on track in a timely and mean-
ingful manner. There have been dozens of phone calls and personal
interactions to deal with this. This is a program that in my experi-
ence  in  40  years  of  working  in  the  Navy  and  seven  years,  I  have
never  seen  this  level  of  detail  and  involvement  at  the  agency-head
level  in  the  individual  management  of  a  program  that  is  taking
place  in  NPOESS.  So  this  is  providing—we  have  provided  a  base-
line for continual dialogue. It still is a difficult program to manage
because  of  the  three  agencies.  You  mentioned  the  culture  before.
But  I  want  to  iterate  that  the  issue  with  this  program  is  not  nec-
essarily  the  management  structure  at  this  point,  it  is  contractor
performance  on  a  particular  instrument  called  VIIRS,  and  that  is
where  we  are  focusing  our  attention  and  that  is  the  issue  that
needs  to  be  solved  to  make  this  program  come  around  and  be  on
schedule  and  meet  the  needs.  And  we  are  focused  intently  on  get-
ting that system in place.

Chairman  LAMPSON.  Do  you  agree  with  that,  Mr.  Powner,  that

that is the primary or the single——

Mr.  POWNER.  I  agree  that  the  performance  of  VIIRS  is  the  larg-
est  question  mark  on  this  program.  However,  the  threat  to  with-
holding  funding  with  these  documents  not  being  signed  is  a  big
issue.  If  in  fact  funds  are  withheld  for  fiscal  year  2009,  it  has  a
devastating affect because of the matching that needs to occur with
the  NOAA  funding  portion.  So  I  agree  that  VIIRS  is  the  number
one  problem  in  contractor  performance,  but  now  that  we  got  this
new wrinkle with DOD throwing in the threat to withhold funding,
this is a big deal.

Chairman  LAMPSON.  Okay.  My  time  is  up  in  just  a  few  seconds,
so I am going to hold my question for a minute, and I will now rec-
ognize the Ranking Member, Mr. Inglis for five minutes.

CONTINUITY CONCERNS

Mr. INGLIS. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. A couple of key questions.
I suppose one is cost which you have been discussing. The other is
continuity,  and  Admiral,  you  are  confident  that  we  have  got  con-
tinuity in spite of this delay, is that correct?

Vice  Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  Yes,  I  am  confident  we  have  the
continuity.  There  has  been  a  delay  in  NPP,  but  the  systems  that
are  in  place  today,  and  the  N–Prime  satellite  which  has  not  been

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

42

launched yet, which will be launched after next year, will last long
enough  to  cover  the  gap.  There  has  been  no  effect  on  the  C–1
launch.  So  the  satellites  that  we  have  to  launch  to  have  available
for  coverage  are  sufficient  to  cover  the  time  until  the  C–1  instru-
ments are launched in 2013.

Mr. INGLIS. At some point we start getting, if we try to cross this
intersection,  we  get  to  a  yellow  light  and  in  squeezing  the  orange
here  at  some  point  we  are  going  to  get  the  red  light.  So  when  is
the—we  are  still  safely—it  is  a  green  light,  is  that  right?  We  are
not even in the yellow yet?

Vice  Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  We  are  still  safely  in  the  green
light given the Nunn-McCurdy review that we had. Remember, we
had  to  delay  the  program  because  of  the  initial  manufacturing
problems with the VIIRS instruments. This instrument has experi-
enced problems across the whole, and let me say that versus what
the  EXCOM  has  been  doing,  that  I  have  been  personally  on  this
VIIRS issue since I took over this job and have been beating up on
the  contractors  and  the  program  office  to  deal  with  VIIRS.  So  it  is
not  an  unknown  problem  to  the  EXCOM,  and  the  EXCOM  has
been involved in working on trying to resolve problems with VIIRS
for  a  long,  long  time.  So  it  is  not  an  issue  that  there  is  absentee
management from a government perspective on the issue.

But  given  that  statement,  the  change  in  the  delay  of  NPP  will
not affect the continuity of our system at this point. There is suffi-
cient overlap of the satellites that we have in orbit and stocked up
to continue our coverage as we have today.

Mr.  INGLIS.  Mr.  Powner,  does  GAO  agree  as  we  approach  this
continuity  intersection,  the  light  is  still  green,  we  are  not  running
the yellow yet or——

Mr.  POWNER.  Yeah,  we  would  agree  with  that.  I  think  the  key
deadlines  of  NPP  now  is  a  June  2010  date,  and  then  C–1  is  Janu-
ary  2013.  If  those  start  to  slip,  then  it  is  another  story  and  there
is a new ball game here.

The  other  thing,  too,  is  if  NPP  would  slip—that  was  a  dem-
onstration satellite that we were to learn and incorporate that into
further builds. So if that would happen to slip, you lose that oppor-
tunity to incorporate those lessons learned.

Mr. INGLIS. So this is good news in that we are—it is a very im-
portant project that is going to provide important data for military
and  civilian  purposes.  So  we  have  got  continuity  covered,  and  that
is good.

How  about—it  seems  a  little  bit  funny  for  DOD  to—maybe  a
good defense is a good offense—no, a good offense is a good defense
I  guess  is  what  it  is.  Maybe  what  they  are  trying  to  do  is  just—
if  they  have  the  documents  and  they  are  not  working,  not  moving
them,  then  what  is  the  deal  on  that?  Anybody  got  an  observation
about why they are being critical even though they may be holding
the documents?

Vice  Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  If  I  could  respond  for  a  minute,  I
have been very vocal,k publicly and privately, about the need to get
these  documents  done.  And  I  expressed  to  DOD  that  I  would  like
some  help  in  getting  these  things  signed  because  many  of  the
issues that need to be resolved are at offices that are above my pay
grade. And so this is one of the results of that; these kinds—I don’t

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

43

want to call it a threat but I am hoping there is enough attention.
I  do  not  believe  this  is  an  EXCOM  issue  directly,  although  we  are
responsible  for  it  and  I  am  going  to  work  this  until  the  last  ‘‘i’’  is
dotted  and  ‘‘t’’  is  crossed  on  it.  But  we  are  not  lacking  from  the
EXCOM  perspective  in  trying  to  press  the  system  to  sign  off  on
these documents.

And I would tell you that the progress that we have made, what
is  left  to  deal  with  on  these  documents  is  not  critical  to  making
progress on this program. I can go through each one of these docu-
ments  and  explain  that  to  you  if  you  wish  at  this  point.  But  we
have  created—16  of  these  documents,  are  signed,  delivered,  and
working.  We  have  a  full  schedule,  we  have  a  contract  signed,  we
have  monitors  in  progress,  we  have  earned  value,  we  have  all  of
the  pieces  that  we  need  to  make  progress  day-to-day  on  this  pro-
gram  and  meet  schedules.  What  is  left  are  important  documents.
They  need  to  be  signed,  and  I  don’t  disagree  with  that;  and  I  am
going  to  work  extremely  hard  to  try  to  make  this  deadline,  and  I
am pleased that Mr. Young is interested in making a deadline, too.
I  called  their  office  this  morning  to  make  sure  they  were  on-board
with  this,  and  that  is  the  word  I  got  back.  So  I  hope  with  this  in-
centive  there  would  be  more  pressure  to  move  the  final  wording,
and there are only a few small points that are left from these docu-
ments to deal with.

Mr. INGLIS. My time has expired. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Chairman  LAMPSON.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Inglis.  And  I  recognize  Mr.

McNerney for five minutes.

Mr.  MCNERNEY.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Admiral,  one  of  the
things that you said that really stuck me was that you have never
seen agency-head involvement at this level of detail. Now, my expe-
rience  in  industry  is  when  management  gets  involved  in  the  de-
tails, it has a tendency to make things worse, and I certainly think
there is an opportunity for that here. What is your opinion on that?
Vice Admiral LAUTENBACHER. I think that is a good observation,
and  I  have  tried  to  be  careful  to  do  this  in  a  way  to  not  undercut
the  expertise  and  the  value  of  the  people  put  in  place  to  make  the
decisions  at  the  right  level.  I  have  been  involved  in  this  business
for a long time, too. I came to Washington in 1971, I have been an
independent  cost  estimator,  I  have  run  programs,  I  have  been  a
budgeteer, I have looked at management oversight over a wide va-
riety of programs in the Navy, and I am very sensitive to the com-
ment  that  you  just  made.  When  I  say  being  involved,  what  I  am
talking  about  is  being  briefed  and  being  cognizant  of  it,  making
sure that as we make decisions we know as much in depth as pos-
sible  in  the  time  allotted  to  do  it.  I  have  not  tried  to  interfere.  I
can’t speak for my contemporaries, but I have not tried to interfere
in  micro-management  that  I  believe  would  be  counterproductive  to
the smooth operation of the program.

Mr.  MCNERNEY.  Well,  you  just  said  you  weren’t  involved  in
micro-management,  but  does  the  progress  with  the  documents,  is
that also taking place at the highest levels——

Vice Admiral LAUTENBACHER. It is.
Mr. MCNERNEY.—of the agency?
Vice  Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  It  is.  Well,  first  of  all,  I  brief  the
Deputy Secretary of Commerce every week on the full status of this

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

44

program, including the documents. I also have, internal to my orga-
nization,  the  Program  Management  Council,  with  my  Chief  Oper-
ating  Officer,  that  goes  through  the  status  at  least  monthly.  I  go
through  a  monthly  full  up-status  with  my  staff  on  what  is  going
on.  So  I  understand  what  is  happening,  and  I  push  people  when
they  need  to  be  pushed  and  I  try  to  keep  this  working.  Otherwise,
we  wouldn’t  have  gotten  the  16  of  the  22  signed  that  we  have  or
be as close as we are on the last six.

THE VIIRS SENSOR

Mr. MCNERNEY. Thank you. As a scientist, I want to ask a little
bit  about  the  VIIRS  sensor,  but  I  am  afraid  I  am  going  to  run  out
of  time  before  you  could  give  me  a  good  explanation  of  that.  You
mentioned  that  you  got  a  call  last  night  that  indicated  that  that
was going to be deliverable on time now.
Vice Admiral LAUTENBACHER. Yes, sir.
Mr. MCNERNEY. How confident are you of that result, of that in-

formation?

Vice Admiral LAUTENBACHER. As with all information that comes
in without sufficient time to sit on it and to look at it and examine
it,  I  always  reserve  the  right  to  make  sure  that  it  is  correct.  We
have  asked  for  a  full  court  press  obviously  in  this  particular  issue
because I view it as a serious one to look at what needs to be done
to  ensure  that  the  fasteners  are  correctly  in  place  and  will  main-
tain  the  integrity  during  the  testing  phase  which  is  where  we  are
now. A full court press was put on, day and night, looking—we sent
our own people out there as well as—when I say, government peo-
ple  as  well  as  the  manufacturer’s  people,  to  look  at  it,  and  this  is
the  report.  We  asked  them  to  do  it  as  quickly  as  possible  because
we  reported  to  the  Committee  and  I  wanted  to  have  an  answer
today for you on where we stand on that, sir.

Mr. MCNERNEY. Mr. Powner, do you share his level of confidence

with regard to the delivery of that sensor?

Mr. POWNER. This is new information for us in terms of with the
latest problem. The concern with VIIRS is this: every time you turn
around and look at VIIRS, there is another manufacturing or tech-
nical  problem,  and  there  has  been  a  history  of  that.  So  I  think  we
are  far  from  being  out  of  the  woods  on  VIIRS,  and  it  still  is  the
number one concern on this program.

Mr. MCNERNEY. Thank you. I yield back.
Chairman LAMPSON. Thank you, Mr. McNerney. Dr. Bartlett, you

are recognized for five minutes.

THE GAP BETWEEN SATELLITE LAUNCHES

Mr. BARTLETT. Thank you very much. A couple of years ago, Ad-
miral,  when  we  had  an  oversight  Subcommittee  hearing  on  this
issue,  there  was  some  major  concern  that  the  delays  in  launching
these  satellites  were  going  to  result  in  a  lapse  of  coverage.  What
has happened to fill that gap?

Vice Admiral LAUTENBACHER. Obviously we have come down the
road more than two years now. The satellite launches that we have
scheduled  for  continuity  have  worked  basically,  so  we  have  two
years  more  of  experience  that  we  have  satellites  in  orbit  that  are

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

45

operating  and  providing  us  the  information.  So  we  have  more  con-
fidence  because  we  actually  have  hardware  in  the  air  that  is  func-
tioning. So issues that could have caused an absence of information
coming from space have been covered by the fact that we have been
successful  in  the  program  that  we  predicted  we  would  be  able  to
execute two years ago.

Mr. BARTLETT. There are two general reasons for the delays here.
One  is  the  coordination  difficulties  with  this  tri-agency.  The  other
is  that  we  have  done  here  what  we  so  often  do  in  DOD  and  that
is that we push the envelope, and we never come to the point that
says this is good enough. We have really pretty good weather data
that has been coming in now for a number of years. Which of these
has  been  the  primary  reason  for  the  problems  here?  Has  it  been
the  difficulties  coordinating  three  very  different  agencies  or  has  it
been  that  we  just  were  too  optimistic  about  what  could  be  done
with this technology?

Vice  Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  I  believe  it  is  the  latter,  sir.  I  be-
lieve that we have been optimistic about the technology. The VIIRS
instrument,  for  instance,  was  supposed  to  be  modeled  after  the
MODIS8 instrument, which was an R&D instrument that has been
working in space as an R&D instrument, not as an operational in-
strument.  And  people  felt  that,  well,  if  we  did  this  much  with
MODIS,  we  could  do  this  much  with  VIIRS;  and  we  already  sort
of built MODIS, so let us build a bigger VIIRS. It hasn’t been test-
ed, so it is a new instrument and it is having the same issues that
we  always  have  when  we  try  to  develop  something  new.  I  have
been  a  proponent  of  doing  more  testing  and  incremental  ap-
proaches  to  our  capability  to  ensure  that  we  have  continuity,  and
I think that is why we are where we are. That is one of the prime
reasons we are where we are.

Mr.  BARTLETT.  It  is  axiomatic,  I  think,  that  industry  is  going  to
be  perhaps  overly  optimistic  about  what  they  can  do  because  they
are in the mode of selling, and they are going to win if they prom-
ise  more.  And  frequently  they  promise  more  than  can  be  realisti-
cally  delivered.  I  worked  for  five  years  for  an  agency  in  the  Navy
that was kind of an honest broker. That was at the Johns Hopkins
University  Applied  Physics  Lab,  and  that  lab  never  competes  with
industry  so  industries  share  their  deepest  proprietary  secrets.  But
what  the  lab  does  is  to  tell  the  Navy,  now  more  broadly  the  mili-
tary and NASA, this is probably going to work, this is probably not
going to work.

For  programs  like  this,  who  do  we  have  to  turn  to  ask  them,  is
it realistic to expect that industry really can do what they promised
to do?

Vice  Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  We  have  the  ability  to  go  to  a
number  of  the  FFRDCs9 or  independent—we  go—John  Hopkins  is
obviously  a  place  where  we  can  go,  and  we  have  used  John  Hop-
kins  to  help  NOAA.  I  won’t  speak  for  the  other  agencies  that  are
involved here. And we also use the Aerospace Corporation. We use
Noblis company to deal with some of these issues. NOAA uses inde-
pendent  advice  to  look  at  the  feasibility  of  moving  it  into  the  fu-

8 Moderate Resolution Imaging Spectroradiometer
9 Federally-Funded Research and Development Centers

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

46

ture.  Now,  I  want  to  say  your  question  is  a  very  important  one.
With  one  of  the  issues  that  the  decisions  that  were  made  was  to
delay  what  is  called  the  CMIS10 or  the  MIS11 instrument  because
we  believe  it  was  exactly  the  same  problem  we  would  have  with
VIIRS.  So  we  delayed  that  instrument.  What  we  are  doing  with
that instrument—so we revised the specs on it. We are engaging—
we  had  competition,  if  you  want  to  call  it  that,  with  FFRDCs  to
give  us  the  best  proposal  to  design  something  that  would  work,
based  on  technology  that  has  already  been  proven,  and  the  Naval
Research  Laboratory—NRL—is  now  building  a  prototype  for  us
which  will  transfer  the  technology  to  an  industry  partner  to  build
it  with  hopefully  a  lot  less  risk  and  more  assurity  that  when  that
instrument goes on C–2, it will work and it will be within cost and
schedule. So I think your comments are very pertinent.
Mr. BARTLETT. Thank you. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.

MORE ON THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE’S PERFORMANCE

Chairman LAMPSON. Thank you, Dr. Bartlett. The Chair will rec-

ognize himself for the next five minutes.

Admiral,  the  Committee  appreciates  receiving  the  presentation
on  the  alternative  management  study  which  your  staff  was  kind
enough  to  send  us  last  night  at  10:24.  I  note  that  the  team  con-
vened  to  evaluate  changes  said  this,  ‘‘EXCOM  is  too  senior  to  pro-
vide the routine immediate assistance often needed at this stage of
a program.’’ That seems to say that EXCOM isn’t adding any value
to  the  NPOESS  management.  Can  you  comment  on  that,  please?
Would you agree?

Vice  Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  Could  you  read—I  am  not  sure.  I
would  have  to  get  the  context  of  that.  Obviously,  there  are  many
things that we probably—as brought up in the previous questioning
about  micro-management  and  various  things.  What  is  the  par-
ticular  reference  there  because  I  think  we  are—we  should  play  in
the  alternative  management  study  in  terms  of  the  strategies  that
are used for the future. I want to make sure I understand what you
are——

Chairman LAMPSON. It is in a chart——
Vice Admiral LAUTENBACHER. Okay.
Chairman  LAMPSON.—talking  about  the  existing  program  struc-

ture.

Vice Admiral LAUTENBACHER. And it says?
Chairman LAMPSON. EXCOM is too senior to provide the routine

immediate assistance often needed at this stage of the program.

Vice  Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  And  I  would  have  to  look  at  the
chart.  Let  me  discuss  the  philosophy  and  what  is  involved  with
that and what is involved with the EXCOM.

First  of  all,  EXCOM  sounds  like  it  is  a  bad  title  from  an  old
science fiction movie. It is not some magic deal, it is just the agen-
cy  heads.  So  it  is  the  agency  heads  that  are  responsible  for  these
programs.

Chairman  LAMPSON.  But  it  is  those  people  who  are  supposed  to

make the management decisions to move this thing forward.

10 Conical-Scanning Microwave Imager and Sounder
11 Microwave Imager/Sounder

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

47

Vice  Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  Yes,  it  is,  and  at  that  level.  So
there  is  always  an  issue  of  what—and  in  fact,  when  we  have  had
this  issue  of  where  the  acquisition  authority  milestone  ought  to  be
in  the  Department  of  Commerce,  it  would  be  with  the  Secretary.
Our  independent  review  said,  it  probably  should  not  be  with  the
Secretary  because  he  does  not  have  the  time  or  the  ability  to  be
able to deal at the levels needed to add value to that. So it should
be  at  a  lower  level,  and  it  came  down.  It  was  at  my  level  that  it
was put.

So there are always questions as to what levels decisions should
be made. We have tried to balance the decisions with the informa-
tion that comes up, and you have to be careful not to micro-manage
areas where you may not have enough information to be able to do
it. So in this particular one, I have to go back and look at this chart
to be sure. I am not sure what this chart is exactly trying to imply.
Chairman  LAMPSON.  Well,  I  would  imagine  that  something
wouldn’t  make  it  to  this  committee  unless  the  lower  level  needed
the help of that decision and couldn’t go forward——

Vice Admiral LAUTENBACHER. Right.
Chairman LAMPSON.—in the event that it didn’t have it. I would
hope  that  they  would  be  asking  those  things  that  they  most  criti-
cally need of the EXCOM and be able to move forward from there.

ACQUISITION DOCUMENT APPROVAL

You  testified  that  gaining  concurrence  on  the  NPOESS  acquisi-
tion  documents  has  been  challenging  to  coordinate  through  a  tri-
agency  process.  What  precisely  are  the  areas  of  disagreement  that
have stretched this process out for more than a year?

Vice  Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  You  have  to  walk  a  mile  in  my
moccasins  before  you  can  really  understand  this,  and  it  is  hard  to
say, ‘‘Well, why isn’t this done?’’

There are a number of offices in each bureaucracy that deal with
this.  So  there  are  at  least  five  big  bureaucracies.  There  is  the  De-
partment  of  Commerce,  above  my  pay  grade,  the  Department  of
Defense  above  the  pay  grade—above  the  Air  Force.  Then  there  is
the Department of the Air Force. Those are big departments. They
have  their  own  lawyers,  they  have  their  own  acquisition  program
management  structures,  they  have  their  own  connections  with  the
operating  forces—Space  Command—that  comes  in  and  kibitzes  on
each one of these. Their comments come up and down these various
levels,  then  they  come  across  to  us  to  see  if  we  agree.  We  turn
around  as  quickly  as  we  can  and  get  them  back  over  there.  So  by
the time you work this process——

Chairman  LAMPSON.  Let  me  interrupt.  I  have  got  less  than  a

minute left.

Vice Admiral LAUTENBACHER. Yes, sir.
Chairman  LAMPSON.  Talk  about  some—you  said  you  have  the

documents that show some of those differences.

Vice Admiral LAUTENBACHER. Yes.
Chairman LAMPSON. Tell us what——
Vice  Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  Let  me  tell  you  where  we  are.
First  of  all,  as  I  have  said  before,  these  documents  that  are  not
signed with the ‘‘i’s’’ dotted and ‘‘t’s’’ crossed yet are not holding up

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

48

that is.

progress  on  this  program,  are  not  affecting  our  ability  to  manage
it and create the progress that we need.

Chairman LAMPSON. Okay, but give me an example of something

Vice Admiral LAUTENBACHER. Okay. I’m sorry, say again?
Chairman LAMPSON. An example of something that is.
Vice  Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  I  don’t  have  any  examples  on  this
list  that  are.  The  seven—and  if  you  count  the  alternative  manage-
ment  study,  I  have  already  explained  that  we  are  doing  an  alter-
native  management  study  and  that  is  a  decision  to  be  made  in
2010.

Chairman  LAMPSON.  What  is  the  disagreement  then  in  the

Memorandum of Agreement?

Vice  Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  Okay.  In  the  Memorandum  of
Agreement?  In  the  Memorandum  of  Agreement,  it  is  about  trying
to  define  the  authority  of  the  Acquisition  Executive  in  DOD.  DOD
is  the  acquisition  authority.  We  work  under  their  contract  rules.
And  this  is  an  internal  DOD  issue  to  line  up  the  ‘‘i’s’’  and  ‘‘t’s’’  to
make  sure  the  lawyers—this  is  being  massaged  by  lawyers  at  this
point—to  ensure  that  the  wording  is  exactly  correct.  Now,  I  want
to  point  out  that  the  Memorandum  of  Agreement—there  is  a
Memorandum  of  Agreement  in  place  and  we  are  working  under  it.
We worked under it for the Nunn-McCurdy, and it is effective. And
we  follow  all  the  rules,  and  we  are  trying  to  make  a  couple  of
changes to it.

Chairman  LAMPSON.  Okay.  Does  it  need  to  be  changed  because

of Nunn-McCurdy?

Vice Admiral LAUTENBACHER. It does. It does need——
Chairman LAMPSON. But when will it be?
Vice  Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  I  have  to  defer  to  the  Department
of  Defense  on  that.  We  are  under  the  gun  to  do  this  by  the  end  of
August.  I  am  going  to  do  everything  I  can  to  have  them  get  this
finished.

Chairman LAMPSON. Okay. You can’t force them to do it.
Vice Admiral LAUTENBACHER. I can’t force——
Chairman  LAMPSON.  What  does  it  take  to  make  them  do  it?  Do

we have to take action?

hope that there is enough——

Vice  Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  I  certainly  hope  not.  I  certainly

Chairman  LAMPSON.  Okay.  The  award  fee  plan  is  awaiting  the

Commerce Department decision. What is the problem with that?

Vice  Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  It  is  the  Fee  Management  Plan.
First  of  all,  award  fees  are  done,  taken  care  of.  The  Fee  Manage-
ment Plan—there is one concern left from NASA, and their concern
is  to  talk  about  the  specific  issues  on  on-orbit  performance,  some-
thing way down the road. The Fee Management Plan—we have put
in place a much stronger fee management plan. It has been agreed
to  in  the  contract,  agreed  to  by—this  was,  remember,  a  complaint
that  we  got  several  years  ago  that  you  are  not  pushing  the  con-
tractor  enough.  So  remember,  that  has  totally  changed,  agreed  to,
and is in operation today. So that is not an issue. So the Fee Man-
agement Plan on which we are operating and forcing control by the
contractor is in place. This is about something that is in the future.
We expect this to be done very shortly. In fact, the word I have this

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

49

Inglis.

morning, like the technical issue that I mentioned, is that the con-
cerns  are  done  and  this  is  ready  to  be  signed.  It  will  be  signed
today  or  tomorrow.  I  was  hoping  it  would  be  signed  before  we  got
here, but it is just about done.

Chairman  LAMPSON.  Okay.  Let  me  pass  another  round  to  Mr.

Mr. INGLIS. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. Mr. Powner, do you agree
with the Admiral that the documents are not likely to—the lack of
the documents being signed is not holding us up at this point?

Mr. POWNER. Well, clearly, I think there are some items in those
documents  that  are  important,  but  what  we  know,  a  lot  of  these
are  minor  issues.  This  is  bureaucracy  at  its  worst.  I  mean,  these
are  things  that  need  to  get  signed  and  especially  now  that  there
is  a  threat  to  future  funding  of  the  program.  These  are  items  that
we  need.  One  other  thing  with  the  EXCOM.  If  we  have  a  bureau-
cratic  process,  the  executives  are  put  in  place  to  work  through  the
bureaucracy  and  to  get  things  done.  That  is  what  executives  do,
whether it is below you, above you, or at your level. And so again,
I just want to reiterate that I think the executives need to step up
and ensure that these key documents get signed.

Mr. INGLIS. I am trying to figure out why the DOD would threat-
en  to  withdraw  or  threaten  to  not  meet  the  payment  schedule  or
withdraw  funding.  They  have  as  much  interest  in  this  as  NOAA
does,  right?  And  if  they  are  in  fact  holding  the  documents,  I  am
still mystified by that.

Mr.  POWNER.  That  circular  argument  is  perplexing,  although  I
will  add  if  you  look  back  on  the  history  of  the  NPOESS  program,
there are times when some of DOD’s actions, and I mentioned this
in  my  oral  statement,  where  we  questioned  their  commitment  to
the  program.  If  you  go  back  historically,  they  didn’t  fund  the  pro-
gram  fully  at  one  point  in  time,  and  I  think  this  is  another  action
that just raises a red flag about their commitment to the program.
Mr. INGLIS. Why would that be? That is a helpful thing to know.
They  are  thinking  they  don’t—maybe  this  isn’t  their  number  one
priority or what is your guess on that?

Mr.  POWNER.  Well,  weather  is  clearly  important  to  the  Depart-
ment  of  Defense  in  many  areas.  Clearly  there  probably  are  other
priorities, and right now they have legacy systems that provide the
information they need.

Mr.  INGLIS.  Do  they  think  that  the  things  that  we  are  adding  to
this,  the  complexities,  the  additional  sensor,  all  these  kind  of
things,  are  beyond  what  their  needs  are  and  they  are  sort  of  mus-
cling their way to say, well, we really don’t want that anyway?

Mr. POWNER. I think you will get different stories from DOD. In
fact,  we  talked  to  many  of  the  user  groups  who  represent  the  De-
partment of Defense, and they are clamoring for some of the infor-
mation that will come out of the NPOESS program.

that?

Mr.  INGLIS.  Admiral  Lautenbacher,  do  you  have  any  theories  on

Vice  Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  Yes,  and  this  is  speculation.  As  I
said,  I  talked  to  Mr.  Young’s  assistant  this  morning,  and  there  is
concurrence  that  the  documents—that  they  are  interested  in  sign-
ing  the  documents  and  they  are  interested  in  helping  us  sign  the
documents and they are going to work hard. We are going to work

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

50

together  to  try  to  make  this  happen.  So  that  is  why  I  am  hoping
the Committee does not have to step in, that we can finish this our-
selves.

I  think—there  are  two  things  going  on.  First  of  all,  and  again,
having worked in DOD for a number of—in services; I did work in
DOD as well at one point. Mr. Young is relatively new in his posi-
tion.  He  has  a  portfolio  that  has  significant  issues  with  it,  as  Dr.
Bartlett mentioned, and he is trying to get control and hold of this
monster  that  is  the  DOD  establishment  and  put  some  discipline
and authority in it. And so he is, you know, putting some markers
on  the  table  that  we  are  going  to  do  this  right.  We  are  going  to
manage by the book, we are going to provide the right documenta-
tion,  and  we  are  going  to—and  I  couldn’t  agree  with  him  more.  I
agree  with  that.  We  need  to  do  it,  and  I  am  just  as  concerned  as
he is, and I have seen this before in the Department of Defense be-
cause it is hard to coordinate documents within the Department of
Defense,  let  alone  with  DOC  and  DOD  and  NASA  where  people
have  threatened  to  cut  off  the  money  because  you  didn’t  finish  pa-
perwork.  And  I  don’t  want  to  say  this  is  idle  paperwork,  but  you
know  what  I  mean,  you  didn’t  finish  the  job  as  designed  in  order
to  provide  the  baseline  information  for  a  program.  So  it  is  not  an
unusual tactic inside the Department of Defense to sort of enforce,
you  know,  the  need  to  do  the  job  on  time  and  do  it  well.  And  I
think we are seeing some of that.

Mr. INGLIS. Thank you, Admiral. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Chairman  LAMPSON.  Dr.  Bartlett,  you  are  recognized  for  five

minutes.

BUREAUCRATIC DELAYS

Mr. BARTLETT. Thank you very much. I think there are probably
three  basic  reasons  for  bureaucratic  delays,  and  I  would  like  each
of  you  to  respond  to  this.  One  reason  is  that  they  just  are  incom-
petent. The second reason is that there is too much for them to do.
They  just  can’t  get  it  done.  The  third  reason  is  that  there  is  not
enough  for  them  to  do  which  always  results  in  delays.  Dr.  Parkin-
son  has  noted  that  work  expands  to  fill  the  time  available  for  its
completion.  As  a  matter  of  fact,  it  may  grow  even  larger  because
if  you  are  a  bureaucrat  and  there  is  really  not  enough  for  you  to
do,  you  make  sure  that  it  appears  that  you  have  too  much  to  do
by  letting  things  pile  up  on  your  desk.  I  noted  that  in  our  local
county where building is way down, and now it takes twice as long
to  get  a  building  permit  through  as  it  did  when  we  were  booming.
Which of these three is the reason for the bureaucratic delays in

this program?

Mr.  POWNER.  I  would  clearly  go  with  number  two  and  the  lack
of  this  being  a  priority,  too  much  and  how  it  competes  with  other
priorities.

Vice Admiral LAUTENBACHER. I agree with that, but I would also
say  that  I  don’t  know  enough  about  each  one  of  the  many,  many
offices that this goes through. I know about ours, and I would—the
ones  I  know  about  it,  I  generally  agree  it  is  too  much  to  do,  and
I  would  make  the  point  that  most  of  this  documentation—and  I
have  watched  over  40  years—I  have  watched  the  documentation
grow and grow and grow and grow because requirements have been

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

51

added  because  somebody  made  a  mistake  somewhere,  and  you  got
to make sure they are never going to make that mistake again. So
you  put  a  requirement  and  a  document  or  a  new  document,  and  it
grows  and  grows  and  grows.  And  we  are  victims  to  that  process.
Now, I am not here to say that these documents are not necessary,
but  in  fact,  work  has  expanded  and  there  is  an  awful  lot  to  do  at
this point to ensure that every ‘‘i’’ is dotted and ‘‘t’’ is crossed.

Mr. BARTLETT. Dr. Parkinson also made another very interesting
observation  and  that  was  that  the  larger  an  organization  gets  and
with these three agencies, you are dealing with a lot of people, but
the  larger  an  organization  gets,  the  more  energy  is  spent  in  inter-
nal  communications;  and  pretty  soon  at  some  point  all  the  energy
is expended in internal communications and nothing gets done.

And  Admiral,  your  last  comment  seemed  to  indicate  that  there

is a bit of that going on.

Vice  Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  Yes,  but  we  have  made  a  great
deal  of  progress  on  these  documents  after  going  through  a  lengthy
review.  The  human  mind  is  a  very  ingenious  animal  and  does
things—humans  do  things  that—what  happens  in  this  system  is
that  when  you  get  to  the  point  where  you  are  totally  absorbed  in
self-communications, we start load shedding basically; and you find
offices that are off to the side that don’t get into the game anymore
because most responsible people who take on tasks know they have
to  complete  the  task  and  they  figure  out  some  way  to  do  it.  And
if  that  requires  bypassing  the  bureaucracy,  creating  new  processes
that  minimize  their  effect  on  it,  it  happens.  And  so  I  believe  there
is  a  continual  cycle  here  of  trying  to  get  ahead  of  the  problem  but
more requirements keep getting piled on. And we are in that battle
day by day.

Mr. BARTLETT. It is always true, I think, that what is everybody’s
business  is  nobody’s  business,  and  I  think  one  of  the  problems  of
this program is that there are too darned many people responsible
for  it.  Why  don’t  we  have  just  one  person  responsible  for  it  who
makes  the  decision?  He  either  lives  or  dies  on  the  basis  of  those
decisions?  When  you  have  a  big  bureaucracy,  everybody  has  tried
to  protect  themselves  so  that  they  can’t  be  faulted  for  a  failure.
What can we do to get around this bureaucracy so that one person
makes  the  decisions?  Committees  shouldn’t  be  making  decisions,
people should be making decisions so that we can get the job done.
Vice  Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  I  agree  having  now  had  to  work
with  the  system  for  a  number  of  years,  it  is  cumbersome.  It  is  the
first  time  we  have  tried  to  do  a  program  like  this  with  three  large
agencies  with  three  different  sets  of  requirements,  three  different
sets of acquisition rules, three different sets of administrative docu-
mentation,  et  cetera.  I  think  that  there  are  things  that  we  could
do to make the structure more streamlined, and my intention is to
try  to  include  that  in  this  alternative  management  study  that  we
are  talking  about  because  this  is  not  a  good  way  to  do  business
over  the  long-term.  And  as  I  said  before,  human  beings  are  inge-
nious. We will work out ways to improve this. So that is my inten-
tion at this point anyway.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

52

MORE ON ACQUISITION DOCUMENT APPROVAL

Chairman  LAMPSON.  Thank  you,  Dr.  Bartlett.  That  is  something
we may have to keep in mind and make sure we learn a lesson be-
cause something is going to be coming after this. We may not want
to do this again in the manner in which it has been done.

We  were  talking  about  some  of  the  decisions  that  were  pending,
and  you  had  made  a  comment  about  NASA,  waiting  on  NASA,
when  we  talked  about  the  Award  Fee  Plan  and  Fee  Management
Plan.

Vice Admiral LAUTENBACHER. Yes.
Chairman  LAMPSON.  The  report  that  we  have  got  indicates  that
NASA  was  completed  with  its  decision  on  June  4th,  that  we  were
ready  with  the  Commerce  Department  concurrence.  So  what  does
that leave?

Vice  Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  Yes,  and  we  have  word  that  they
have completed it, but that was after it was sitting there for three
or  four  months.  So  it  is  good  to  say  it  is  out  today,  but  you  have
to look at the whole history of this thing. And as I indicated, I be-
lieve that will be signed today or tomorrow. We have completed the
Fee Management Plan.

Chairman  LAMPSON.  Money  is  truly—time  is  money,  and  we  are
looking  at  a  lot  of  money.  The  Acquisition  Program  Baseline,  it  is
waiting for DOD, DOC determination, APB budget numbers?

Vice Admiral LAUTENBACHER. Yes, and we want to make sure be-
cause  this  is  a  document  that  will  be  fundamental  to  the  budget.
Remember,  we  ask  due  diligence.  The  Executive  Committee  asked
that  we  re-evaluate  the  operations  and  support  costs  because  the
operations  and  support  costs  was  carried  forward  from  2002.  None
of  us  believe  that  is  accurate.  We  ask  that  that  be  redone  because
I don’t want to have to come up and answer to the Committee why
we didn’t do that so that we have an independent cost estimate, we
have  a  program  estimate  now  because  we  created  the  ability  to  be
able to do that in our program so that we can provide the program
cost  estimates  because  we  want  to  lay  that  into  the  Acquisition
Program  Baseline.  Right  now  we  have  the  people  that  did  those
budgets  reconciling  them.  It  is  going  to  come  back  to  the  EXCOM
to  review  and  lay  it  in,  and  that  is  the  last  piece  of  this  deal.  It
is  basically  the  operations  and  support  costs  that  we  talked  about
and  potentially  the  need  for  more  reserve  on  VIIRS,  although  that
is  not  clear  at  this  point  because  we  have  been  able  to  manage
around the issues on VIIRS with the estimate that we had created
from  the  Nunn-McCurdy.  Remember,  we  have  gone  three  years
now  with  the  budgets  and  the  schedule  that  we  have  laid  in  be-
cause  of  our  intention  to  make  sure  there  was  enough  reserve  to
be able to handle issues like this that have come up.

Chairman  LAMPSON.  Mr.  Powner,  would  you  comment  on—give
me your feeling of the relationship between the earned value man-
agement  system  and  the  baseline  management  program,  baseline
program?

Mr. POWNER. Well, that is one area where we have had previous
recommendations in this area, and I think the Admiral made some
comments about how they get very detailed data. One of the things
that has been very valuable on this program is when there is a cost

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

53

increase  or  a  slip  in  schedule,  folks  know  about  it  through  the  use
of  earned  value  techniques;  and  they  know  about  it  at  very  high
levels. I know the Admiral made a comment to me at one time that
he can hear a pin drop on this program. Well, that is good because
we  want  to  be  all  over  those  costs  and  schedule  issues.  Now,  we
have  a  number  of  them  that  are  coming  up  here,  and  we  talked
about this $1 to $1.5 billion cost increase. We just need to disclose
that  fully  and  move  forward  with  an  accurate  baseline  from  this
point forward.

LIFE CYCLE COSTS

Chairman  LAMPSON.  Okay.  Let  us  shift  gears.  Admiral,  General
Mashiko was asked if she was confident that the NPOESS program
would be executed for the estimated $12.5 billion in life cycle costs
for  the  program  that  emerged  from  Nunn-McCurdy.  She  said  that
she  couldn’t  be  definite  while  negotiations  with  Northrop  Grum-
man  were  occurring  to  implement  the  new  plan  but  that  she  felt
that  it  was  the  right  number.  Given  what  you  know  now,  what  is
the life cycle cost?

Vice Admiral LAUTENBACHER. I think the life cycle cost will have
more  operating  costs  at  the  end,  so  it  is  going  to  be  larger  than
$12.5.  I  think  it  is  likely  to  be  somewhere  between  $12.5  and  per-
haps  $13.5,  in  that  region.  But  we  are  I  think  very  close  to  where
we  need  to  be  on  this  at  this  point  in  terms  of—I  am  not  going  to
sit  here  and  guarantee  that  everything  is  going  to  work  perfectly
for  every  nickel  that  is  scheduled  for  the  next  26  years—is  what
we are talking about here—or the next 20 years or so.

Chairman LAMPSON. Mr. Powner, you have seen data on the life
cycle cost. You briefed our staff that it appears there will be an in-
crease of $1.1 billion in the estimate. What accounts for that num-
ber?

Mr. POWNER. Yeah, I think at least we will see a $1.1 billion in-
crease. That is roughly $300 million to address the technical issues
with  the  sensors  and  $800  million  associated  with  additional  oper-
ations  and  support,  but  I  will  add  to  that  that  there  is  a  potential
for  increased  security  costs;  and  that  range  could  also  be  in  the
hundreds of millions of dollars. We are probably more in the camp
that the life cycle cost is going to be closer to $14 billion.

Chairman LAMPSON. Okay. If I add up the lower-end ranges that
you just gave us, $1.2 billion in cost growth. If I add the high ends
of  the  ranges  you  get  $1.8.  So  it  is  already  higher  than  last  week.
Where are you getting those numbers and how much confidence do
you have in them at this point?

Mr. POWNER. We got those rough ranges from the program office.
So  you  know,  I  think  in  our  official  statement  we  said  at  least  a
billion, but, again, I think we will be probably closer to $1.5.

One  other  point,  too,  with  the  security  issues  that  have  been
raised,  we  have  taken  a  long  time  to  make  a  decision  on  what  our
security  approach  is  for  the  ground  stations.  The  longer  we  sit  on
that,  the  likelihood  that  the  costs  are  going  to  be  going  up;  and
that reason for that is when you build security in late in the devel-
opment cycle, it is always more than if you build it in early. So that
is a concern going forward.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

54

Chairman  LAMPSON.  Should  any  of  these  additional  costs  not  be
included  in  the  final  program  baseline?  For  example,  if  we  incor-
porate  the  cost  for  VIIRS  recovery  into  the  baseline,  doesn’t  that
give  future  managers  a  false  impression  of  the  program’s  cost  and
schedule performance?

Mr. POWNER. Well, I think the VIIRS issues need to be addressed
and  we  need  to  build  those  into  the  program.  And  I  think  from  a
security perspective, to the program’s credit, they are looking at op-
tions to keep costs down, so that is a good thing.

Chairman  LAMPSON.  Are  we  ever  going  to  get  to  a  point  where
we really won’t see any hefty jumps in the program cost estimates
every year, year after year? Both of you.

Mr. POWNER. Hopefully, there will be greater stability once NPP
flies  and  we  start  looking  at  the  performance  with  the  operational
bird  at  that  point  in  time.  I  think  that  is  when  there  will  be  more
stability.

Vice  Admiral  LAUTENBACHER.  I  agree  with  that.  We  need  to  fin-
ish  testing  on  the  VIIRS  system,  and  we  need  to  launch  NPP.  At
that point, I think we will be close to out of the woods on what the
system will really cost.

Chairman  LAMPSON.  My  time  is  expired.  Let  me  yield  to  the

Ranking Member, Mr. Inglis.

Mr.  INGLIS.  For  a  brief  question.  I  have  got  a  corollary  to  the
Bartlett theory of bureaucracy. Dr. Bartlett described one—the rea-
sons  for  bureaucratic  delay  could  be  one,  incompetence;  two,  too
much  work;  and  three,  not  enough  work  and  the  work  expands  to
the  time  available.  I  think  that  a  fourth  possibility  is  that  when
you  have  a  complex,  difficult  project  that  encounters  a  slowdown,
it  moves  to  the  front  corner  of  the  desk.  And  that  slowdown  goes
on for a week or two. It moves to the floor. And when that file hits
the  floor,  there  is  an  enormous  amount  of  mental  energy  to  bring
it back up onto the desk.

So  I  wonder  if  what  we  are  learning  here  is  that  one  agency
should have owned this, and I guess the idea was to prevent three
from launching satellites. So therefore, let us get some efficiencies,
economies  of  scale  by  having  just  one.  But  I  wonder  if  one  should
have  owned  it  with  two  others  being  customers  or  tenants  on  that
piece  that  is  owned  by  the  one.  Either  of  you  have  thoughts  about
that?

Vice Admiral LAUTENBACHER. That is a model that looks awfully
good right now to me. I have to admit I was not in on the original
discussions in the ’90s. I was in the Navy at the time, and I didn’t
want the Navy anywhere near this. So we stayed out of it. But the
discussions went on at high levels, and it was finally decided by the
White  House  how  to  deal  with  setting  up  this  program.  So  there
was  a  lot  of  work  that  went  into  trying  to  think  about  this  model.
And I believe in the fewer complications and the executive author-
ity  where  you  really  have  the  authority.  The  programs  that  I  can
manage and I will come and tell you about, we just got an excellent
score  on  our  tsunami  warning  program  which  is  now  a  worldwide
system  which  you  supported.  It  was  a  program  we  started.  It  was
graded  by  OMB  as  93.4.  It  is  only  one  of  11  percent  of  programs
in  the  Federal  Government  that  got  the  effective  rating  from  our

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

55

Office of Management and Budget. It is IOCed.12 The buoys are out
around the world now providing 24/7 coverage for tsunami warning
to  the  United  States.  That  is  a  program  I  can  control  and  put  in-
side.  So  when  you  have  an  agency  controlling,  you  have  a  much
better  chance  for  success  on  these  things;  and  any  time  you  bring
in more agencies, you got a problem. I have no problem really with
separation  of  responsibilities,  having  customers  that  come  in  with
their  needs  and  you  make  a  decision  and  move  on.  As  I  said,  I
would like to look in the alternative management study. I will push
that from my end of it to deal with is there some way to streamline
the  structure  we  have  today  so  we  don’t  get  into  this  problem  we
have  now  of  trying  to  update  the  MOA  to  make  sure  that  DOD’s
executive  authority  is  exactly  prescribed  correctly  in  accordance
with what the lawyers will think it will work across a three-agency
boundary. Thank you, sir.

Chairman  LAMPSON.  Mr.  Bartlett,  you  are  recognized  for  five

minutes.

Mr. BARTLETT. Thank you very much. This program is typical of
many  of  our  programs  in  DOD.  The  costs  just  keep  going  up  and
up.  When  I  repeat  the  Lord’s  Prayer  and  I  come  to  that  part  that
says  lead  us  not  into  temptation,  I  wonder  how  we  can  enter  into
some  of  our  contract  agreements  and  still  do  that  prayer  because
when you enter into a contract agreement where the more it costs,
the  more  the  contractor  makes,  we  are  doing  something  similar  to
what the chaplains at Ft. Leonard Wood said we were doing when
we  put  young  men  and  women  in  such  close  confines.  What  we
were doing runs contrary to the powers of nature.

Somehow we have got to get around this, and I think that push-
ing  the  envelope  and  not  knowing  definitively  what  can  be  done
when  you  start  the  program  is  a  major  reason  for  this,  but  at  the
end of the day you say, gee, you really ought to get 15 percent prof-
it.  And  so  the  reality  is  that  the  worse  they  do,  that  is,  the  more
it costs, the more they make. How do we get around that?

Vice Admiral LAUTENBACHER. If you look at the Fee Management
Plan  for  this  program,  it  has  been  reduced  down  to  12  or  13  per-
cent. So they can’t get any—we have already reduced it below that,
and  there  is  only  two  percent  of  that  which  can  be,  what  I  would
say,  judgmental.  The  rest  of  it  is  tied  to  meeting  requirements  on
the  Nunn-McCurdy  revised  schedule  and  performance.  So  they  are
under  the  gun,  and  they  are  being  given  their  so-called  reward
based on the ability to perform. And in many areas, they have not
been doing well, and in other areas, they have been doing well be-
cause  I  mentioned  four  of  these  instruments  are  on  track.  So  it  is
a mixed blessing from the contractors’ point of view.

But  what  you  bring  to  account  is  the  idea  of  the  cost  plus  con-
tract  which  is  an  issue.  And  that  is  kind  of  a  philosophical  discus-
sion. Do we save money on cost plus contracts, even if they go over,
or  would  it  be  better  to  try  to  go  fix  price  up  front.  When  you  try
to  do  that  for  a  development  area  where  you  really  don’t  know
what you are doing in terms of what you can develop, we have had
a  lot  of  trouble  with  that,  too.  So  that  is  another  part  of  the  deci-
sion.  I  don’t  like  the  cost  plus  program,  I  certainly  don’t  like  them

12 Initial Operational Capability

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

56

for  NOAA  because  NOAA  is  an  operational  agency.  I  think  the  re-
search should be done elsewhere, and when we get an instrument,
we should just buy it and there should be a price and a contractor
that  produces  it  and  we  will  execute  it.  We  are  a  24-by-7  oper-
ational  agency.  I  don’t  like  the  idea  of  taking  on  development  risk
within the NOAA framework. We have other agencies that do that
and where their strong point—what I believe is their strong point—
and I have been a strong proponent of planning together across the
agencies,  develop  space  instruments  versus  the  agencies  that  use
them.

So  I  think  that  is  a  critical  need  for  us  to  work  on  as  a  govern-

Mr. BARTLETT. For 16 years now I have been watching programs
in  DOD  and  almost  never  do  we  come  in  on  time,  on  budget;  and
it  would  seem  that  we  ought  to  learn  a  little  from  history  and
someone,  maybe  GAO,  needs  to  take  a  look  at  this.  And  this  is  a
long  history.  It  precedes  by  many  years,  my  short  16  years  of
watching  this  process.  How  come  we  never  get  it  right?  This  pro-
gram  is  just  typical  of  many  of  our  programs,  and  you  are  not
unique in the problems that you have.

ment.

Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman.
Chairman LAMPSON. You are welcome, and we are running a lit-
tle  bit  out  of  time,  close  on  our  votes  that  we  have,  so  I  am  going
to be very quick. I have wanted to make a corrected statement that
I  made  at  the  very,  very  beginning  when  I  talked  about  the  gen-
tleman who received an award the other day with whom I had gone
to college, and then you began talking about the tsunami program.
Dr.  Eddie  Bernard—and  I  said  Dr.  Eddie  Beaumont—I  meant  Dr.
Eddie Bernard from Beaumont, Texas—pardon my—getting ahead.
My  tongue  got  faster  than  my  brain  was  working  apparently,  but
Dr. Bernard is the Director of the Pacific Marine Environment Lab-
oratory and has done significant work. And obviously, the role that
he  played  in  creating  that  tsunami  warning  system  is  something
that we are all very, very proud of, proud to have known that I sat
in  some  of  the  same  classes  with  him.  I  just  wish  I  had  learned
more along the way.

Thank  you  all,  both,  for  being  here  and  the  panel  members  for
raising  the  questions  that  we  have  done  today,  and  hopefully  we
will move this program forward because we know how critically im-
portant it is to our whole country and this Earth.

So  thank  you  for  appearing  before  the  Committee  this  morning,
and under the rules of the Committee, the record will be held open
for  two  weeks  for  Members  to  submit  additional  statements  and
any  additional  questions  that  they  might  have  for  the  witnesses.
This hearing is now adjourned.

[Whereupon, at 11:30 a.m., the Subcommittee was adjourned.]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 1:

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

(57)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

58

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  David  A.  Powner,  Director,  Information  Technology  Management

Issues, Government Accountability Office

Questions submitted by Representative Bob Inglis
Q1. The Nunn-McCurdy certification decision reduced the number of instruments on
the NPOESS satellite from thirteen to nine and reduced the functionality of four
of  the  nine  remaining  sensors.  The  decision  stated  that  these  instruments  could
be remanifested if other parties funded them. The National Oceanic and Atmos-
pheric Administration (NOAA) has announced that two of the sensors have since
been added back to the configuration of the satellite and has expanded the capa-
bility of another instrument.

Q1a. What  was  the  point  of  going  through  the  Nunn-McCurdy  process,  particularly
with  respect  to  reducing  the  number  of  instruments  in  order  to  lessen  the  risk
of  the  mission,  if  the  NOAA  was  going  to  put  all  these  instruments  back  on?
A1a. According  to  the  June  2006  decision,  the  program  restructuring  was  intended
to reduce the acquisition’s complexity and risks while ensuring the continuity of ex-
isting satellite programs and data. The decision also allowed the program the flexi-
bility  to  remanifest  key  instruments  if  they  were  funded  outside  the  program  and
approved by the tri-agency Executive Committee guiding the NPOESS program.

In January 2007, NOAA and the National Aeronautics and Space Administration
(NASA)  prioritized  the  capabilities  of  the  instruments  that  were  degraded  or  re-
moved  from  the  NPOESS  program.  The  highest  priorities  included  Earth  radiation
budget,  solar  irradiance,  and  improved  ozone  measurements.  These  measurements
were expected to be provided by the Clouds and the Earth’s Radiant Energy System
(CERES) sensor, the Total Solar Irradiance Sensor (TSIS) sensor, and the limb com-
ponent of the Ozone Mapper/Profiler Suite (OMPS), respectively.

Given  these  priorities,  the  NPOESS  Executive  Committee  decided  to  make  two
modifications  to  the  NPOESS  Preparatory  Project  (NPP)  demonstration  satellite—
by adding a CERES sensor and restoring the full functionality of the OMPS sensor.
In  addition,  the  Executive  Committee  decided  to  add  one  sensor,  TSIS,  to  the  first
NPOESS  satellite.  No  changes  were  made  to  the  three  other  satellites  in  the
NPOESS program. NOAA officials reported that these modifications are being fund-
ed outside of the program and that TSIS will not be permitted to delay the NPOESS
schedule. Specifically, the program office reported that TSIS will not be included on
the satellite if it falls behind schedule.

While  restoring  selected  sensors  and  functionality  to  NPP  and  the  first  NPOESS
satellite  involves  added  risk,  the  program  has  attempted  to  mitigate  these  risks  by
selecting sensors and technologies that are well understood and maintaining the op-
tion  to  not  include  TSIS  if  it  falls  behind  schedule.  Further,  program  officials  have
decided not to reintroduce other sensors that were removed (including the Advanced
Polarimetry Sensor or the Radar Altimeter) or to restore the functions of other sen-
sors that were degraded (including the Conical-Scanned Microwave Imager/Sounder
and Space Environment Sensor Suite) at this time.
Q1b. Was there any other way to maintain the climate and environmental data short

of restoring these instruments?

A1b. In  our  May  2008  report,  we  highlighted  several  short-term  options  for  restor-
ing selected climate sensors, including adding sensors back to a later NPOESS sat-
ellite,  adding  sensors  to  another  planned  satellite  (such  as  Landsat—a  joint  NASA/
U.S.  Geological  Survey  mission),  and  developing  a  new  satellite  to  include  several
of the sensors.1

In addition to short-term options, the Federal Government needs to consider long-
term  options.  We  reported  that  NASA,  NOAA,  and  the  Department  of  Defense
(DOD)  lacked  plans  for  restoring  sensor  capabilities  on  a  long-term  basis.  We  rec-
ommended  that  the  three  agencies  establish  plans  on  whether  and  how  to  restore
the  climate  and  space  sensors  removed  from  the  NPOESS  program,  in  cases  where
the sensors are warranted and justified. This would include justifying the additional
funding needed to develop these sensors within their respective agency’s investment
decision processes. The result of this planning will help determine the best and most

1 GAO,  Environmental  Satellites:  Polar-orbiting  Satellite  Acquisition  Faces  Delays;  Decisions
Needed  on  Whether  and  How  to  Ensure  Climate  Data  Continuity,  GAO–08–518,  (Washington,
D.C.: May 16, 2008).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

59

cost  effective  way  of  maintaining  relevant  climate  and  space  environment  data
records.
Q2. In  your  testimony,  you  mentioned  that  there  was  a  newly  identified  risk  of

changing security requirements.

Q2a. Can you please explain the basis for the concern about these requirements?
A2a. As we noted in our testimony and in the accompanying report, changing secu-
rity  requirements  late  in  a  system’s  development  can  add  cost  and  risk  to  the  pro-
gram.2 To  date,  NPOESS  has  been  designed  and  developed  to  meet  DOD’s  stand-
ards  for  a  mission  essential  system.  However,  NOAA  officials  believe  that  the  sys-
tem  should  be  built  to  meet  more  stringent  standards—specifically  to  a  high  secu-
rity  level  per  Federal  Information  Processing  Standards  Publication  199.  Imple-
menting more stringent standards could cause rework and retesting, and potentially
affect  the  cost  and  schedule  of  the  system.  Program  officials  are  assessing  options
and expect to decide on security requirements by September 2008.
Q2b. You  also  mentioned  there  was  a  March  2008  study  of  the  impacts  and  costs
of  adding  additional  security  to  NPOESS.  Has  GAO  received  a  copy  of  this
study? If not, when do you expect to see a copy and what were the reasons you
were given for not releasing it to the GAO?

A2b. We  received  a  summary  of  the  March  study  in  June  2008.  This  study  identi-
fied the new requirements and contained rough estimates for implementing the var-
ious  upgrades  depending  on  when  and  how  the  various  changes  were  made.  The
Chief  Information  Officer  of  the  NOAA  subcomponent  the  National  Environmental
Satellite,  Data,  and  Information  Service  noted  that  the  office  is  currently  working
with the NPOESS program office to outline the specific engineering solution for the
requirements  and  anticipates  a  better  cost  estimate  after  that  effort  is  completed—
which is anticipated to be later this summer.
Q3. There  seems  to  be  continuing  problems  with  some  of  the  sensors,  in  particular
the  Visible/Infrared  Imager  Radiometer  Suite  (VIIRS)  instrument.  In  previous
reports,  GAO  has  characterized  the  risk  as,  in  part,  due  to  problems  with  con-
tractor  and  oversight  issues  on  the  part  of  the  NPOESS  program  management.
Since we are still seeing problems with the sensors, even with the increased over-
sight  by  the  government,  what  can  be  done  to  improve  the  performance  of  the
contractor?

A3. In  our  May  2008  report,  we  noted  that  the  program  office  had  recently  insti-
tuted  biweekly  senior-level  management  meetings  to  review  progress  on  the  status
of  the  VIIRS  instrument’s  development,  and  that  program  officials  had  stated  that
both the prime contractor and the program executive office will have senior officials
on-site  at  the  contractor’s  facility  to  provide  extensive,  day-to-day  oversight  of  the
prime  contractor  and  subcontractor  management  activities  to  assist  in  resolving
issues. This is in line with an independent study (called the Alternate Management
Study)  that  recommended  in  June  2007  that  the  program  office  provide  more  sys-
tems  engineering  leadership  for  the  program  and  intensify  management  and  tech-
nical oversight over the prime contractor. More recently, the Defense Contract Man-
agement  Agency  and  the  prime  contractor  conducted  reviews  of  the  subcontractor
responsible  for  VIIRS  and  recommended  further  management  changes.  Program  of-
ficials reported that the subcontractor is working to implement these changes while
the program office is overseeing these efforts. In our report, we stated that it is im-
portant  for  the  program  office,  the  Program  Executive  Office,  and  the  Executive
Committee to continue to provide close oversight of milestones and risks.
Q4. One of the most significant problems I believe you raise in this report is the con-
cern  about  the  loss  of  sensor  capability  on  satellites  past  the  NPP  and  first
NPOESS  satellites  due  to  a  lack  of  planning.  You  state  in  your  testimony  that
the  agencies  may  lose  ‘‘windows  of  opportunity’’  for  selecting  the  most  cost-effec-
tive options with regards to sensor acquisition.

Q4a. Considering the ballooning cost of this program as it is, what was the agencies’

response to this concern when you presented them with the draft report?

A4a. In  written  responses  to  our  May  report’s  recommendation,  all  three  agencies
agreed  with  the  recommendation  to  develop  long-term  plans  for  whether  and  how
to  restore  the  climate  and  space  environment  sensors  removed  from  the  satellites.
In  addition,  both  the  Department  of  Commerce  and  NASA  reiterated  that  they  are

2 GAO–08–899T and GAO–08–518.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

60

working with their partner agencies to finalize plans for restoring sensors to address
the Nation’s long-term needs for continuity of climate measurements.
Q4b. How soon should such a plan be developed before the costs become prohibitive?
A4b. There  are  many  options  available  for  obtaining  climate  and  space  data  con-
tinuity,  such  as  including  selected  sensors  on  other  NASA,  European,  or  NPOESS
satellites.  However,  as  time  goes  by,  selected  options  will  no  longer  be  viable  be-
cause the window of opportunity for adding sensors to those satellites will close.

While  other  satellite  programs  may  have  different  requirements,  NPOESS  pro-
gram officials stated that they need at least six years’ notice in order to add sensors
to  their  satellites.  This  means  that  agencies  would  need  to  identify  their  plans  to
add sensors to the second NPOESS satellite by January 2010.

In responding to these questions, we relied on information we previously reported

on NPOESS.3

3 GAO–08–899T; GAO–08–518; GAO, Polar-orbiting Operational Environmental Satellites: Re-
structuring  is  Under  Way,  but  Technical  Challenges  and  Risks  Remain,  GAO–07–498  (Wash-
ington, D.C.: April 27, 2007).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

61

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Vice  Admiral  Conrad  C.  Lautenbacher,  Jr.  (U.S.  Navy,  Ret.),  Under
Secretary  of  Commerce  for  Oceans  and  Atmosphere;  Administrator,  National
Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA)

Questions submitted by Representative Bob Inglis
Q1. You  mention  in  your  testimony  that  the  NPOESS  program  uncovered  some  de-
sign flaws with the Visible/Infrared Imager Radiometer Suite, or VIIRS, specifi-
cally relating to fasteners and screws. This is not a highly technical part of this
critical instrument.

Q1a. How could an oversight of this kind occur?
A1a. There were two fastener related issues on the Visible/Infrared Imager Radiom-
eter  Suite  (VIIRS):  titanium  bolt  breakage  and  jackpost  breakage.  Titanium  bolts
have  properties  that  require  slow  tightening  during  installation  to  prevent  weak-
ening of the part. Consequently, we are looking very closely at the processes under-
taken  by  the  VIIRS  contractors,  particularly  those  associated  with  installation  and
quality control. The bolt was taken from a new batch and that lot was sampled, in-
spected  and  tested  without  any  issues  noted.  No  other  parts  in  the  original  batch
displayed failure.

The  fasteners,  called  jackposts,  are  custom  designed  parts.  The  root  cause  of  the
jackpost  failure  is  that  the  parts  did  not  meet  specifications  as  defined  by  the  gov-
ernment.  The  part  supplier  was  a  trusted  vendor  to  Raytheon  and  the  parts  were
not subjected to the appropriate level of inspection by Raytheon upon delivery. The
acceptance  process  for  parts  has  been  reviewed  to  ensure  that  a  similar  lapse  will
not  occur  again.  Subsequent  investigations  by  the  NPOESS  Program  and  contrac-
tors have revealed that the remaining jackposts on VIIRS are flight worthy and we
only need to replace the 18 jackposts that broke.

The  NPOESS  Integrated  Program  Office  (IPO)  and  contractors  are  reviewing  in-
ternal  control  processes  to  ensure  that  similar  incidents  do  not  happen  again.  The
government is continuing its investigation of the processes and actions of the VIIRS
contractors. The government is putting in place design and quality process changes
to  use  standard  parts  as  much  as  possible,  and  are  instituting  mandatory  parts
screening and inspection for all vendors.
Q1b. Is there a process in place to prevent such oversights from occurring in the fu-
ture so that minor parts of the instruments do not lead to major problems later
on? What assurances do we have that these types of problems are not pervasive
throughout the rest of the instruments?

A1b. We  have  put  in  place  both  design  and  quality  process  changes  which  include:
1) Using  standard  parts  instead  of  custom  parts  wherever  possible  during  de-

sign; and

2) Mandatory screening and inspection on all incoming parts regardless of ven-

dor past performance.

Specifically  for  VIIRS,  the  team  is  reviewing  all  custom  parts  and  the  associated
spares to ensure no issues exist with other components on the sensor. To assure our-
selves  that  the  VIIRS  issues  are  not  systemic  to  this  program,  the  NPOESS  IPO
tasked  Northrop  Grumman,  the  NPOESS  prime  contractor,  to  perform  Mission  As-
surance audits of each of their subcontractors.

The  IPO  continues  to  provide  oversight  of  the  NPOESS  contractors  to  improve
their  adherence  to  program  specifications  and  quality  control  of  the  manufacturing
processes. The IPO, NOAA and the National Aeronautics and Space Administration
(NASA) continue to work closely to ensure that there are clear lines of communica-
tion between the government and the contractors.
Q2. The  President’s  FY09  budget  request  includes  $74  million  for  the  development
of  the  CERES  (Clouds  and  Earth’s  Radiant  Energy  System)  and  TSIS  (Total
Solar  Irradiance  Sensor)  instruments.  These  are  two  sensors  that  had  been
demanifested by the Nunn-McCurdy certification process and the money for their
development can not come from the NPOESS program baseline.

Q2a. Is  this  just  an  additional  $74  million  that  NOAA  and  NASA  are  asking  for?

Or does this ask reduce available funds in other NOAA programs?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

62

A2a. The $74 million for the Climate Sensors/Climate Data Records is an additional
increase  in  funding  for  NOAA’s  satellite  budget  request.  No  other  NOAA  program
funding was reduced to support this new initiative.
Q2b. Has NOAA explored the possibility of putting these sensors on separate vehicles

to maintain the integrity of the current launch schedule?

A2b. NOAA and NASA, in collaboration with the Office of Management and Budget
and the Office of Science Technology Policy, assessed the processes and capabilities
required  to  build  these  instruments  and  place  them  onto  the  appropriate  and  most
cost-effective satellite. Careful consideration was given to cost, schedule, and techno-
logical maturity of the sensors, as well as the capability of the Federal Government
and  its  contractors  to  successfully  deliver  the  instruments.  The  assessment  also  in-
cluded a review of available launches, the cost and feasibility of single mission sat-
ellite  launches  and  the  time  required  to  launch  these  sensors  to  ensure  uninter-
rupted continuity of the climate measurements.

Based on the planned timing of the launches of the NPOESS Preparatory Project
(NPP)  and  the  first  NPOESS  satellite  (C1),  and  the  dates  when  the  sensors  are
needed  on  orbit  to  ensure  continuity  of  the  climate  record,  the  decision  was  made
to  place  the  Clouds  and  the  Earth’s  Radiant  Energy  System  (CERES)  Flight  Model
(FM)  #5  on  NPP,  and  Total  Solar  Irradiance  Sensor  (TSIS)  and  CERES  FM  #6  in-
struments on C1.

Full  funding  of  the  NPOESS-related  budget  requests  in  the  appropriations  bills
for  NOAA,  the  NASA,  and  the  Air  Force  appropriations  bills  is  required  to  ensure
the  climate  sensors  can  be  integrated  and  launched  on  the  respective  NPP  and
NPOESS satellites.
Q2c. In the event that Congress does not pass an Appropriations bill for FY09, what
will be the affect of a continuing resolution on the development of these sensors?
How does that affect our ability to collect relevant climate data?

A2c. NOAA will be operating under a continuing resolution in FY2009 until at least
March  6,  2009,  which  will  impact  current  acquisition  and  development  activities.
While the mitigations of the continuing resolution impacts are still being evaluated,
the funding shortfall will slow initiation of GOES–R flight and ground efforts which
could result in a launch delay and/or increased life cycle costs. The funding shortfall
will also place the schedules for CERES and TSIS at high risk for meeting the Jan-
uary  2013  NPOESS  C1  launch.  Additional  costs  to  CERES  and  TSIS  could  also  be
possible to accelerate deliveries or accommodate late deliveries if feasible.

If  the  CERES  FM6  and  TSIS  instruments  are  not  available  in  time  to  be  inte-
grated  onto  NPOESS  C1,  the  Nation’s  scientific  community  would  be  at  high  risk
of  a  data  gap  for  these  critical  global  environmental  measurements.  Such  a  break
in the climate record would introduce uncertainty and compromise climate informa-
tion  for  decision-makers.  In  addition,  the  loss  of  these  data  would  require  many
years of calibration to recover.
Q3. The  Nunn-McCurdy  certification  included  $1  billion  placeholder  in  the  esti-
mated life cycle cost for operations and support—essentially what is needed once
the  satellite  is  actually  launched.  This  placeholder  was  originated  in  the  2002
Acquisition  Program  Baseline.  GAO  has  informed  us  that  as  the  launch  date
gets  closer,  this  figure  will  go  up  by  another  $800  million,  in  part  because  it
hadn’t been updated since 2002.

Q3a. Why is the additional $800 million needed if now there are only four satellites,
whereas in 2002 there were six satellites to support and the program estimated
only $1 billion for operations and support purposes?

A3a. The  Nunn-McCurdy  certification  process  of  the  NPOESS  program  only  exam-
ined development and production costs, not operations and sustainment (O&S) costs.
In fall 2007, following the completion of the program restructure after Nunn-McCur-
dy  that  scaled  back  the  program  from  six  to  four  satellites,  the  NPOESS  program
was  directed  to  execute  a  complete  program  estimate  including  O&S  costs  given
NOAA’s  concern  that  the  program  did  not  have  a  realistic  estimate  of  those  costs.
Following  the  Program  Office  Estimate  completed  in  December  2007,  the  EXCOM
requested  the  Department  of  Defense’s  Cost  Analysis  Improvement  Group  (CAIG)
complete  an  independent  review  of  the  total  program  costs  to  further  validate  the
estimate  of  operations  costs  as  well  as  the  development  and  production  costs  esti-
mated  during  the  Nunn-McCurdy  certification  process.  The  EXCOM  received  those
results in July 2008.

The  2002  O&S  estimate  only  included  costs  from  the  time  of  launch  through  the
initial  ten  years  of  on-orbit  life,  while  today  we  expect  operations  to  last  17  years

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

63

following  initial  launch.  The  recently  completed  estimate  took  into  consideration
some  NPOESS  Preparatory  Project  (NPP)  costs  that  were  not  captured  in  the  2002
estimate.  The  recent  estimate  was  also  completed  with  far  more  knowledge  of  the
system  than  the  earlier  estimate  and  consequently  added  more  detail  and  accuracy
to the overall life cycle cost estimate.

Overall, the cost for operations and sustainment is not directly linked to the num-
ber  of  satellites,  but  the  length  of  time  the  satellites  will  be  on  orbit  and  the  cor-
responding costs to maintain the processing software, and the need for periodic up-
dates  of  the  ground  processors.  The  recent  estimate  of  operations  costs  better  esti-
mated  the  needs  for  software  and  processor  updates  and  indicated  that  an  addi-
tional  $800  million  is  required  to  support  the  operations  of  the  NPOESS  program.
Q3b. If  the  $1  billion  is  incorrect  now  in  2008  by  $800  million,  it  must  have  been
incorrect in 2006 when the program was being subjected to the Nunn-McCurdy
certification process. Why was the figure not updated then, or even before?

A3b. As  noted  above,  the  Nunn-McCurdy  process  as  defined  by  DOD  for  the
NPOESS  program  only  examined  development  and  production  costs,  not  operations
and sustainment costs. This is why NOAA requested the NPOESS program provide
a complete cost estimate following the restructure in Fall 2007. In March 2008, the
EXCOM requested an independent cost estimate be completed by the CAIG and the
final results were reported to the EXCOM in July 2008.
Q4. If  there  are  problems  that  still  exist  in  the  program  that  cannot  be  agreed  to  at
the staff level, why are they not resolved at the periodic EXCOM (Executive Com-
mittee) meetings?

A4. Problems  that  cannot  be  resolved  at  the  staff  level  are  addressed  at  the
EXCOM  meetings.  However,  given  the  unique  tri-agency  structure  of  this  program,
the NPOESS program has found it challenging to navigate the bureaucracies of the
three  separate  agencies  to  get  final  documents  representing  complex  agreements
signed  in  a  timely  manner  even  when  agreed  to  in  principle  at  EXCOM  meetings.
Progress  has  been  made  to  improve  the  process  within  the  tri-agency  program  dur-
ing the last few months.
Q4a. Please provide a detailed agenda of each EXCOM meeting since it was formed

in 2006 and please detail what decisions were made in each meeting.

A4a. The following table provides the date of the nine EXCOM meetings conducted
since  it  was  formed  in  2006,  and  a  detailed  list  of  decisions  made  at  each  meeting.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

64

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

65

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

66

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

67

Q4b. If an item on the agenda is not resolved at an EXCOM meeting, does it appear

on the agenda for the next meeting?

A4b. Most  decisions  made  by  the  EXCOM  have  been  resolved  at  the  meeting  in
which the issue was scheduled to be discussed. However, there have been a few com-
plex  issues  in  the  program  since  the  Nunn-McCurdy  certification,  which  have  been
more difficult to resolve. Those issues were included on multiple agendas during the
past  few  years  and  have  also  been  addressed  and  brought  to  final  decision  through
multiple principal level teleconferences and other meetings between formal EXCOM
meetings.
Q4c. Please  detail  the  items  on  each  agenda  that  were  not  resolved  at  the  EXCOM
meeting  for  which  it  was  brought  up  and  explain  why  no  decision  was  agreed
to.

A4c. As noted above, the EXCOM has been largely successful in resolving issues in
the agenda at the time of the EXCOM. However, since the Nunn-McCurdy Recertifi-
cation, the issues of budget reconciliation and cost estimates, as well as Acquisition
Decision  Memorandum  document  resolution  have  been  ongoing  issues  that  took
multiple  meetings  and  other  interactions  to  resolve  as  these  issues  were  processed
formally  through  each  agency.  As  noted  above,  this  unique  tri-agency  program  has
made  progress  in  merging  the  disparate  processes  in  each  agency  to  get  final  deci-
sions documented.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 2:

ADDITIONAL MATERIAL SUBMITTED FOR THE HEARING RECORD

(69)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

70

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

71

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

72

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

73

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

74

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

75

Æ

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:12 Dec 21, 2008 Jkt 043349 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\E&E08\061908\43349 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

